'The Adelaide Steamship Co Ltd ADSA.S (Adsteam) said it will subscribe to 30 mln shares in listed British property developer, Markheath Securities Plc, at 60p each, subject to shareholder approval.     The subscription, expected to take place in May, will give Adsteam 49 pct of Markheath, Adsteam said in a statement.     Adsteam\'s managing director John Spalvins will become chairman of Markheath and two other Adsteam nominees will join its board. \"We hope that in time Markheath will become a significant property and industrial company in the same style as Adsteam,\" Spalvins said in the statement.  \n',acq
'Air Canada\'s 54 mln U.S. dlr acquisition of Gelco Corp\'s GEC Canadian unit has dramatically altered Canada\'s fast growing courier industry, largely dominated by U.S. companies until this year, company officials and analysts said.     State-owned Air Canada takes over the country\'s second largest overnight courier business just two months after another Canadian company, Onex Capital Corp Ltd, approved the acquisition of number one ranked Purolator Courier Ltd from New Jersey-based Purolator Courier Corp PCC.     But analysts said the two acquisitions were prompted by financial restructuring undertaken by the U.S. parent companies and likely don\'t represent an industry trend toward buying out foreign owned courier operations.     \"It\'s a case of whether you can buy from the right people at the right time,\" McLeod Young Weir Ltd transportation analyst Tony Hine commented.     The two acquisitions fit with a larger move by U.S. companies embroiled in a take-over or restructuring to sell-off their Canadian units to generate ready cash, said Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc analyst Harold Wolkin.     \"There is a very good correlation between the U.S. parent selling Canadian subsidiaries and the U.S. parent either being under siege or taking someone else over,\" he said.     Gelco Corp, of Minnesota, decided to sell Gelco Express Ltd as part of its previously announced program to sell off four operating units to buy back shares and pay down debt, Gelco Express marketing vice president James O\'Neil tolds.     The sale is the first under Gelco\'s divestiture program, and proceeds will be used to help pay down 350 mln U.S. dlrs of debt by year-end, the company said.     While company officials declined to disclose earnings and revenue figures, O\'Neil said Gelco Express holds a dominant position in the industry, handling more than 50,000 packages a day and generating revenues of more than 100 mln Canadian dlrs a year.     The earlier move by Purolator to sell its Canadian unit formed an important part of a company restructuring program, adopted after another Canadian Company, Unicorp Canada Corp, acquired a 12.6 pct stake in Purolator and said it would consider acquiring the whole company.     Last month, Purolator agreed to be acquired by a company formed by E.F. Hutton LBO Inc and certain managers of Purolator\'s U.S. courier business.     For Air Canada, its acquisition of Gelco\'s Canadian courier business represents an \"excellent financial investment\" in a market it sees growing by 25 to 30 pct annually, spokesman Esther Szynkarsky said.     The airline also announced it acquired a 65 pct stake in EMS Corp, of Calgary, an in-city messenger service.     It did not disclose financial terms, but Szynkarsky said the two acquisitions totalled about 90 mln Canadian dlrs, and the two business have combined yearly revenues of 170 mln dlrs.     She said the acquisition fit with Air Canada\'s strategy of seeking attractive investments that compliment its main airline business.     Gelco will continue to operate with current management, independently of Air Canada, although Air Canada already operates its own air cargo business that includes a small door-to-door courier operation.     \"They\'re well run, they\'re a good investment, they\'re doing well in a growing market, and that\'s the way we want to keep it,\" Szynkarsky said.     Analyst Hine said the Gelco and Purolator Canadian units will likely retain operating links with their U.S. delivery network, generating traffic for the former parent companies without them having to tie up capital in Canada.     \"The nature of the business is that incremental traffic is incremental revenue,\" Hine said.     \"It\'s sort of a sausage maker business where you put in place the sausage grinder, and the more sausage you can stuff through, the more money you make,\" he added.  \n',acq
'Air Canada, the state-owned airline, said it signed a letter of intent to acquire 65 pct of EMS Corp, a Calgary-based messenger service which operates in Western Canada and the U.S..     Gelco Corp (GEL) earlier said Air Canada agreed to buy its Canadian Gelco Express Ltd unit for 54 mln U.S. dlrs.     Air Canada said the acquisitions will complement its main cargo business. It said it expects the courier market to grow by about 25 to 30 pct a year.  \n',acq
'Ajinomoto Co Inc AJIN.T said it will sign around end-April to buy the 50 pct of Knorr Foods Co Ltd, capitalised at four billion yen, that it does not already own from its U.S. Partner CPC International Inc.     Ajinomoto will also acquire 50 pct each of CPC\'s two sales subsidiaries and six production units in Hong Kong, the Philippines, Singapore, Malaysia, Taiwan and Thailand, he said.     The total cost of the acquisition is 340 mln dlrs, the spokesman said.  \n',acq
'Dutch chemical group Akzo N.V. AKZO.AS said it agreed to take over household product subsidiaries of French group Rhone-Poulenc RHON.PA for an undisclosed sum.     Under the agreement, Akzo will acquire the household product activities of the Lyons-based Rhodic and Remalard-based Buhler-Fontaine units of Rhone Poulenc. Together, these activities account for over 180 mln French francs in annual sales and employ 170, Akzo said.     Akzo will integrate the firms, to be partially joined with its own French activities, in its consumer products division.  \n',acq
'Dutch chemicals group Akzo NV AKZO.AS said it hoped to consolidate its core activities this year by making small acquisitions in the US.    Akzo chairman Aarnoud Loudon told a news conference on its 1986 report that the company wanted to achieve the same level of US investments it had before it divested its fibre firm American Enka in December 1985, when US investments represented 20 pct of Akzo\'s total capital.    The US expansion plans were not an attempt to compensate for losses in guilder income through the lower dollar, Loudon said.     He said a more important factor was the speed of growth in the US, adding \"It\'s the largest industrial market in the world.\" But he said the company would also be looking at possible acquisitions in Europe.     Despite its highly liquid cash flow, Akzo did not plan acquisitions on a scale that would negatively influence the company\'s debt/equity ratio, Loudon said.    The chairman said in the past two years Akzo had spent 1.1 billion guilders on acquisitions, of which nearly two thirds were in the United States.... \n',acq
'Alcan Australia Ltd AL.S said it will make a 39.3 mln N.Z. Dlr cash bid for all the issued shares of Alcan New Zealand Ltd at 1.80 N.Z. Dlrs each with a four-for-three share alternative.     Both are 70 pct owned by Canada\'s Alcan Aluminium Ltd AL which will take the share swap option, Alcan Australia deputy chairman Jeremy Davis said in a statement. The remainder of Alcan New Zealand\'s totalled issued 21.84 mln shares are broadly held while Alcan Australia\'s are primarily held by institutions. Alcan NZ last traded at 1.55 NZ dlrs, while Alcan Australia today ended four cents down at 1.15 dlrs.     Davis said the offer, which is subject to approval by the New Zealand Overseas Investment Commission, was a response to the integration of the two countries\' markets under the Australia-New Zealand Closer Economic Relations treaty.     Alcan New Zealand shareholders who accept the offer would also receive the final dividend of 10 cents a share normally payable on May 27.     Alcan Australia would invite New Zealand representation to its board and would apply to list its shares on the New Zealand Stock exchange, Davis said.  \n',acq
'Aldershot Resources Ltd said it signed an interim agreement to acquire 100 pct of the outstanding shares of Intracoastal Refining Inc of Conroe, Texas.     Aldershot will pay a certain number of shares of common stock based on book value, and up to a maximum of one mln shares under a formula linked to the next five years\' pre-tax net revenues.     The transaction is subject to completion of a definitive agreement and to regulatory approval.  \n',acq
'Allied-Lyons PLC ALLD.L and Canada\'s Reichmann brothers are working well together as partners and currently do not plan any change in their joint ownership of distiller Hiram Walker-Gooderham and Worts, Allied-Lyons chairman Derrick Holden-Brown said.     Allied-Lyons got 51 pct control of Hiram Walker-Gooderham last year for about 600 mln U.S. dlrs, while the Reichmanns\' Gulf Canada Corp acquired 49 pct in an out-of-court pact after a hostile battle for the wine and spirits division of Hiram Walker Resources Ltd.     \"We are getting along very well as partners ... I hope there won\'t be any change, but there could be,\" Holden-Brown told reporters after a speech in Toronto.     He said Allied-Lyons has a two-year call option that could force Gulf Canada to sell its 49 pct stake to Allied-Lyons, and Gulf Canada has a two-year put option that could obligate Allied-Lyons to buy its 49 pct.     \"Both we and Gulf hope very much there will be no occasion for either the put or call to be exercised,\" Holden-Brown said.     In answer to a reporter\'s question, Holden-Brown said it would be possible for Gulf Canada to sell off part of its 49 pct in a public offering with Allied-Lyons\' consent. \"I don\'t think we would have any objection to it,\" he added.     Allied-Lyons maintains control of Hiram Walker-Gooderham\'s board of directors and has total responsibility for its management. \"We cannot contemplate giving up our control,\" he said.     Holden-Brown would not disclose how big a profit contribution the distiller will make in Allied-Lyons\' financial results, but he said \"it will be substantial.\"     \"I am not able to give profit forecasts,\" he said.     Holden-Brown said Allied-Lyons was able to finance the Hiram Walker-Gooderham acquisition with cash and borrowings, and has no current plans for a stock issue.     He said the company is not currently negotiating any more acquisitions in Canada but has a team of officials evaluating possible purchases of wines, spirits, soft drinks or food concerns. \"I don\'t think we shall be looking at the brewery scene (which is) highly concentrated already,\" he added.     Holden-Brown said Allied-Lyons plans to list its shares on Canadian stock exchanges, possibly later this year.                \n',acq
'American Motors Corp AMO management has ordered a hiring freeze in view of Chrysler Corp\'s C 1.5 billion dlr takeover bid, a spokesman for AMC said.     Analysts said the merger is virtually certain to go ahead.     American Motors directors met for five hours Wednesday to review the takeover proposal. \"The board ... Expects to be meeting periodically over the next several weeks on the Chrysler proposal,\" AMC said in its first formal statement since it acknowledged the Chrysler proposal on Monday.     Chrysler, the number three U.S. Automaker, has said the merger is motivated principally by its desire to acquire AMC\'s profitable Jeep business and dealers, as well as a new modern car assembly plant in Bramalea, Ontario.     That means a guaranteed future for much of AMC, but it leaves in question the fate of many of its 19,000-plus employees, according to industry analysts. AMC\'s Toledo, Ohio Jeep plant has 1,850 hourly workers on indefinite layoff while its Kenosha, Wisconsin, car plant has another 2,250 on layoff.  \n',acq
'American Aircraft Corp said it has acquired a 51 pct interest in privately-owned Hunter Helicopter of Nevada Inc for an undisclosed amount of stock.     An American Aircraft official said the company has an option to acquire the remaining 49 pct.     Hunter Helicopter is in the business of building a two passenger helicopter retailing for about 50,000 dlrs each which is certified by the Federal Aviation Administration. The helicopters will be manufactured in American Aircraft\'s Uvalde, Texas, plant, it added.  \n',acq
'American Aircraft Corp said it has acquired a 51 pct interest in privately-held Hunter Helicopter of Nevada, Inc.     The purchase was made for an undisclosed amount of American Aircraft stock, the company said.     It said the acquisition will increase shareholder equity in American Aircraft to 45 cts per share from 18 cts per share.     Hunter Helicopter builds two-passenger helicopters that retail for about 50,000 dlrs.  \n',acq
'American International Petroleum Corp AIPN said it agreed to acquire for one mln dlrs the assets of a western Louisiana oil and gas company. American International would not identify the company.     American said assets included nine leases totalling 2,600 acres, various working interests in 15 oil and gas wells on that property, all equipment and machinery necessary for operation, and a 50 pct interest in a nine-mile gas pipeline.   \n',acq
'American Variety International Inc said its agreement to acquire First National Entertainment Corp has been terminated because First National was not able to fulfill terms of the agreement.     It said due to protracted negotiations with First National, several American Variety divisions were inoperative in 1986.     American Variety said it is reevaluating its record and tape library for possible conversion to compact discs.  \n',acq
'Belgian starch manufacturer Amylum NV is surprised and disappointed that its 675 mln dlr offer for the European business of CPC International Inc CPC.N was apparently rejected in favour of a lower 630 mln dlr bid by Italy\'s Gruppo Ferruzzi, chairman Pierre Callebaut said.     Callebaut tolds that Amylum, a leading starch and isoglucose manufacturer in which Britain\'s Tate and Lyle Plc TATL.L holds a 33.3 pct stake, had made an undisclosed initial takeover offer for CPC\'s European corn wet milling business by the close of CPC\'s tender on March 17.     The offer was raised on March 24 to a final 675 mln dlrs in cash after CPC told Amylum its initial bid was below Ferruzzi\'s 630 mln stg offer, Callebaut said.     On the same day, CPC announced it had agreed in principle to sell its European business to Ferruzzi in a 630 mln dlr deal.     Noting that Ferruzzi was studying a public offering of shares in its unit European Sugar (France) to fund the CPC takeover, Callebaut said Amylum may still succeed in its bid.     \"For the time being we just await developments. But I note that whereas our higher offer was in cash, Ferruzzi apparently is still organising finance,\" Callebaut said.  \n',acq
'CSR Ltd CSRA.S has made a bold move in selling its oil and gas interests for almost a billion dlrs and ploughing 150 mln into its traditional sugar business, share analysts said.     \"It sounds like a good deal,\" Stuart McKibbin of A.C. Goode and Co tolds.     CSR said it had dropped plans to float its oil and gas interests held in the Delhi Australia Fund and would instead sell it to Exxon Corp XON unit Esso Exploration and Production Australia Inc for 985 mln dlrs.     In a twin announcement CSR, already Australia\'s largest sugar refiner, made a 2.20 dlr a share bid for the 70 pct it does not already hold in Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd.     \"This will be a big shock to the market, which was under the impression that CSR was well down the road to floating Delhi,\" McKibbin said.     A float of part of Delhi would have raised between 200 and 300 mln dlrs, but in opting to sell outright, CSR had given itself the cash to practically eliminate its debt and embark on an ambitious expansion programme in its best-performing divisions of sugar and building products, analysts said.     CSR not only gets the 985 mln dlrs but also has the right to share equally with Esso any higher returns resulting from an oil price over 20 U.S. Dlrs a barrel in the next two years.     Delhi is one of Australia\'s largest onshore oil producers yielding about six mln barrels a year from the Cooper Basin. Analysts said the deal could net CSR as much as three mln dlrs for every dollar rise in the oil price above 20 dlrs.     Neale Goldston-Morris of Sydney broker Bain and Co Ltd said the move out of Delhi and investment in the sugar industry was a sensible one but added that it represented the loss of Australian-owned assets to a foreign company.     \"The farm they bought back a few years ago is being sold back to the Americans,\" Goldston-Morris said.     The Pioneer Sugar investment would make CSR by far the largest player in Australia\'s 850 mln dlr a year sugar industry and would give it access to some of the best sugar properties and mills in the country, analysts said.     They said Pioneer Sugar was expected to recommend acceptance of the bid through which CSR would benefit from the bottom out of a cyclical downturn in sugar prices.     Sugar prices are forecast to rise to 340 dlrs a tonne next season from an estimated 270 dlrs this year, they said.     Selling Delhi meant CSR has finally quit a damaging investment, made in 1981, which has dragged down the company\'s overall performance, analysts said.     CSR last year wrote off more than 550 mln dlrs in losses on what had been a 591 mln U.S. Dlr investment financed entirely from U.S. Dollar debt, they said.     \"It was a bad investment for them. They financed it entirely with debt, the currency collapsed on them and then the oil price collapsed on them,\" Owen Evans of Sydney broker Meares and Philips Ltd said.     Esso not only picked up Delhi\'s oil and gas output but also gained as much as 300 mln dlrs in transferable tax losses accumulated in exploration allowances and other concessions.     Analysts said Esso also gained its first real onshore stake in Australia in its first major diversification from the 50/50 Bass Strait partnership with The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd BRKN.S.     \"Esso has been very keen to diversify from the Gippsland Basin. They haven\'t found too much oil in Bass Strait lately and Esso needed a large pool of ongoing production,\" Goldston-Morris said.  \n',acq
'Atlantic Richfield Co said it sold its Plan Cell Research Institute unit and its Arco Seed Co operations in two transactions for undisclosed prices.     The company said it sold Dublin, Calif.-based Plant Cell Research to Montedision SpA of Milan, Italy, and ARCO Seed Co to U.F. Genetics of Hollister, Calif.     Atlantic Richfield said the divestitures are in line with its policy of focusing resources on oil, gas, chemical and coal operations.  \n',acq
'Food and drink retailer Argyll Group Plc AYLL.L said it has agreed to sell its U.K. Subsidiary George Morton Ltd to Seagram United Kingdom Ltd for about 14 mln stg in cash.     The consideration for Morton\'s fixed assets, stocks, debtors and goodwill is payable on completion of the sale. The disposal will bring Argyll an extraordinary credit of some 8.4 mln stg.     Argyll added the agreements also depend on an indication from the U.K. Office of Fair Trading by June 23 that the sale will not be referred to the Monopolies Commission. Argyll shares were up 12p to 440, firming before the announcement.  \n',acq
'Ariadne group unit Barwon Farmlands Ltd confirmed it offered 3.8 billion pesos in cash for the 38 mln shares of Philippine brewing company San Miguel Corp.     The Australia-based Barwon, 30 pct owned by New Zealander Bruce Judge\'s Ariadne group, said in a statement released in Hong Kong that a formal offer had been made to the Philippines government, which holds the shares.     It said it was confident the offer will be reviewed favourably.     Newspapers in Manila and Hong Kong reported at the weekend that an offer had been made.     Barwon said it was represented by Australian stockbroker Jacksons Ltd, which forwarded a formal offer to Philippine President Corazon Aquino of 100 pesos for each of the 38.1 mln A and B shares of San Miguel.     The Philippine government seized the shares, which represent a 31 pct stake in the brewery firm, from the United Coconut Planters Bank, alleged by the government to be linked with the country\'s deposed President Ferdinand Marcos.     The Barwon statement said a deal is expected to be concluded between Barwon and the Philippines government in 14 days.     Barwon also said it made recommendations to the government on how it could purchase the class A shares, which can only be held by a Philippine national or a firm which is at least 60 pct held by a member of the country. It did not elaborate.     The Hong Kong Economical Journal quoted a spokesman of Jacksons as saying Barwon plans to set up a branch in the Philippines to meet the criteria.     San Miguel Brewery Ltd, a locally listed firm 69.65 pct held by San Miguel\'s Neptunia Corp affiliate, was last traded at 16.30 H.K. Dlrs against 15.50 dlrs on Friday.  \n',acq
'Asbestec Industries Inc said it signed a letter of intent to buy asbestos abatement contractor P.W. Stephens for three mln dlrs in cash, stock and notes.     The transaction is expected to be completed early in the third quarter of its fiscal year ending September 30, 1987.     Asbestec also said it expects to sign March six a 900,000 dlr contract to remove asbestos from a major apartment complex in Washington, D.C. The project is scheduled to begin on March nine.  \n',acq
'Northern Star Holdings Ltd said Britain\'s Associated Newspapers Holdings Plc will hold 9.99 pct of its enlarged issued capital after applying to acquire 15.9 mln shares in its recently announced placement.     Associated was one of the major investors participating in the previously reported placement of 128.9 mln shares at 3.75 dlrs each, Northern Star said in a statement.     The northern New South Wales regional group is emerging as a national media force in the wake of the industry restructuring sparked by the News Corp Ltd NCPA.S takeover of the Herald and Weekly Times Ltd HWTA.S group.     Associated now holds 3.3 pct of Northern Star\'s current issued capital, a company official said.     As previously reported, Northern Star is raising 623 mln dlrs through placements and a subsequent one-for-four rights issue at 2.95 dlrs a share.     Of the placements, 56.9 mln shares will go to a number of investors and 72 mln to investment group Westfield Capital Corp Ltd, which arranged Northern Star\'s purchase of News Corp\'s television assets, three newspapers and three radio stations for 842 mln dlrs. Westfield will increase its stake in Northern Star to about 45 pct from 20 as a result.  \n',acq
'American Telephone and Telegraph Co and Philips Telecommunications BV (APT) would hold 36 pct through direct and indirect holdings in France\'s Cie Generale de Constructions Telephoniques if a joint bid with French partners for the soon-to-be-privatised firm succeeds, a director at one of the partner firms said.     Marc Mathieu of Societe Anonyme de Telecommunications SAT, told journalists the bid foresaw a direct stake of 20 pct for APT, the joint firm set up by the U.S.\'s ATT T.N. and the NV Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken PGLO.AS.     The other 80 pct would be owned by a holding company made up of SAT, APT, Cie du Midi MCDP.PA and five mutual funds.    Under French law, foreign investors are restricted to a 20 pct direct stake in privatised companies but can boost their stake to 40 pct through indirect holdings.     The make-up of the holding company, however, is subject to close discussions within the government due to legal queries over the nationality of the mutual funds, a Finance Ministry official said.     Although bought by French citizens they are managed by foreign banks Morgan Guaranty Trust Co of New York and Banque de Neuflize, Schlumberger, Mallet SA, controlled by Algemene Bank Nederland NV ABNN.AS, an SAT spokesman said.     CGCT, which controls 16 pct of the French public telephone switching market, is to be sold by the government for 500 mln francs by private tender.     Five groups are bidding for the company and the government has said it will choose CGCT\'s new owner by the end of April.     APT vice-president Wim Huisman told a news conference a capital increase was envisaged if SAT-APT wins CGCT, but declined to give details or say how an increase would affect foreign stakes in CGCT.     In 1985, CGCT posted losses of 200 mln francs on sales of three billion after 1984 losses of 997 mln francs.     A joint SAT-APT statement added that buyers were committed to investing 240 mln francs in CGCT research and production plants. The APT-SAT offer includes a provision for CGCT to produce APT 5ESS-PRX switching technology and adapt it to French standards.     The tender was launched after a 1985 draft agreement for ATT to take over CGCT was abandoned following the introduction of the French government privatisation laws which reopened bidding among a wider range of applicants.     Other candidacies to take over CGCT include West Germany\'s Siemens AG SIEG.F allied with Schneider SA SCHN.PA subsidiary Jeumont-Schneider, Sweden\'s Telefon AB LM Ericsson ERIC.ST allied with Matra MATR.PA and Bouygues SA BOUY.PA, Italy\'s Italtel, and Canada\'s Northern Telecom Ltd NTL.TO.  \n',acq
'The Australian Gas Light Co (AGL) said it will offer one share plus one dlr cash for every two shares in oil and gas producer TMOC Resources Ltd in a counter-bid to the previously reported takeover offer by Santos Ltd STOS.S.     The offer values TMOC shares at 4.75 dlrs each, based on AGL\'s closing price of 8.50 dlrs on Friday. TMOC shares jumped to 4.60 dlrs on the announcement from its Friday closing price of 4.15.     The AGL offer, the third to be made for TMOC this year, compares with the Santos cash offer of 4.00 dlrs a share.     Based on TMOC\'s issued capital of 62.08 mln shares, the AGL offer values the entire company at 249.9 mln shares.     AGL said in a statement that it already holds 10.5 pct of TMOC\'s issued capital. This compares with the Santos stake of 3.1 pct when it announced its bid in March 23.     Elders Resources Ltd began the auction for TMOC about three months ago with an unsuccessful 2.55 dlrs a share on-market offer that has since lapsed.     AGL said its offer is above the upper end of the range of values placed on TMOC by its advisers in the company\'s response urging rejection of the Elders Resources bid.     AGL said it will make the same offer for TMOC\'s convertible notes. Accepting share and note holders will participate in AGL\'s planned one-for-one bonus issue.     It said TMOC is already a partner with AGL in the Alice Springs to Darwin gas pipeline and has a number of businesses complementary with those of AGL.     AGL is the New South Wales natural gas utility while TMOC has extensive onshore holdings, mainly in Queensland where it owns the Moonie oil field and in the Northern Territory where it operates and holds 43.75 of the Mereenie oil-gas field. It also has interests in a number of gas or oil pipelines.  \n',acq
'Diversified investment company, Ariadne Australia Ltd, has offered 3.8 billion pesos for 38 mln shares in the Philippine brewing firm San Miguel, a Manila newspaper reported.     The Sunday Times quoted a letter sent yesterday to President Corazon Aquino from Ariadne\'s chairman, New Zealander Bruce Judge, that he was offering cash equivalent to five pct of the nation\'s yearly budget to buy the shares from the government.     The presidential office and Ariadne representatives in Manila were not available for comment on the report.     The shares are the entire block seized by the government from the United Coconut Planters Bank (UCPB) on suspicion that the real owner was Eduardo Cojuangco, the former chairman of San Miguel and UCPB and a close associate of deposed president Ferdinand Marcos.     The 38 mln shares consist of 24 mln class A stock and 14 mln class B shares.     Government officials have said earlier that the more valuable class A shares would not be sold to foreigners.     The offer values each share at 100 pesos -- the price at which the Philippine Social Security System suggested it might buy eight mln class A shares last week.     \"Judge\'s offer of 3.8 billion pesos is about five pct of the Philippines\' yearly budget,\" Ariadne\'s Philippine agent Domingo Panganiban was quoted as telling reporters yesterday.     \"Mr Judge\'s objective in this investment is to make his corporation\'s management expertise available to San Miguel so that the company\'s assets can be fully utilised.\"     San Miguel, the country\'s largest brewer, is also one of the major manufacturers of grocery lines.     Panganiban is quoted as saying that San Miguel could tap food and liquor distribution lines in Australia, Britain, the U.S., New Zealand and Hong Kong through Barwon Farmlands Ltd, a listed Australian firm in which it has 30 pct equity.     Ariadne, with about one billion dlrs in assets and turnover of about two billion, has interests also in mining, real estate and agricultural products.  \n',acq
'The Australia based Ariadne Australia Ltd, plans to set up a branch in the Philippines to fulfill a prerequisite for the takeover of the Philippine brewing firm, San Miguel Corp, a Hong Kong newspaper said.     The Hong Kong Economic Journal quoted a spokesman of Australian stock broker Jacksons Ltd as saying that Barwon Farmlands Ltd, a listed Australian firm of which Ariadne owns a 30 pct stake, is planning a branch in the Philippines.     He added Jacksons is arranging an offer by Barwon to pay a total 3.8 billion pesos in cash for 38 mln San Miguel shares.     Barwon is offering 100 pesos each for 24 mln class A San Miguel shares and 14 mln class B stock. But the Jacksons spokesman noted that the more valuable A stock would only be sold to Filipinos or companies registered in the Philippines.     He said Barwon has approached the Philippine government which seized the block of shares from the United Coconut Planters Bank, which is believed to be linked with the country\'s deposed President Ferdinand Marcos.     He added he expects a deal to be concluded between Barwon and the Philippine Government in 14 days as it is the only offer in cash, the newspaper reported.     Hong Kong Economic Journal also noted stock market rumours that Neptunia Corp, a Hong Kong registered company which controlled by San Miguel\'s president Andres Soriano, is the other party keen on the block of San Miguel shares.     The Philippine\'s Commission on Good Government ruled last May against a move of Neptunia to acquire 33 mln San Miguel shares controlled by the brewery firm\'s former chairman Eduardo Cojuangco, who is also chairman of United Coconut.     Commissioner Ramon Diaz said at the time the government would not allow a subsidiary to buy into a parent firm, adding San Miguel could have offered the shares to other parties.     The Manila newspaper Sunday Times published a letter sent yesterday to President Corazon Aquino from Ariadne\'s chairman, New Zealander Bruce Judge, that he was offering cash equivalent to five pct of the nation\'s yearly budget to buy the shares from the government.     \"Judge\'s offer of 3.8 billion pesos is about five pct of the Philippines\' yearly budget,\" Ariadne\'s Philippine agent Domingo Panganiban was quoted as telling reporters yesterday.     Spokesmen of Ariadne, Jacksons and Neptunia were not available for comment, nor any officials of the Philippines.     San Miguel Brewery Ltd, a Hong Kong listed company which is 69.65 pct held by Neptunia on behalf of San Miguel Corp, closed 40 cents higher at 15.50 H.K. Dlrs on Friday.  \n',acq
'AVAQ International Inc said it intends to require Gates Learjet Corp GLJ to honor its agreement to sell its shares to the company.     AVAQ said it made the statement in response to an offer by Interconnect Capital Corp for all of Gates Learjet shares after what it believed to be an agreement by Gates to accept its offer.     AVAQ said it offered, pusuant to Gates\' guidelines, six dlrs per share, plus the purchase of Gates Corp\'s promisary note for 23 mln dlrs.     Interconnect said it offered 7.07 dlrs per share, plus the repurchase of the loan for 13 mlns, for an aggregate price in the 95 mln dlr range. Interconnect said it made the offer to the board of directors of Gates Learjet on March 9.     AVAQ said Gates Corp and Gates Learjet approved its offer Feb 26.  \n',acq
'Avia Group International Inc  stockholders filed a class a action suit in Multnomah County Circuit court seeking to halt the sale of Avia to Reebok International Ltd RBOK.     Avia stockholders also seek to receive compensation from the defendants, who include most of Avia directors, according to court papers.     The suit grew out a meeting of several dozen dissatisfied minority stockholders of Avia following the announcement of Reebok\'s proposed acquisition of Avia and the sudden drop in the price of Avia stock.     The complaint was filed on behalf of Clem Eischen, a Portland-area resident, who owns 500 shares of Avia, and Robert Withers, also of the Portland-area, who owns 954 shares, and other individuals who held stock at the time of Reebok\'s announcement. A jury trial has been requested.     \"The actions of the small group that contral Avia have hurt the little guy,\" said Eischen.     The stockholders, according to a statement, have organized a steering committee.     The complaint reviews the price action of Avia stock from March 1986 and noted the plaintifs who purchased stock between 19 dlrs and 25 dlrs per share. The price fell from 24 dlrs to 16.50 dlrs a share following the Reebok announcement.     The complaint asked the defendants be enjoined from proceeding with the Reebok acquisition of Avia. It also requests damages to be determined at the time of trial.     Avia said it had not seen the court papers and said it had no comment on the suit.  \n',acq
'Azure Ventures Ltd said it signed a letter of intent to acquire John Paul Richards and Associates Inc.     The company said if the merger is approved by shareholders of both companies, the shareholders of John Paul Richards would become majority shareholders, owning 60 pct of the common stock, of the new public company.  \n',acq
'Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige has asked the White House to consider blocking the planned Japanese acquisition of a major U.S. supercomputer and semiconductor manufacturer for national security reasons, U.S. officials said.     The officials, who asked not to be named, said yesterday that Baldrige has \"serious concerns\" about the sale of Fairchild Semiconductor Corp. to Fujitsu Ltd., another major electronics firm.     The officials tolds that if the sale went through it could leave the U.S. military overly dependent on a foreign /ompany for vital high technology equipment used in its advanced missiles, aircraft electronics and intelligence gathering.     In addition, they said, the sale would also worsen the already strained trade relations between the U.S. and Japan stemming from the huge Japanese surplus.     The White House Economic Policy Council would consider the sale in the coming weeks, they said.     Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger\'s position was not immediately known but in the past he has opposed the transfer of high technology to foreign governments and companies.     Supercomputers made by Fairchild and other U.S. manufacturers are widely used throughout the world, but none have been sold to the Japanese government or to Japanese government-run agencies and universities.  \n',acq
'Banco Santander signed a letter of intent with Bank of America BAC to purchase its West German affiliate Bankhaus Centrale Credit AG, CC-Bank, the bank said in a statement amplifying an earlier report from Frankfurt.     \"The incorporation of CC-Bank in our group will provide a major boost...For chanelling investment between Spain and the European Community,\" the statement said.     \"This operation enables us to take up a solid position in West Germany ahead of Spain\'s full integration into the EC\'s financial system in five years\' time.\"     The deal included the license for Visa credit cards.  \n',acq
'Bank of China has taken a stake in Luxembourg-based finance company BAII Holdings SA, a spokesman for BAII said.     The stake was between three and five pct but no further details of the deal, which was announced simultaneously in Paris, London and Hong Kong, were immediately available.     BAII, which is 50 pct Arab owned, is looking to expand its activities in the Far East and recently established a wholly-owned merchant banking subsidiary in Hong Kong, the spokesman said.     The group had earnings of 15.4 mln dlrs in 1985.  \n',acq
'Bayou International Ltd said it purchased one-third of the outstanding stock of Solmecs Corp N.V., a Netherlands Antilles corporation, for 1,750,000 dlrs.     Bayou said it will also receive two seats on Solmecs\' board.     Bayou Ltd is 55.2 pct owned by Australia Wide Industries Ltd.     Solmecs develops technology relating to energy conversion.  \n',acq
'Bayou International Ltd said it acquired 19.9 pct of Amalgamated Equities Ltd of Australia for 710,000 dlrs.     Bayou is 55.2 pct owned by Australia Wide Industries Ltd.  \n',acq
'BCI Holdings Corp  said its Beatrice U.S. Food Corp retained Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc to assist in the sale of its national bottled water business.     It said products of the subsidiary, based in Monterey Park, Calif., are sold under the Arrowhead brand name in California and Arizona, the Ozarka name in Texas and the Great Bear name in 11 northeastern states.  \n',acq
'French sugar group Beghin-Say, which is 49.6 pct owned by Italy\'s Gruppo Ferruzzi, is to raise its capital to 703 mln francs from 527 mln through a three-for-one issue of shares and investment certificates to finance expansion, president Jean-Marc Vernes told analysts.     For the first stage Beghin-Say will issue some 2.05 mln new 65 franc shares at 500 francs to increase capital to 660 mln francs. The share currently trades at 734 francs. Then 658,000 new 65 franc investment certificates will be issued at 400 francs, raising capital to 703 mln francs.     The capital increase will bring the group around 1.2 billion francs in new funds to finance its expansion plans. These include the possible acquisition of the Corn Products maize starch plant at Haubourdin in northern France, Vernes said.     Ferruzzi is one of several groups bidding to buy all of Corn Products\' installations in Europe. Apart from the French plant, these include three factories in each of Italy and West Germany, two in Britain and Spain and one in the Netherlands and Denmark.     Corn Products has put a 650 mln dlr price tag on the installations, and Beghin-Say estimates that acquisition of the Haubourdin plant would cost between 80 and 100 mln dlrs, Vernes said.     If this bid fails, Beghin-Say would consider acquiring and developing two other French plants, either in the maize or wheat starch sector.     Beghin-Say is also planning to finance European expansion for its Kaysersberg subsidiary, another major reason for its capital increase.     Kaysersberg, which was transformed from a division of Beghin-Say into a fully-fledged chemical subsidiary last year, has been holding talks with other European companies on possible accords, Vernes said. He added the company could be introduced onto the Paris Bourse in the near future.  \n',acq
'Belgian Budget Minister Guy Verhofstadt has proposed a plan to sell off shares in several state-owned enterprises, including national airline Sabena and the postal and telecommunications authority, government sources said.     They said the plan could raise more than 25 billion francs in revenue over the next five years according to Verhofstadt\'s projections, helping the government to reduce its huge budget deficit, targetted this year at 418 billion francs.     But the scheme had received a guarded reception from the Social Christian parties in Belgium\'s centre-right coalition when Verhofstadt unveiled it at a cabinet meeting yesterday.     Discussion of the plan was likely to be long and difficult, the sources said.     Verhofstadt proposes beginning the selloffs in the last quarter of 1987, with the sale of 30 to 40 pct of state investment company SNI. He expects the sale to raise three billion francs, they added.     A 25 pct share in Sabena would be sold in mid-1989 for 1.5 billion francs, while 50 pct of the postal and telecommunications authority would be sold off in two stages in mid-1990 and early 1992, raising at least seven billion francs.     Also on Verhofstadt\'s list are the Maritime Transport Authority, leading gas distributor Distrigaz, CGER savings bank, CGER, and several other credit institutions.     Le Soir daily quoted CGER vice-president Paul Henrion as expressing strong opposition to the privatisation of his bank.     \"Public company we are and public company we wish to stay,\" Henrion told the paper.  \n',acq
'A Belgian finance ministry spokesman said new rules planned on insider trading would enable offenders to be fined and imprisoned for up to a year, and be compelled to forfeit gains.     The new rules require parliamentary approval, and government sources said it was unclear when they would come into force. Insider trading is currently not an offence in this country.     The cabinet approved a separate bill that analysts said includes provisions to make more difficult the build-up of major new stakes in Belgian companies.     The bill would make obligatory the declaration of major stakes in companies quoted on the bourse with own resources of more than 200 mln francs.     The Minister for Economic Affairs would need to be informed in advance of deals under which foreign interests planned to buy a new stake of more than ten pct of the voting shares in a large Belgian company, or to increase an existing stake to more than 20 pct.  \n',acq
'Bell Resources Ltd said it has executed an underwriting agreement with Equiticorp Tasman Ltd to acquire 57.6 mln ordinary shares in The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd BRKN.S for 540 mln dlrs.     Bell said in a statement that it now holds 29.93 pct of BHP\'s 1.2 billion shares.  \n',acq
'Benetton SpA of Italy expects to further diversify into financial services and is weighing  possible acquisitions, a Benetton spokeswoman here said.     \"We are thinking of diversification outside of the retail line,\" the spokeswoman said. \"We are looking at financial services and other manfacturing companies.\"     However, she said the company was not targeting the U.S. for its planned expansion, but was looking at a number of different countries.     The company\'s shares are traded in the U.S. as American Depository Receipts, which were issued through an offering by Morgan Stanley Group Inc MS earlier this month.     Benetton is now holding talks with Wall Street firms about the possibility of receiving a quotation of its shares on the New York Stock Exchange. \"There\'s absolutely no timetable. It may not even happen,\" the spokeswoman said.     She also denied reports that the company was considering an issue of convertible bonds with warrants in the U.S. \"We\'re not thinking of issuing bonds,\" she said.     In line with its planned Global expansion efforts, Benetton is also holding talks with the Soviet Union to explore the possibility of opening up to 150 stores in the country. But the spokeswoman pointed out that many companies are holding talks with the Soviets.     \"We are in discussions and are looking forward to some response,\" she said. She added the company had no firm timetable on when a response might be received.   \n',acq
'Bevis Industries Inc said it retained Tucker Anthony and R.L. Day Inc to seek purchasers of the company or its units.     It issued no further details.     The company, which makes stainless steel tubing for the chemical, petrochemical, and oil industries, earned 1,045,000 dlrs or 51 cts a share in the nine months ending September 30, 1986. It had sales of 17.1 mln dlrs in the period.  \n',acq
'The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd BRKN.S said it will merge its BHP Minerals division and Utah International Inc into a single business unit under a common management structure.     The merger will be effective June 1, coinciding with the retirement of Utah International chairman and chief executive Bud Wilson, BHP said in a statement.     The new BHP-Utah Minerals International Group will be headed by Jim Curry as executive general manager and chief executive officer. Curry is currently executive vice-president of Utah International, BHP said.     BHP Petroleum (Americas) Inc, formerly part of Utah International, will become a subsidiary of BHP\'s renamed BHP Petroleum International, now BHP Petroleum Pty Ltd, the company said.     BHP will also bring its Queensland coal operations under one management structure and consolidate minerals marketing and sales offices in various markets throughout the world.     BHP acquired Utah from General Electric Co GE in 1984.     Utah\'s assets include stakes of 40.25 to 52.25 pct in seven large Central Queensland coking mines, 49 pct of the Samarco iron ore operation in Brazil, 60 pct of La Escondida copper deposit in Chile, the Island Copper mine at Port Hardy in Canada, 70 pct of a coal mine and 30 pct of a gold mine in South Africa and coal and other mines in the U.S.     BHP Minerals\' assets include wholly and partly-owned iron ore mines, coal mines, manganese and base-metal operations or prospects and 30 pct of the Ok Tedi gold-copper project in Papua New Guinea.  \n',acq
'Black Hawk Mining Inc said it knows of \"no major activities\" to account for the recent rise in the company\'s stock price.     The shares rose 11 cts to 88 cts on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday.     The company added that its application for its proposed acquisition of Platinova Resources Ltd and financings are still before the listing committee of the stock exchange.  \n',acq
'BOC Group Inc\'s Airco Distributor Gases finalized the sale of its Virginia-based gas appaturs business to Controls Corp of America, a newly formed investment group organized by former Airco employees.     Under the terms of the sale, Airco said Controls will continue to make the gas apparaturs product line under the Airco brand name, marketing the products exclusively through the Airco\'s distributor network.  \n',acq
'Swedish mining and metals group Boliden AB BLDS.ST said the takeover of the U.S. Allis-Chalmers Corp\'s AH.O mining machinery division made it the world\'s leading maker of such equipment.     President Kjell Nilsson, announcing the 600 mln crown deal, told a news conference Boliden would now become a truly international concern with operations in Brazil, Chile and other big minerals-producing nations.     He said the Allis-Chalmers\' division, accounting for some 50 pct of the U.S. Group\'s sales, would fit in well into Boliden.  \n',acq
'Swedish mining and metals group Boliden AB said it would buy the mining equipment operations of the U.S. Allis-Chalmers Corp, amounting to more than 50 pct of group sales, for 600 mln crowns.     Boliden president Kjell Nilsson told a news conference the acquisition of the Allis-Chalmers unit, which he described as the world\'s leading producer of equipment for the mineral processing industry, would yield positive synergy effects for Boliden mining, metals and engineering operations.     Nilsson said the takeover will provide opportunities to cooperate with the mining and materials handling operations of Boliden\'s parent company, Trelleborg AB.     He said Allis-Chalmers was selling out because it needed new cash after suffering big losses in its farm equipment operation.     The deal is subject to approval by Allis-Chalmers\' annual meeting, company officials said.  \n',acq
'Boliden AB BLDS ST mining and metals group said it will announce a major foreign corporate takeover today involving a company with an annual turnover of two billion crowns.     A Boliden spokesman tolds details of the announcement would be given at a news conference by chairman Rune Andersson at 1030 gmt today. He said the company involved employed 4,000 people, but declined to name the takeover price or say what field the firm operated in.     Share analysts said they expected Boliden to announce it will be taking over the U.S. Allis-Chalmers Corp AH.O but company officials refused to confirm the reports ahead of the news conference.  \n',acq
'Bond Corp Holdings Ltd BONA.S said it has completed the 1.05 billion dlr purchase of the electronic media interests of unlisted Consolidated Press Holdings Ltd.     The new company Bond Media Ltd now holds the television, broadcasting and associated businesses previously held by Kerry Packer\'s Consolidated, Bond Corp said in a statement.     Packer, who made the sale in January, will be a director of Bond Media. As previously reported, Bond Media will be publicly floated with a rights issue to Bond Corp shareholders. Bond Media will be 50 pct owned by Bond Corp and is expected to be listed by the end of May, it said.  \n',acq
'Bond Corp Holdings Ltd  BONA.S of Australia said it had no comment on an article in a London evening newspaper speculating on its plans for a bid approach to U.K. dDrinks and food giant Allied Lyons Plc ALLD.L.     Tony Oates, Bond Corp\'s Executive Director for Finance and Administration, said \"The company does not comment on market rumors or press conjecture.\" He added in all instances of this kind problems are likely to arise whatever is said.     Allied\'s shares were 3p up at 401p, which values the company at around 2.75 billion stg.     London stock market analysts specializing in brewery shares viewed a bid from Bond, which they said has assets of around two billion stg, as highly unlikely.     They added that rumours of a possible bid for Allied have surfaced from time to time in the press and the London equity market ever since last year\'s thwarted approach from Elders IXL Ltd ELXA.S of Australia.  \n',acq
'Bond Corp International Ltd, a subsidiary of the Australian-based Bond Corp Holdings Ltd BONA.S, said it would defer its planned rights issue but still wants the issue to be made before July 31.     No date has been set for the issue, announced in January.     In a document to shareholders, Bond Corp said the delay follows its receipt of a 240 mln H.K. Dlr loan from its parent company to meet the first payment on the newly acquired Bond Centre commercial complex in central Hong Kong.     It also wants outside partners to take up to 50 pct in the project, the company said.     The January announcement said the rights issue would finance Bond Corp\'s 1.4 billion dlr acquisition of a 23.77 pct stake in HK-TVB Ltd TVBH.HK from film magnate Run Run Shaw.     The company then reached an agreement with a consortium led by Sino Land Co Ltd SINO.HK to buy a commercial complex that is still under construction for 1.9 billion dlrs.     Bond International said in the document that except for the 240 mln dlr loan, the deal would be financed from internal resources and by selling an interest in the building.     The payments must be completed by the end of 1987.     Bond International has also sold several residential buildings in Hong Kong\'s mid-levels district for a total of 68.35 mln dlrs, the statement said.     The flats were among the properties it bought last year from Hongkong Land Co Ltd HKLD.HK for 1.4 billion dlrs.     Analysts said Bond International is heavily geared as it has relied on bank borrowings to purchase both the Hongkong Land properties and the HK-TVB shares.     Bond International also said in the document that while it plans to sell an interest in the complex it will hold the HK-TVB shares as a long-term investment.  \n',acq
'Borealis Exploration Ltd said it entered into an agreement with Faraway Gold Mines Ltd of Vancouver, British Columbia, under which Faraway will acquire an interest in Borealis\'s Whale Cove Gold Property in the Keewatin district of the Northwest Territories.     Faraway will spend 1.5 mln dlrs on exploration over three years and will hold 50 pct of the property until all expenses are paid out, when the interest will drop to 40 pct.     Also, Borealis and Faraway will issue treasury shares to each other and Faraway will buy 575,000 Borealis shares from Borealis president Lorne Spence.  \n',acq
'British Petroleum Co Plc BP.L said it intended to make a tender offer for the 45 pct of Standard Oil Co SRD.N it does not already own at 70 dlrs a share cash, for a total of 7.4 billion if the offer is fully accepted.     The offer would be made through its BP North America Inc unit and was intended to commence not later than April 1. The offer would not be conditional on any minimum number of shares being tendered.     BP said in a statement the 70 dlr a share price was based on its own valuation as well as those of its financial advisers. It took into account reviews of both public and non-public information.     Standard closed in New York last night at 64-7/8 dlrs, down 1-3/4 dlrs.     BP shares dropped on the announcement to 877p from 888p at last night\'s close.     About a third of the cash payable would be met from BP\'s own resources.     The remainder would come from new borrowings, partly from banks under a four-year committed revolving credit facility and partly from a a new U.S. Dlr commercial paper programme. The company said it was in the course of arranging these facilities.     BP Chairman Sir Peter Walters said that the group\'s investment in Standard was its largest single asset. Full ownership would enable investment and operating decisions to be made without the limitations of a minority interest.     BP also believed the acquisition represented the optimum use of its financial resources. It was confident oil prices were likely to remain within a range sufficient to justify the investment.     Walters added that it also felt that, due to management changes in 1986, Standard could now operate successfully even in a lower oil price environment.     Standard\'s net assets at end-1986 were 7.02 billion dlrs and in the year it reported a loss of 1.08 billion dlrs before tax and before an extraordinary item of 608 mln dlrs.     Analysts said that the move by BP had come as a surprise. One noted that it was not immediately clear why the group should spend so much money buying a company it already controlled.     BP could also have bought up the remainder of Standard shares considerably cheaper had it moved six months ago.     It was also unclear what effect the tender would have on the U.K. Government\'s recent announcement that it intended to dispose of its remaining 31.7 pct stake in BP sometime in the 1987/88 financial year, analysts said.     Analyst Paul Spedding of brokers Kleinwort Grieveson noted that any effect on the government sale of its stake in BP would depend on the reaction of the markets.     The deal would probably push BP\'s gearing up to around 59 pct from 20 pct currently, he said.     However, with the likelihood that oil prices would not repeat last year\'s rapid drop the prospects for Standard returning to profitability this year -- and BP benefitting from its cash flow -- were good.     Standard was a high cost oil producer, the analysts noted.     Spedding noted that it needed about 12 dlrs a barrel to make money, and at about 15 dlrs a barrel revenue from production and its downstream activities would push it comfortably into surplus.     BP initially took a stake in Standard following the discovery of oil in Alaska\'s Prudhoe bay in 1969. BP had inadequate distribution facilities in the U.S. While Standard, which was strong on marketing and refining, was short on crude oil.     The analysts said that BP had promoted a major management reorganisation of Standard in the past year.     The probability that much of the shake-up at Standard was now complete was one possible factor behind the timing of the tender offer, Spedding said.     BP\'s willingness to take hard decisions such as major balance sheet write offs and the sale of assets had been well received in the markets.     The lower costs that should now be possible -- especially after the rationalisation of the loss making minerals division -- should allow the benefits of an oil price recovery to come straight through to 1987 profits without being cut back by other sectors.  \n',acq
'BP International and BP North America are seeking a five billion dlr, four year syndicated credit facility in support of British Petroleum Co Plc\'s tender offer for the 45 pct of Standard Oil Co it does not already own, Morgan Guaranty Trust Co of New York said as arranger.     The facility, to be guaranteed by British Petroleum Co Plc BP.L is probably the largest credit facility ever arranged in Europe, bond analysts said. Full terms will be announced either later today or tomorrow morning. BP said earlier it planned a tender offer for the 45 pct of Standard it does not already own for 70 dlrs a share cash.     The financing being arranged by Morgan Guaranty will take the form of a fully committed revolving credit. As announced earlier, BP also is arranging a U.S. Commercial paper program in connection with the tender and part of the revolver will be used to support that program.     The exact size of the U.S. Program has not been decided and the dealers have not yet been chosen.     The credit facility will also allow the borrower to issue cash advances with maturities of one, three or six months through a tender panel, which will be comprised of banks committed to the facility.     Despite the unprecedented size of this euromarket facility, Morgan Guaranty said that it was being syndicated only among BP\'s relationship banks.     As a result, banks were being offered lead manager status at 200 mln dlrs, co-lead management at 125 mln and manager at 75 mln.     Although pricing on many credit facilities has become extremely fine in recent years because of the keen competition to win mandates, Morgan Guaranty said banks would be compensated fairly since this is a special purpose facility which must be completed quickly, with signing expected in about 10 days.  \n',acq
'Brierley Investments Ltd, (BIL), said its offer of 4.20 N.Z. Dlrs per share for supermarket group Progressive Enterprises Ltd still stands, although Rainbow Corp Ltd said today it has 52 pct of Progressive.     BIL said in a statement it will review events on a daily basis.     Rainbow announced earlier that it had increased its stake in Progressive to 52 pct from 44 pct through the purchase of 9.4 mln shares at between 3.80 and 4.80 N.Z. Dlrs per share.     BIL chief executive Paul Collins said: \"All Rainbow has done is to outlay a substantial amount of cash to purchase shares from parties who presumably were supportive of the merger.\"     Rainbow has proposed a merger with Progressive to form a new company, Astral Pacific Corp Ltd. Under the merger, shareholders in both Progressive and Rainbow will be issued shares in the new company on a one-for-one basis.     \"Quite simply, Rainbow should now bid for the balance of Progressive Enterprises at 4.80 N.Z. Dlrs per share,\" Collins said.  \n',acq
'British Aerospace Plc BAEL.L said it has increased its stake in Systems Designers Plc to 22.1 pct or 25.46 mln ordinary shares following the purchase of 10.45 mln ordinary shares.     The British Aerospace Pension Fund holds 2.15 mln ordinary shares in Systems, representing a stake of 1.9 pct.     A spokesman for British Aerospace said it has no present or future intention of making a full bid for Systems Designers. System Designers shares were nine pence higher at 100 prior to the share stake announcement, and have showed little movement since.  \n',acq
'Broker\'s Choice Capital Inc said it signed a letter of intent to buy Rubbertech Inc.     If approved by shareholders, Broker\'s Choice will issue about 71 mln shares of authorized, but unissued shares of restricted common stock to Rubbertech Inc.  \n',acq
'Bryson Oil and Gas Plc said it paid a cash consideration of around 5.4 mln dlrs for about 8.6 pct of Cenergy Corp, a U.S. Oil and gas exploration and production company.     Bryson said its board has been considering a number of possible investments to expand the company\'s interests and believes the opportunity to acquire an investment in Cenergy provides a suitable extension to its existing U.S. Interests.     Cenergy reported a net loss of 7.27 mln dlrs in the nine months to September 30, 1986 while total stockholders equity on the same date was 40.72 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'BTR Nylex Ltd said it will increase its takeover offer for Borg-Warner Corp\'s BOR listed unit, Borg-Warner (Australia) Ltd (BWA) to five dlrs each from four dlrs for all issued ordinary and preference shares.     The new offer values the diversified auto parts manufacturer\'s 27.22 mln ordinary shares and 13.22 mln first participating preference shares at 202.2 mln dlrs.     Formal documents will be sent to shareholders as soon as possible, it said in a brief statement.     BTR Nylex, which manufactures rubber and plastic products, first bid for BWA in late January.     As previously reported, Borg-Warner Corp, which owns 65 pct of BWA\'s ordinary shares and 100 pct of the preferences, advised a month ago that it would not accept the offer.     This meant BTR Nylex\'s 50.1 pct acceptance condition could not be met, BWA said in a statement reporting its parent\'s decision.     BWA advised shareholders to ignore the offer and said other parties had expressed interest in bidding for it.     But no other bid has yet emerged.     BTR Nylex is a 59.5 pct-owned listed subsidiary of Britain\'s BTR Plc BTRX.LON.  \n',acq
'A Japanese businessman announced plans for a new telecommunications firm in which Britain\'s Cable and Wireless Plc would be a core company.     However, the plan, unveiled by senior Federation of Economic Organizations official Fumio Watanabe, does not specify what stake Cable and Wireless would have.     \"The share holdings of the core companies should be equal,\" Watanabe said in a statement. \"The actual percentage of shareholdings should be agreed by the core companies.\"     He said the eight core companies will provide directors for the firm.     \"The new company shall immediately set to work on the feasibility study of constructing a new cable for itself,\" Watanabe said.     Watanabe has acted as mediator between two rival groups, one of which included C and W, seeking to compete against Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd, which now monopolizes Japan\'s overseas telephone business.     The Post and Telecommunications Ministry has said it wants only one competitor to KDD and has backed Watanabe\'s efforts.     A British source, who declined to be identified further, said the proposals could open the door to further talks between C and W CAWL.L and the other firms involved.     C and W had earlier rejected a reported proposal which would have given it a five pct share in the new telecommunications firm, compared to the less than three pct stake Watanabe originally proposed. C and W has a 20 pct stake in one of the two firms Watanabe has proposed should merge.     The British source said the decision not to specify the exact shareholdings of the core companies could leave the door open for further discussion.     \"It\'s probably a sensible approach on their part,\" the British source tolds.     C and W has also been pushing hard for permission to lay a new cable between Japan and the U.S.     The proposed merger has sparked an international row, with British government sources threatening retaliatory action against Japan for what they see as discriminatory practices against foreign firms.     The sources said last Friday that one option for Britain would be to revoke licenses of Japanese banks and securities companies operating in London.     The U.S. Has also attacked the original merger plans, saying that both rival consortia should be licensed.     Asked about participation by other U.S. And European firms, Watanabe said, \"They will not be core companies but if they wish they could participate.\" Under the Japanese law, total foreign participation would be limited to one-third.     \"It might be wise for C and W to join the new firm which has the support of many influential backers and work within this for the realization of their ideas,\" Watanabe told reporters.     The other core firms are Mitsubishi Corp MITT.T, Mitsui and Co MITS.T, Sumitomo Corp SUMT.T, Matsushita Electric Industrial Co MC.T, Toyota Motor Corp TOYO.T, C Itoh and Co CITT.T, and Pacific Telesis International Inc.     Watanabe said that his latest proposal represented his final effort.     If it fails to satisfy the British government, it will be up to the Japanese government to explain its position, he said.  \n',acq
'C-I-L Inc said it would exercise its right to acquire Trimac Ltd\'s stake in their jointly owned Tricil Ltd for 91 mln dlrs, with closing expected May 22.     C-I-L added that the final price could be less, however, depending on an Ontario court ruling resulting from a previously reported legal action launched by C-I-L.     Mississauga, Ontario-based Tricil is a waste management company with operations in the U.S. and Canada.  \n',acq
'C.T.C. Dealer Holdings Ltd said it extended its previously announced offer for 49 pct of Canadian Tire Corp Ltd to midnight on March 26.     CTC, a group of Canadian Tire dealers, which already owns 17 pct of Canadian Tire, is currently appealing in an Ontario court against a previously announced Ontario Securities Commission ruling blocking CTC\'s 272 mln dlr bid.     The blocked bid did not include non-voting shareholders, who hold 96 pct of Canadian Tire equity.  \n',acq
'Cable and Wireless Plc CAWL.L said proposals to resolve a dispute over entry to Japan\'s telecommunications market were not acceptable.     A company spokesman said the proposals appear to have been made in today\'s edition of the Japanese daily Asahi by Fumio Watanabe, head of a telecommunications committee with the Federation of Economic Organisations.     However, the suggestion still recommended a merger between the two consortia tendering for contracts and would give Cable a five pct stake, more than the three pct originally proposed but less than the 20 pct it holds in its original venture, he said.     The proposal would also offer a Cable nominee a seat on the board of the merged company.     The spokesman said he believed Japan should accept applications from the two rivals for fair review.     Earlier today Cable shares firmed on market speculation that the dispute -- which is being treated by Britain\'s government as a test case of how open the Japanese telecommunications market is -- was near settlement.     Cable shares at 1350 GMT were quoted at 375p compared with a close last night at 364p.  \n',acq
'Shares in Cable and Wireless Plc CAWL.L firmed in morning trading on market speculation that its participation in a joint telecommunications venture in Japan would not be curtailed, dealers said.     The company\'s shares were quoted at 372p at 0915 GMT compared with 364p last night.     The dealers said the speculation appeared to originate in Japan. Cable has said it is resisting attempts by the Federation of Economic Organisations to merge two Japan-based telecommunications firms, a move which would have cut Cable\'s stake from 20 pct in one to three pct in the merged unit.     However, the dealers were uncertain exactly how the dispute over the shareholdings had been resolved.     British prime minister MargaretThatcher said in parliament last week that she regarded Cable and Wireless\'s participation in the Japanese venture as a test case of how open the Japanese telecommunications market really was.     A spokesman for Cable said he was unaware if the speculation had any foundation. Cable itself had issued no statement today on the issue.  \n',acq
'Cable and Wireless Plc CAWL.L said new proposals unveiled by Japan for it to become a core member of a merged telecommunications firm to compete for telecommunications contracts did not remove the group\'s objections.     The suggestions by Federation of Economic Organisations official Fumio Watanabe was a formal announcement of proposals made earlier this week and reported in the Japanese press.     Cable has a 20 pct stake in one of the two groups trying to compete against Japan\'s Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd which monopolises Japan\'s overseas telephone business.     But a Cable spokesman said it still believed a merger of the two consortia would be impracticable. \"They are like oil and water,\" he said.     The Japanese authorities want only one competitor and have proposed that the two consortia band together. The issue has been taken up by the British government as a test case on the openness of Japanese markets. Watanabe\'s latest proposals said that the eight core companies of the new group should have equal share holdings but added that they could work out the precise percentages amongst themselves.     The reports earlier this week said that Cable would be offered a five pct stake, up from an originally proposed three pct.     Despite the apparent differences in stakes offered, the Cable spokesman said the two offers appeared to be essentially the same.     Cable shares at 1100 GMT were quoted nine pence firmer at 374p.  \n',acq
'Cablevision Industries Corp said its Cablevision Industries of California Inc subsidiary has entered into an agreement to buy substantially all of the assets of Valley Cable TV for about 100 mln dlrs.     The company said it will buy the system from a California limited partnership, which is wholly-owned by Toronto-based Hollinger Inc.     It said Valley Cable operates a 60,000 subscriber cable television systems passing about 180,000 homes in the west San Fernando Valley area of Los Angeles.     Cablevision said it is the nation\'s 21st largest cable company and is ownnd by Alan Gerry, its chairman, president and chief executive officer. The company said the agreement is subject to regulatory approval.  \n',acq
'Pearson Plc PSON.L said Camco Inc, its 65.4 pct owned U.S. Oil and oil services subsidiary, signed a letter of intent covering Camco\'s purchase from Baker International Corp BKO.N of substantially all the business of Reed Tool Co.     Reed, a leading manufacturer of drilling bits, had sales for 1986 of around 76 mln dlrs.     The transaction is subject to negotiation of a definitive agreement approved by the Baker and Camco boards and by the U.S. Department of Justice, with which talks are already taking place concerning the combination of Baker and Hughes Tool.     Baker International has proposed a merger with Hughes Tool which could create a 1.2 billion dlr oilfield services company.     Pearson shares were down 4p to 567 after the announcement.  \n',acq
'Campeau Corp and the Edward J. DeBartolo Corp have closed on their previously-announced  purchase of five of the regional shopping centers of Allied Stores Corp.     Campeau said it and the DeBartolo Association will each hold a 50 pct ownership interest in the shopping centers.     Campeau separately announced that, as required by a bank agreement, it has contributed an additional 50 mln dlrs of capital to Allied.     Campeau acquired Allied Stores Corp earlier this year, the company said.  \n',acq
'Prime Minister Brian Mulroney said the government was considering selling Petro-Canada and the sale would proceed if it were in the national interest to do so.     Mulroney told the House of Commons assets of the huge oil company would be examined before a decision was made, just as other state-run companies were studied before being sold under Ottawa\'s privatization program.     \"The government is going to examine assets of this nature to ascertain if they continue to play an appropriate role in public policy and we will make a determination as we have in other cases,\" Mulroney told the daily question period.              Asked by opposition members to clairify Finance Minister Michael Wilson\'s statement on Friday that Petro-Canada no longer has any pubilic policy role, Mulroney said his government has long promised to sell off companies that could be better run by the private sector.     Outside the House, Energy Minister Marcel Masse said Petro-Canada would be worth between three and four billion dlrs and, because of the size, could be difficult to sell.     He also said he would prefer to see Canadians participating in any privatization, but would not give any details on timing of a sale.            \n',acq
'Canadian Foremost Ltd, earlier reporting lower 1986 net profit, said negotiations are continuing concerning the previously announced sale of the company\'s 49 pct interest in Macedon Resources Ltd.     If concluded, the sale would be refelected in the company\'s 1987 results, Foremost said without elaborating.     It also said lower revenues from the last half of 1986 are expected to continue during 1987, but a strong cash and working capital position will enable Foremost to go on developing traditional and new markets. It earlier said 1986 earnings fell to 1,042,000 dlrs from year-ago 2,510,000 dlrs.  \n',acq
'Canadian Natural Resources Ltd said it agreed in principle to sell 80 pct of its working interest in certain producing and non-producing natural gas properties located in southwestern Saskatchewan.     The transaction is expected to close on April 1, 1987, the company said. It did not identify the buyer nor give the selling price.     Proceeds will be used to satisfy a February 1987 repayment demand by one of the company\'s lenders. Any excess proceeds will be added to working capital, the company said.  \n',acq
'Canadian Pacific Ltd said it retained Wood Gundy Inc to seek a buyer for Maple Leaf Mills Ltd of Toronto.     The company said Maple Leaf had 1986 sales of 819 mln Canadian dlrs and an after tax profit of 16.3 mln Canadian dlrs. It is a diversified agriproducts company which produces and sells industrial and consumer flour, flour-based products and baked goods.     It also operates a fully integrated poultry business and a rendering business, markets livestock and poultry feed and distributes grain through a network of country and terminal elevators.  \n',acq
'CTC Dealer Holdings Ltd said Canadian Tire Corp Ltd controlling shareholders Alfred, David and Martha Billes did not extend an agreement expiring yesterday to tender their shares only to CTC\'s previously reported offer for 49 pct of Canadian Tire common shares.     CTC, which already holds 17.4 pct of Canadian Tire common, said it would therefore not take up any shares tendered under its offer unless they totaled at least 1.1 mln or another 32.7 pct of Canadian Tire common. The Billes control 60 pct of Canadian Tire common. It added that it extended its offer to May 11 at a fixed price of 165.36 dlrs a share.     CTC, a group of Canadian Tire dealers, said it expected to know by May 11 if it would obtain approval to appeal a previously reported Ontario court ruling upholding a regulatory decision to block CTC\'s offer.     The dealers\' bid was previously blocked by the Ontario Securities Commission because the offer excluded holders of Canadian Tire class A non-voting shares, which make up about 96 pct of company equity.  \n',acq
'Canamax Resources Inc said it agreed to acquire the 50 pct interest it does not already own in the Krezmar gold property, near Wawa, Ontario, by paying nine mln dlrs to Algoma Steel Corp Ltd and granting Algoma a four pct net smelter return royalty, which is payable after payback.     The property\'s drill indicated reserves to a depth of 1,200 feet are estimated at over one mln tons averaging 0.25 ounces of gold a ton, Canamax said.  \n',acq
'(Groupe Cantrex Inc) said it plans to merge a new wholly-owned subsidiary a merger agreement with (CAP Appliance Purchasers Inc), of Woodstock, Ontario, a group of about 400 appliance and electronics retailers.     It said CAP shareholders will receive 140,700 first preferred Groupe Cantrex shares entitling the holders to receive 6.05 dlrs per share or the equivilant in class A subordinate voting Cantrex shares.     The merger is effective April one and is subject to shareholder approval.           \n',acq
'Carlton Communications Plc CCML.L said in a statement it had purchased a 20 pct stake or some 5.1 mln shares in Central Independent Television from Ladbroke Group Plc LADB.L at 578p per share.     The consideration of 29.5 mln stg will be met with 18.2 mln stg in cash and the issue of one million ordinary Carlton shares, it said.     Central showed pretax profits up by 57 pct to 18.8 mln stg for the year ended 30 September 1986.  \n',acq
'CCL Industries Inc\'s Continental Can Canada Inc unit said it acquired the Wallaceburg, Ontario, metal can making operations of Nestle Enterprises Ltd, wholly owned by Nestle SA, of Switzerland. Terms were undisclosed.     Continental Can said it would supply Nestle\'s equivalent can requirements under a long-term agreement.     Nestle said it decided to stop manufacturing cans \"in order to be in a better position to take full advantage of the changes underway or on the horizon in food packaging technology.\"  \n',acq
'Chase Manhattan Bank N.A. is considering expanding its operations in Italy, particularly in the consumer banking sector, a Chase Manhattan official said.     Robert D. Hunter, Chase Manhattan area executive for Europe, Africa and the Middle East, said at a news conference that plans to broaden the bank\'s activities on the Italian market have not been finalised, however.     Asked if Chase Manhattan would consider an acquisition in Italy, Hunter said: \"We will look at any opportunity, but the prices of Italian banks have been quite high.\" Chase Manhattan has branches in Milan and Rome.  \n',acq
'Chicago real estate developer Leonard Chavin told the Securities and Exchange Commission he had raised his stake in the L.E. Meyers Co Group to 11 pct from 9.7 pct.     He also said an investment banker repesenting him met with Myers\' officers, telling them of his plans for a takeover and that he may solicit proxies for a seat on Myers\' board.     Chavin also said if he takes control of the firm, it could result in delisting Meyers\' from the New York Stock Exchange.     He told the SEC that while he is trying to buy or acquire the firm, he still may only hold the shares for an investment.  \n',acq
'The Peking-owned China International Trust and Investment Corp (Citic) bought the unfinished City Garden Hotel in Hong Kong from a subsidiary of Cheung Kong (Holdings) Ltd CKGH.HKG for 235 mln H.K. Dlrs, Cheung Kong director Albert Chow said.     Cheung Kong\'s subsidiary International City Holdings Ltd will complete work on the hotel by the end of 1988, when it will be handed over to Citic. The deal does not include the decoration or fitting out of the interior of the hotel.     The 600-room hotel stands on a 26,700 sq ft site on the eastern side of Hong Kong island.  \n',acq
'French Prime Minister Jacques Chirac told U.S. congressmen France would announce a decision in two to three weeks on which group is to control its second largest communications firm, Compagnie Generale de Construction Telphoniques, French sources said.     They said Chirac promised that France\'s decision would be based on financial, economic and technical criteria, and not on political grounds.     U.S. and German companies are the leading contenders to take control of CGCT.     The Reagan administration has warned France and Germany that it may retaliate if control of the company is awarded on political grounds.     Jacques Delors, President of the European Community\'s Executive Commission, called last month for control to go to West Germany\'s Siemens AG in order to strengthen European industry.     The other leading contender is a consortium of American Telephone and Telegraph Co T with Philips NV of the Netherlands.     Chirac said France would make public its reasons for awarding control, the sources said. He was asked about the company\'s fate on two occasions, in meetings with leaders of the Senate and House of Representatives.  \n',acq
'Joint venture talks that could lead to Chrysler Corp C taking a stake in Italian car maker Automobili Lamborghini SpA are continuing, a Lamborghini spokesman said.     He tolds the two companies are discussing a number of topics ranging from \"a joint venture in the production area to Chrysler becoming a shareholding partner\" in the Italian firm.     The spokesman declined to comment on whether Chrysler was interested in acquiring control of Lamborghini or if the two sides were close to an accord.     He said the two companies are discussing the possibility of jointly developing a sports car aimed primarily at the U.S. Market.     The spokesman said Chrysler officials in Detroit had already visited Lamborghini\'s production plant in Bologna and another visit may be scheduled.     Lamborghini, which is controlled by the Mimran Group of Switzerland, broke even last year on sales of 29 billion lire, he said.     Chrysler also holds a 15 pct interest in Italian sports car producer Alfieri Maserati Spa.  \n',acq
'City Resources Ltd said it has agreed in principle to sell a 50 pct interest in a group of mineral properties in the southwest Pacific to a buyer it did not name for 30 mln Canadian dlrs.     The company said a preliminary estimate of the geological resources of one of the properties to a depth of 200 meters indicates a potential of 1.2 mln ounces of gold, and by the middle of 1987 it expects to establish proven ore reserves containing at least 500,000 ounces of gold. Mining could start in 1988, subject to a satisfactory feasibility study.     The company said completion of the transaction is subject to regulatory and shareholder approvals.     City Resources is controlled by City Resources Ltd of Australia.  \n',acq
'Cityquest Plc, a newly formed company, is making a recommended 120 mln stg offer for builders merchants and DIY (do-it-yourself) company Wickes Plc, Wickes said in a statement.     Undertakings to accept what is effectively a management buyout have been accepted by holders of 88.9 pct of the shares.     The statement said the offer was due to a decision by Wickes International Corp, a member of the U.S. Wickes Companies WIX.A Inc group, which holds an 80.5 pct stake, to realise much of its investment.     The offer would enable Wickes to become fully independent and once the bid succeeded all the Wickes directors would become members of the Cityquest board.     The offer will be of 345p cash for every Wickes share. Wickes was last quoted at 345p compared with 275p at Friday\'s close.     Wickes shareholders will also have the option of taking one Cityquest share or 205p in loan notes for every 205p of the cash consideration.     Henry Sweetbaum is chairman and chief executive of both Cityquest and Wickes, and it was intended that Cityquest\'s name would be changed to Wickes in due course.     Wickes came to the U.K. Unlisted Securities Market in January, 1986 with a capitalisation of about 96 mln stg.     Cityquest has a fully paid share capital of one mln stg. S G Warburg Securities has organised commitments from a group of investors to subscribe for 65 mln stg in shares and 28.2 mln stg in subordinated convertible loan stock. Lead investor is Investors in Industry Plc     Cityquest also has loan facilities of 30 mln stg.  \n',acq
'Clayton and Dubilier Inc and senior management of a unit of Borg-Warner Corp BOR said it will form a new company to buy Borg-Warner\'s industrial products group for about 240 mln dlrs.     Borg-Warner industrial products has sales of about 300 mln dlrs from three divisions, which provide advanced technology fluid transfer and control equipment, systems and services worldwide, Clayton said.     The new company will have 3,000 employees and be headquartered in Long Beach, Calif., the company said.     Peter Valli, vice president of Borg-Warner Corp and president of its industrial products division, will become president and chief executive officer of the new company, according to Clayton.     Clayton, a private investment firm, said this was the third mangement buyout of a divestiture completed by them since December 1986.  \n',acq
'Clearwater Fine Foods Inc, a Canadian company minority owned by Hillsdown Holdings PLC of London, has acquired Channel Foods Ltd, a Cornwall, England producer of chilled smoke fish and pate products, Hillsdown said.     Privately held Clearwater was sold for three mln stg, the company said.  \n',acq
'Coastal Corp said it expected earnings for 1987 \"to be significantly above\" profits of 71.6 mln dlrs last year.     In a letter to shareholders appearing in the company\'s newly-issued 1986 annual report, Coastal chairman Oscar Wyatt did not elaborate on how much earnings were expected to increase.     The 1986 profits of Coastal, a natural gas production and pipeline company, were halved from 1985 levels due to slumping energy prices. The company\'s sales totaled 6.7 billion dlrs last year.     Coastal also said it sold its natural gas for an average price of 2.17 dlrs per mcf in 1986, a drop of 18 pct from the previous year. Oil and natural gas liquids sold for an average 14.20 dlrs a barrel in 1986, a reduction of 37 pct.     The Houston-based company, which produced a daily average of 120 mln cubic feet of gas and 11,149 barrels of oil, said it had proved reserves at yearend 1986 of 28.6 mln barrels of oil and 954 billion cubic feet of natural gas. Average reserve replacement costs were 8.28 dlrs per barrel of oil equivalent during the past three-year period, representing a little more than half of the industry average, the company said.     Coastal\'s more than 800 gasoline retail outlets were operated profitably during 1986 \"and are expected to continue to do so,\" the company said.  \n',acq
'Cogeco Inc said it agreed to acquire 100 pct of Quebec City radio station CJMF-FM and will issue subordinated voting shares of the company to cover a portion of the purchase price.     It said the purchase price and other terms of the transaction have not been disclosed. The transaction is subject to approval of the Canadian Radio-Television and Telecommunications Commission.  \n',acq
'Coloroll Group Plc said it has entered into a conditional agreement to acquire the business and assets of Wallco Inc and related companies for 14.5 mln dlrs.     Miami-based Wallco manufactures and distributes wallcoverings and showed a pretax profit of 1.5 mln dlrs on turnover of 37 mln in the year ending June 1986. The total U.S. Market was estimated to be worth 840 mln dlrs in 1986, having grown by 47 pct in the previous five years, Coloroll said.     The combined sales and profit of the enlarged Coloroll U.S. Business would be 67 mln and four mln dlrs respectively.  \n',acq
'Commerzbank AG CBKG.F said it will acquire Linotype GmbH, Europe\'s largest manufacturer of type-setting and printing communications technology from Allied Signal Inc ALD.N and float off the shares in the company.     Commerzbank declined to say how much it had paid for Linotype.     Linotype\'s group turnover in 1986 rose 15 pct to more than 500 mln marks, the bank said. The group\'s net return on capital was seven pct.  \n',acq
'San Miguel Corp, SMC, and United Coconut Planters Bank, UCPB, have reached a compromise on a disputed block of 38.1 mln shares of SMC, the head of a government panel that controls the sequestered shares said.     Ramon Diaz, Chairman of the Presidential Commission on Good Government (PCGG) tolds SMC had offered a price of 126 pesos per share for the block, held in trust by the UCPB.     \"It looks good,\" Diaz said. But he added several issues, including the identity of the ultimate buyers of the shares, had to be resolved before the PCGG gave its approval to the sale.     The PCGG\'s sequestration last year of 33 mln shares aborted SMC\'s bid to buy them back from 14 trading companies in the UCPB group. The commission said it suspected the shares were actually controlled by Eduardo Cojuangco, an associate of former President Ferdinand Marcos.     Cojuango, who headed the boards of both SMC and UCPB when he fled last year after Marcos was toppled, personally owned 24 mln shares in SMC. His holdings are also under sequestration.     \"The shares that SMC now proposes to buy from the UCPB are owned by 1.4 mln coconut farmers,\" Diaz said. \"Naturally we do not want them to go back into the hands of Marcos cronies.\"     PCGG sources said a compromise would end a row over a down payment of 500 mln pesos made by SMC\'s Hong Kong subsidiary Neptunia Corp Ltd in a bid to buy back the shares last year.     The UCPB had said the 500 mln peso payment would be forfeited because SMC Chairman Andres Soriano III had failed to fulfil his commitment to buy back the shares at an originally negotiated price of 3.3 billion pesos.     PCGG sources said SMC, the Philippines\' largest food and beverage manufacturer, has agreed to sell 14 mln \"B\" class shares from the 38.1 mln shares to Australian brewer Alan Bond at a price of 150 pesos per share.     The PCGG sources said of the proposed 4.79 billion peso transaction, 1.6 billion pesos would be offset against the 500 mln peso down payment, the 500 mln pesos worth of preferred shares in UCPB held by SMC, 210 mln pesos in uncollected dividends on the UCPB shares and 400 mln pesos advanced to UCPB-controlled trading companies.     The UCPB rejected an original offer of 100 pesos per share made by SMC for 33 mln shares, which grew to 38 mln after a 15 pct stock dividend declared in June last year.     A spokesman for SMC said the company\'s 15-member board met today to discuss the proposed compromise.     The spokesman declined comment on the outcome of the board meeting, saying the dispute was under arbitration.     President Corazon Aquino last month asked SMC and UCPB to set up a three-man arbitration panel to resolve the ownership issue. The panel is due to submit its report by April 15.     Eduardo de Los Angeles, a government nominee in the SMC board, filed a formal complaint before the Securities and Exchange Commission last week, accusing Soriano and eight other directors of violating \"fiduciary duty.\"     De Los Angeles was said to have opposed a decision by SMC\'s board last December to assume the 500 mln peso Neptunia loan.  \n',acq
'Consolidated Norex Resources Ltd said it agreed to acquire all issued and outstanding shares of Triweb Resources Ltd, a privately held oil and gas company with land holdings and production base in Alberta and Saskatchewan.     The company said specific details relating to purchase price and other terms will be released on closing of the transaction, expected by May 15.  \n',acq
'Texas Air Corp said under a settlement of class action litigation with Mutual Shares Corp, former minority shareholders of Continental Airlines Inc will receive an additional 3.75 dlrs per share.     In February, Texas Air acquired the minority interest in Continental that it did not already own for 16.50 dlrs per share. Mutual had challenged the adequacy of the price.     Texas Air said any former Continental holder who has sought appraisal rights under Delaware law may continue to seek the appraisal remedy in Delaware Chancery Court or accept the settlement and drop the appraisal process.     Texas Air said the settlement has other terms relating to employee shareholdrs of Continental, who will receive options from Texas Air.  It did not give details.     The company said the settlement is subject to approval by the Delaware Chancery Court, which is expected to take about 60 days.  \n',acq
'Cooper Canada Ltd said it has received takeover offers from \"a number of companies.\"     The company also said that \"discussions are continuing, but no definitive arrangements have been made.\"     It gave no further details.  \n',acq
'Cooper Canada Ltd said it told those who have expressed interest in acquiring control of the company that it would entertain no offer unless it were made to holders both of class A non-voting shares and voting common.  \n',acq
'Bank of America NT and SA\'s BAC.N West German branch said it is negotiating the sale of Bankhaus Centrale Credit AG, a small local West German bank it acquired in 1965, and of its West German Visa credit card operation.     Michael Seibel, Bank of America vice-president and regional manager, said the negotiations were proceeding well. He declined to give further details.     Bank of America\'s West German branch lost some 32 mln marks in 1985. The result includes profit and loss transfers from Bankhaus Centrale Credit and the Visa organisation. The sale of the units is part of the bank\'s worldwide restructuring plan.  \n',acq
'Bank of America NT and SA\'s BAC.N West German branch said it is negotiating the sale of Bankhaus Centrale Credit AG, a small local West German bank it acquired in 1965, and of its West German Visa credit card operation.     Michael Seibel, Bank of America vice-president and regional manager, said the negotiations were proceeding well. He declined to give further details.     Bank of America\'s West German branch lost some 32 mln marks in 1985. The result includes profit and loss transfers from Bankhaus Centrale Credit and the Visa organisation. The sale of the units is part of the bank\'s worldwide restructuring plan. -- corrects year of loss in third paragraph in item which originally ran February 27.  \n',acq
'County Ltd, which is acting in concert with Tesco Plc TSCO.L in its 151.4 mln stg for supermarket chain operator Hillards Plc, has purchased 300,000 Hillards ordinary shares at 316p per share, a statement said.     These purchases, together with those made by County on 10 March, represent about 4.8 pct of Hillards issued ordinary share capital, it said.     Tesco\'s offer, made on March 10, values each Hillards ordinary share at 305.5p, a 37.6 pct premium over the previous day\'s  closing price. A cash alternative of 290.55p will be made available.  \n',acq
'A U.S. Appeals court last night blocked the 860 mln dlr merger of Delta Airlines Inc DAL.N and Western Airlines just hours before it was to go into effect because of a dispute over union representation.     The ruling came in a lawsuit in which the Air Transport Employees union said Western\'s management should fulfil a promise to honour union contracts if a merger took place.     The airlines argued that Western\'s promise could not be enforced in a takeover by a larger company. Airlines officials could not be reached for comment on the ruling, which halts the merger until arbitration on the dispute is completed.  \n',acq
'An appeal by Buitoni SpA against a court ruling that an accord under which it was to acquire Italian state food firm SME - Societa Meridionale Finanziaria was not contractually binding has been rejected, court officials said.     An appeal court rejected Buitoni\'s claim that the 497 billion lire accord with the state industrial company IRI - Istituto per la Ricostruzione Industriale was a binding contract. The decision upholds a court ruling of last July.     Buitoni is controlled by CIR - Compagnie Industriali Riunite, an investment company itself controlled by Ing C Olivetti EC SpA (OLIV.MI chairman Carlo De Benedetti.  \n',acq
'Pacific Western Airlines Corp said the airline resulting from the previously announced merger of its Pacific Western Airlines Ltd unit and Canadian Pacific Air Lines Ltd would be named Canadian Airlines International Ltd, effective April 26.     Pacific Western said the two airlines\' services and schedules would also be integrated on April 26. It previously appointed management for the new airline.     The new airline, Canada\'s second largest, will have 81 planes flying to 89 destinations in 13 countries.     Pacific Western recently acquired Canadian Pacific Airlines for 300 mln dlrs from Canadian Pacific Ltd CP.  \n',acq
'French state agricultural bank Caisse Nationale du Credit Agricole has joined the group led by publishing house Hachette which is bidding for control of the state television station TF1, replacing Banque Nationale de Paris which has withdrawn, Hachette said in a statement.     Credit Agricole\'s stake in the consortium will be 3.5 pct.     Last week the broadcasting supervisory board asked Hachette to remove BNP from the consortium because the bank had acted as adviser to the government for the imminent privatisation of TF1.  \n',acq
'CSR Ltd CSRA.S said it will offer 2.20 dlrs cash each for the shares it does not already hold in Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd.     CSR already holds 31.74 pct of Pioneer\'s 99.80 mln issued shares, it said in a statement.     The offer price values the entire Pioneer Sugar share capital at 219.6 mln dlrs and compares with today\'s closing market level of 1.85 dlrs a share.     CSR said it will announce further details of the offer soon, including an alternative offer of CSR shares for Pioneer Sugar stock.     It said the offer is generous since it will give Pioneer Sugar shareholders a price equivalent to 29 times Pioneer\'s net earnings last financial year and a premium of 22 pct over yesterday\'s market price which CSR said it believed already contained an element of takeover speculation.     It also gives a premium of 91 pct over Pioneer\'s last reported net tangible assets per share, CSR said.     CSR said the generous offer price reflects the cost savings which will flow from integrated management of CSR\'s and Pioneer\'s raw sugar mills and building materials businesses.     These economies can only be achieved through CSR control and management of Pioneer Sugar, it added.     The takeover announcement came soon after CSR\'s earlier reported statement that it will sell its Delhi Petroleum Pty Ltd unit to an Exxon Corp XON unit for 985 mln dlrs and not proceed with the previously announced float of part of Delhi.  \n',acq
'CSR Ltd CSRA.S and Exxon Corp XON unit Esso Exploration and Production Australia Inc said CSR has agreed to sell its Delhi Australia Fund (DAF) to Esso for 985 mln Australian dlrs.     The sale is effective from tomorrow, they said in a joint statement.     The previously announced float of part of its Delhi interest will not now proceed, CSR said in the statement.     Delhi Australia Fund owns Delhi Petroleum Pty Ltd, which holds an average of 25 pct in the Santos Ltd STOS.S-led Cooper and Eromanga Basin gas and liquids projects.     In addition to the purchase price, CSR will share equally in any returns due to increases in crude oil and condensate prices over certain levels for liquids produced from Delhi\'s interests in the next two years, the statement said.     \"The Esso proposal to purchase all the Delhi interest will be more beneficial to our shareholders than proceeding with the float,\" CSR chief executive Bryan Kelman said in the statement.     Kelman said the sale of Delhi would enable CSR to focus efforts on expanding business areas such as sugar and building materials in which CSR has had long and successful management experience and strong market leadership.     With the sale, CSR will be able to expand those businesses more aggressively and earlier, he said.     As reported separately, soon after announcing the Delhi sale CSR launched a takeover bid for the 68.26 pct of Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd that it does not already hold, valuing its entire issued capital at 219.6 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'CTC Dealer Holdings Ltd said it would appeal a previously reported Ontario court ruling upholding an Ontario Securities Commission decision to block CTC\'s bid for 49 pct of Canadian Tire Corp Ltd common shares.     CTC, a group of Canadian Tire dealers, added that it also extended its tender offer to March 31 and was seeking approval to extend its bid while the appeal court heard the case.     It said Alfred and David Billes, two of Canadian Tire\'s controlling shareholders, backed the appeal and would seek leave to appeal while third controlling shareholder Martha Billes supported the appeal but would not join an appeal motion.  \n',acq
'Hollinger Inc said 58 pct-owned The Daily Telegraph PLC, of London, agreed to form a joint venture printing company in Manchester, England with News International PLC. Financial terms were undisclosed.     It said the deal involved News International\'s acquisition of a 50 pct stake in the Telegraph\'s Trafford Park Printing Ltd subsidiary. The joint company will continue to print northern editions of the Telegraph and Sunday Telegraph, with spare capacity used to print The Sun and News of the World.     The arrangement will significantly cut Telegraph costs, Hollinger said.  \n',acq
'A group led by Dallas investor Harold Simmons told the Securities and Exchange Commission it had reduced its stake in McDermott International Inc by one pct, to under five pct.     The group had said in a March 10 filing, announcing acquisition of 5.4 pct of the firm\'s stock, that it might consider seeking control of the company.  \n',acq
'Dart Group DARTA is likely seeking to buy Supermarkets General SGL, analysts said.     \"There\'s been rumors that they\'ve taken a position in the company, said Wood Gundie analyst Edward Comeau.     Last year, Dart Group, owner of Auto Trak INc and Crown Books, competed against Kohlberg, Kravis to acquire Safeway Stores INc.     The company later reached an accord under which it would buy 20 pct of the company after Kohlberg Kravis completed its leveraged buyout of the company.     The company later sold its 20 pct stock for about 180 mln to 200 mln dlrs, according to analysts.      Dart Group Corp was not immediately available for comment.     Jerry Ballan, analyst with Conner Ballan division of Edward Viner and Co, said, \"They Dart has been rumored to be buying some other supermarkets as well, such as Stop and Shop.\"     \"My guess is that Supermarkets General does not want to be bought out,\" said Ballan.     Analysts, however, said Supermarkets General is facing problems due to its Purity Supreme and Rickels operations, which might make it difficult to thwart a bid.     Supermarkets General is expected to report about 1.70 dlrs a share compared to a 1.73 dlrs a share reported for 1985 on a post stock split basis.     For the first quarter, Comeau predicts the company will earn 39 cts a share from 35 cts a share a year ago, and should earn about 2.05 dlrs for 1987.     \"But that estimation could go to a 1.80 dlrs easily, due to Purity Supreme in New England,\" Comeau said.     He said competition among supermarkets is getting heated in that area and that the company has had difficulty with integrating Purity Supreme with its Pathmark store operations.     Rickels, a home center business, has faced problems due to the state of that industry, and has reported lower returns as an operating unit, according to analysts.     Analysts said that if Dart buys Supermarkets General it would probably divest the company\'s operations.     Analyst Comeau said \"supermarkets general may seek a combination with another supermarket company.\" \n',acq
'Deak International, a foreign currency and precious metals firm, announced the acquisition of Johnson Matthey Commodities of New York from Minories Finance Limited, a unit of the Bank of England.     The purchase valued at 14.8 mln dlrs follows the recent acquisition of London\'s Johnson Matthey Commodities Limited, Deak said. The New York firm will be known as Deak International Trading Ltd, the company said. Arkadi Kuhlmann, president and chief executive officer of Deak International, said the purchase will expand Deak\'s operations in precious metals and wholesale non-ferrous metals trading.  \n',acq
'Deak International, a foreign currency and precious metals firm, announced the acquisition of Johnson Matthey Commodities of New York from Minories Finance Limited, a unit of the Bank of England.     The purchase valued at 14.8 mln dlrs follows the recent acquisition of London\'s Johnson Matthey Commodities Limited, Deak said.     The New York firm will be known as Deak International Trading Ltd, the company said.     Arkadi Kuhlmann, president and chief executive officer of Deak International said the purchase will expand Deak\'s operations into the precious metals and wholesale non-ferrous metals trading arenas.  \n',acq
'U.K. Defence secretary George Younger is expected to announce the government\'s decision on the sale of state-owned arms manufacturer Royal Ordnance today, parliamentary sources said.     The government originally intended to float the munitions and explosives concern on the stock market, but last July said a private sale was a more appropriate way to dispose of the firm.     The bidders for the company were British Aerospace Plc BAEL.L and engineering group GKN Plc GKN.L. Royal Ordnance sold its Leeds tank factory last summer to Vickers Plc VICK.L.     Defence electronics manufacturer Ferranti Plc FNTI.L and shipping and property group Trafalgar House Plc THSL.L both pulled out of the bidding shortly before last month\'s deadline.     Royal Ordnance made pre-tax profits of 26 mln stg on sales of 487 mln stg in calendar 1985, its first full year of commercial operation. The company has assets of around 240 mln stg and employs 17,000 at 15 sites in Britain.     Other state-held companies earmarked for privatisation this year include engine maker Rolls Royce Plc and the British Airports Authorities Plc.  \n',acq
'Deloitte Haskins and Sells, an accounting and consulting firm, said it bought a stake in Holland Systems Corp, a software and services company.     The company also said it set up a venture with Holland Systems to develop and market an integrated line of information management products and services.     It said products from the venture are expected to be introduced within the next year.  \n',acq
'European Commission President Jacques Delors, quoted by Le Monde newspaper, said he favoured a Franco-German candidate to take over Cie Generale de Constructions Telephoniques, which has a 16 pct stake in the French public telephone switching market.     \"I wish for a European solution ... That will enable Germany and France to move closer together, which is currently necessary,\" he was quoted as saying.     \"Given the situtation of the EC (European Community) and of the importance for our future connunications audiences and of cooperation already undertaken on the Community level, that seems the best choice,\" Delors added.     Five groups, including an alliance between West Germany\'s Siemens AG SIEG.F and France\'s Schneider S.A. SCHN.PA subsidiary Jeumont-Schneider, have applied to buy what is France\'s second largest telephone switching firm.     Under French privatisation law, foreign companies are restricted to a 20 pct stake in privatised companies.  \n',acq
'Delta Air Lines DAL said a court order requiring Western Air Lines WAL to arbitrate with two of its unions will not delay the April 1 merger between the two airlines.     The order, which was issued by the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals, requires Western to discuss with its two unions whether Western\'s labor contracts will be binding for Delta, Delta said.     \"Nevertheless, the court order could cause significant personnel problems, including the possible delay of wage increases Delta had planned to give the Western personnel on April 1,\" Ronald Allen, Delta\'s president, said.     Delta said it feels the court has erred and should reconsider the order.  \n',acq
'Derlan Industries Ltd said it acquired 80 pct of Aurora Industries Inc of Montgomery, Illinois for an undisclosed price.     Closing is subject to completion of legal formalities, Derlan said.  \n',acq
'Deutsche Bank AG DBKG.F has agreed to take over the outstanding 25 pct in Deutsche Bank (Asia) AG, the former European Asian Bank AG, from Creditanstalt-Bankverein CABV.VI, Deutsche management board joint spokesman Alfred Herrhausen told a news conference.     Euras broke even in 1986 and required no funding from Deutsche, he said. He gave no details of the deal with Creditanstalt.     Press reports that Deutsche was planning a takeover of Lloyds Bank plc LLOY.L were without foundation, he said.     Herrhausen said Deutsche had taken part in the recent capital increase of Morgan Grenfell Group plc, but had no plans to raise its 4.4 pct share in Morgan Grenfell.     Banca d\'America e d\'Italia SpA, in which 98.3 pct was acquired from Bankamerica Corp BAC.N late last year, would be consolidated this year, and contribute to further expansion of Deutsche\'s business, management board joint spokesman F. Wilhelm Christians said.     Following a ruling earlier this year from the Federal High Court, Deutsche had included its non-bank holdings in the balance sheet section \"participations,\" Christians said.     But Christians said the bank still regarded shares in these non-bank companies as an investment rather than an active participation.     Parent bank total participations rose to 6.45 billion marks in 1986 from a comparable 4.57 billion in 1985 including a rise to 3.79 billion from 2.34 billion in bank participations.     Herrhausen said the grouping of holdings in the balance sheet in this was was not a first step to floating them off in a separate holding company.  \n',acq
'Dixons Group Plc DXNS.L said its tender offer for all of the common shares in Cyclops Corp of the U.S. Expired at midnight yesterday and that it had accepted approximately 2.3 mln shares in the company at 90.25 dlrs each.     This represents just over 54 pct of the outstanding shares on a fully diluted basis. But including shares already owned, Dixons now holds a total of 56 pct of the fully diluted outstanding shares.     The company said it is now entitled to subscribe for all the authorised but unissued and unreserved shares of common stock of Cyclops, which total some 5.4 mln shares, at 90.25 dlrs each.     Dixons said it has waived its condition that 80 pct of the fully diluted outstanding shares be validly tendered and not withdrawn.     Dixons launched the agreed 384 mln dlr offer on February 17 this year in the wake of its unsuccessful battle to take over the U.K. Retail store chain Woolworth Holdings Plc WLUK.L.     Dixons shares were last quoted at 390p, up on last night\'s close of 380p.     On Friday, CYACQ Corp, an investor group formed by Audio/Video Affiliates Inc AVA and Citicorp CCI, said it would increase the price it was offering for all Cyclops shares to 92.50 dlrs from 80.00 dlrs each if Cyclops would provide it with confidential information given to Dixons and if it were satisfied that any rights Dixon might have to recover fees or expenses from Dixons or to buy Cyclops stock would be rescinded or proved invalid.     Audio/Video\'s offer is scheduled to expire March 20.  \n',acq
'Dixons Group PLC said it received a letter on March 19 from Citicorp Capital Investors Ltd, part of the Cyacq investor group making a rival bid for Cyclops Corp CYL, proposing to drop the group\'s offer if Dixons would sell Cyclops industrial businesses to Citicorp.     \"Cyacq\'s main equity investor appears ready to pull out and deal directly with us for merely part of the company\" said Dixons. \"It raises questions as to the strength of their consortium and the purpose of their offer.\"     Dixons also said a U.S. Federal Court had refused a request by counsel for Cyacq, Audio/Video Affiliates Inc AVA and a shareholder plaintiff to prevent Dixons from completing its tender offer for Cyclops. It also said the court refused to require Cyclops to provide Cyacq with confidential information previously provided to Dixons.     On Friday Cyacq Corp, an investor group led by Audio/Video Affiliates and Citicorp, raised their offer for Cyclops to 92.50 dlrs per share from 80 dlrs per share, if certain conditions were satisfied.     Last week Dixons said it won out over rival bidders for Cyclops after getting 54 pct of Cyclop\'s oustanding with a 90.25 dlr or 384 mln dlr tender offer that expired March 18.     On Friday, Dixons agreed to reopen its tender offer until March 25, Wednesday.     Dixons today called Cyacq\'s higher 92.50 dlr a share offer for Cyclops \"highly conditional.\"  \n',acq
'Dixons Group Plc DXNS.L has sold 8.3 mln shares in Woolworth Holdings Plc WLTH.L through Salomon Brothers U.K. Equity Ltd, a statement from Salomon said.     The shares were placed with about 45 to 50 institutions in Europe and the Far East. Dixons retains one mln Woolworth shares, a Dixons spokesman added.     Industry sources said Dixons acquired the Woolworth shares in connection with its unsuccessful bid for the company last year.     Dixons paid an average price of 695p per share which compares with 819p today. Woolworth closed on Froday at 833p.     A Dixons spokesman said the decision to retain one mln shares reflected Woolworth\'s buoyant prospects.  \n',acq
'The U.S. Energy Department issued a request for proposals to buy the Snettisham Hydroelectric project, a major part of the Alaska Power Administration.     It said invitations were sent to two Alaskan electric utilities, the city and borough of Anchorage and the state of Alaska.  It did not cite a possible purchase prices.     The requests were limited to Alaskan entities because the purpose of privatization of the administration was to put the local utility into the hands of a local body, the DOE said.     It added that proposals are due back by August three.     The DOE said it then had 120 days to select a proposal that it would recommend to Congress, which then would vote the recommendation up or down.     Proposals to buy the other major part of the Alaska Power Administration, the Eklutna project, was expected to be issued in early June, it said.  \n',acq
'(Dumez Investments I Inc) said 94.7 pct of Westburne International Industries Ltd\'s outstanding common shares have been deposited under its takeover bid.     It said it has received about 11,070,000 shares under its 22.50 dlrs per share offer which expired yesterday.     Dumez said it will proceed to acquire the remaining common shares to give it 100 pct ownership of Westburne.     Dumez is a private company owned jointly by (Dumez S.A.) and (Unicorp Canada Corp).              \n',acq
'The U.K. Based commodity house E.D. And F. Man Ltd and Singapore\'s Yeo Hiap Seng Ltd jointly announced that Man will buy a substantial stake in Yeo\'s 71.1 pct held unit, Yeo Hiap Seng Enterprises Ltd.     Man will develop the locally listed soft drinks manufacturer into a securities and commodities brokerage arm and will rename the firm Man Pacific (Holdings) Ltd.  \n',acq
'Eager Technology Inc said it signed a letter of intent to acquire Nuclad Inc, a private Colorado corporation, and its subsidiaries.     Terms of the acquisition were not disclosed.  \n',acq
'More U.S. And European firms will be falling prey to Japanese corporations bulging with cash and eager to extend their reach further overseas, according to merger and acquisitions specialists polled bys.     Already, rich Japanese companies have pounced on U.S. Banks, steel and other businesses.     In the latest attempt, Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T -- Japan\'s biggest computer maker -- unsuccessfully bid for Fairchild Semiconductor Corp, a U.S. Microchip maker which supplies components for supercomputers.     Nomura Securities Co Ltd NMSC.T and Daiwa Securities Co Ltd DSEC.T, Japan\'s two largest brokerage firms, are seeking a niche in the U.S. And European securities markets, while the country\'s huge banks are looking for strongholds in overseas banking, the takeover specialists said.     Major trading houses, which see their profits evaporating in the heat of increased competition in merchandise trade, all have foreign businesses on their shopping lists.     Among manufacturers, car parts makers are under the most pressure to buy up overseas companies and follow the big auto makers they subcontract for as these move offshore.     \"The timing is favourable for Japanese parties to buy up potential overseas businesses, especially in the U.S. -- Japan\'s largest market and where political risks are minimal,\" a takeover specialist at one trading company said.     Japanese companies have become among the world\'s richest after a series of boom export years and as the yen has climbed against the dollar by some 40 pct in the past 18 months.     But the yen\'s strength, which has also raised the costs of Japan\'s exports and allowed its Asian neighbours to move into its traditional markets, has frozen Japanese corporate growth, the specialists said.     Looming trade friction is also threatening to erect more barriers against Japanese exports.     Japanese firms see overseas acquisitions as a way to avoid the gloomy growth outlook and put their excess cash to work. Domestic interest rates, now at record lows, offer little investment opportunity.     \"Japanese interest in acquisitions has been continuous, but the recent economic factors have become a driving force,\" said a banking industry source.     So far, though, the Japanese are being cautious.     While mergers and acquisitions among U.S. Firms number in the thousands, Japanese buyouts of overseas companies have totalled just a few dozen, one merchant banker said.     Another merchant banker said that a flurry of Japanese acquisition activity was originally expected five years from now, but that time span appeared now to be too long.     Japanese firms are becoming more aggressive now, he said.     A turning point seemed to be Dainippon Ink and Chemicals Inc\'s DIAC.T takeover bid for Sun Chemical Corp of the U.S. Last year, which some analysts saw as somewhat hostile, he added.     Dainippon Ink bought Sun Chemical\'s graphic arts group for 550 mln dlrs late last year, after an earlier unsolicited bid for the whole company. Sun Chemical refused to sell its entire business after learning that Dainippon planned to liquidate all but its graphic arts-related businesses.     Hostile takeovers are considered unethical and frowned upon by the Japanese, the trading company official says. \"Japanese people don\'t like fighting. They prefer peaceful amicable deals.\" But now after some experience overseas, Japanese companies are acquainted with local practice, he adds. \"This is a healthy progression.\"     However, the experts do not expect the Japanese to run the board meetings of any giant U.S. Or European concerns.     \"Japanese companies are not fully confident in managing a large U.S. Or European corporation,\" one banker said. \"They will expand their operations only gradually, a typical way for Japanese business.\"     A foreign merchant banker also noted, \"There are not many mega-deals left to do in the United States. A lot of the big deals there have already been done.\"     But medium-size and small concerns are potential targets of Japanese companies, the specialists said.     Japanese will be aiming for new businesses in high-technology areas. \"Japanese companies had used technology and quality to get where they are and are unlikely to deviate from that trend,\" one takeover specialist said.     Many are watching the results of the first acquisitions. If these succeed, activity could build, the specialists said.     But few such specialists are going to sit back and wait until the action begins. Already, they said, Japanese trading houses, long-term credit and commercial banks, brokerages and foreign merchant banks have set up research sections to act as go-betweens in deals or find good buys for themselves.  \n',acq
'Enfield Corp Ltd said it planned to issue 60 mln dlrs principal amount of notes and 1.6 mln class E preferred shares at 25 dlrs a share.     The notes would bear 8 pct yearly interest, mature March 31, 2002 and be convertible to common shares on either March 31, 1997 or the business day before a fixed redemption date at 13.50 dlrs a share, Enfield said.     It said each preferred share would be convertible to 1.85 common shares on either March 31, 1997 or the business day before a fixed redemption date. Gordon Capital Corp and Dominion Securities Inc agreed to acquire the issues, it said.     Enfield said it would use proceeds to retire short-term bank debt and boost its 22 pct stake in Consumers Packaging Inc and its interest in Federal Pioneer Ltd through open market purchases.  \n',acq
'Enro Holding Corp said it acquired Enro Shirt Co and Foxcroft Ltd from Wilson Bros for 30 mln dlrs.      Enro Holding is owned 50 pct by investors and 50 pct by management and others. The investor group bought 50 pct of the common equity and supplied five mln dlrs in mezzanine financing. Management bought the other 50 pct. Congress Financial Group supplied 28 mln dlrs in senior financing and the seller took back a note for 12.1 mln dlrs.     Enro Shirt has annual sales of about 42 mln dlrs and Foxcroft has sales of about 13 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'Exco International Plc, a subsidiary of British and Commonwealth Shipping Co Plc BCOM.L, said it had agreed in principle to buy an 80 pct stake in RMJ Holdings Corp for about 79 mln dlrs.     Exco Chairman Richard Lacy tolds the acquisition was being made from Bank of New York Co Inc BK.N, which currently holds a 50.1 pct, and from RMJ partners who hold the remainder.     Bank of New York and the partners will retain about 10 pct each and these stakes will be bought over the next six years.     RMJ is the holding company of RMJ Securities, one of the largest U.S. Government securities brokers.     It is also involved in broking notes, obligations and other instruments sponsored by U.S. Federal agencies.     Lacy said Exco had been considering buying a U.S. Government securities broker for the past four years and had made an offer for RMJ when it was sold by Security Pacific Corp SPC.N in 1985. RMJ was then valued at about 50 mln dlrs.     B and C managing director Peter Goldie said RMJ would be bought at about the same multiple as Exco, suggesting net income of around 16 mln dlrs.     The company\'s earnings had not been hit by the halving of brokerage fees some 14 months ago as volumes had since doubled.     Lacy said that RMJ employed some 300 people, with 200 in the brokerage business and about 70 in its SMS unit, which provided computer software for the financial services community.     RMJ Securities had offices in New York, where total market turnover of U.S. Government securities was 110 billion dlrs a day, and in London where it has 15 billion.     It was also given permission last week to open an office in Tokyo where total market turnover had lifted rapidly to about five billion dlrs a day.     The acquisition would contribute between five and 10 pct of B and C\'s share earnings in 1987 on a proforma basis.  \n',acq
'Schlumberger Ltd\'s SLB.N decision to end an agreement in principle for Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T to buy 80 pct of its Fairchild Semiconductor Corp, and the political furore that surrounded the proposed sale, will make Japanese companies more cautious in their efforts to acquire U.S. High technology firms but will not halt such attempts, industry analysts said.     The collapse of the deal will not be a critical blow to Fujitsu but it will boost the cost of future U.S. Expansion by the Japanese firm, said analysts polled bys.     \"The acquisition of Fairchild is not essential to Fujitsu\'s North American operations, but it would have been a great boost,\" James Capel and Co analyst Tom Murtha said.     French-controlled Schlumberger said yesterday it was ending the agreement because mounting political controversy in the U.S. Made it unlikely that the sale of the Fairchild stake could be completed in a reasonable time.     The sale was opposed by the U.S. Commerce Department and Defence Department, partly on national security grounds.     Fujitsu\'s acquisition of Fairchild would have given the Japanese computer maker control of a comprehensive North American sales and distribution system and access to microprocessor technology, an area where Fujitsu is weak, analysts said.     The deal would also have given Fujitsu 14 additional microchip production facilities worldwide, eight of them in the U.S., A report by the Capel firm said.     \"It was an entry point, a port for semiconductors and a marketing channel for other things,\" said Barclays de Zoete Wedd analyst Rick May.     Several analysts said the purchase would not have given Fujitsu access to critical defence technology.     \"(Fairchild) simply doesn\'t have key technology -- that\'s a thing of the past,\" May said.     The failure could be a blessing in disguise for Fujitsu as it might have had to spend several hundred million dollars to modernise Fairchild\'s production lines, Capel\'s Murtha said.     The failure of the deal will doubtless encourage Japanese firms to take a lower profile in attempts to acquire U.S. High tech firms but they are unlikely to stop, analysts said.     Most analysts said Fujitsu was likely to go the more costly route of expanding its own production and distribution facilities in the U.S., Although some said it could use the estimated 200 mln dlrs set aside for buying Fairchild to try to acquire some less politically symbolic firm.     \"It may slow the pace of Japanese acquisitions, but the necessity of expanding their production and design capacity in America remains,\" said Capel\'s Murtha. \"The Japanese will continue to shop for bargains, but it will be harder to find ones that are politically acceptable.\"     Japanese firms are likely to favour joint ventures or smaller equity stakes in firms to avoid the political backlash that blocked the Fairchild sale, analysts said. \"They\'re not going to slow up, they\'re just going to buy smaller pieces ... Because of the political risk,\" said Barclays de Zoete\'s May.     Several Japanese firms have already taken 10 to 30 pct shares in smaller U.S. High technology firms such as super minicomputer makers, he said.     Opposition of the sort that blocked Fujitsu could end up harming U.S. Firms and undermining a trend toward multinational tie-ups, some analysts said.     \"This is not really of benefit to U.S. Firms either,\" said Jardine Fleming (Securities) Ltd analyst Nick Edwards. \"The pooling of resources in semiconductors is a positive move -- why should the government step in to prevent it?\"     Japan\'s Minister of International Trade and Industry Hajime Tamura told a press conference that interference by U.S. Government officials in the Fairchild deal was inappropriate.     \"This is entirely a private sector matter and not a matter for governments\' comment,\" Tamura said. \"I think it was improper for U.S. Government officials to intervene to the extent they did,\" he said.     A spokesman tolds the ministry\'s view is that international investment flows ought to be free and that such flows are of increasing importance in line with the growing closeness of U.S.-Japanese economic ties.  \n',acq
'Fairchild Semiconductor Corp president Donald Brooks said he intends to take a management buyout proposal to the company\'s parent at some point in the future and substantial funding is available for such a purchase.     Fairchild is owned by Schlumberger Ltd SLB.     Brooks also told a press conference that if management is successful, it may later attempt to take the company public.     \"I am sure that if such a management buyout is to occur, and I am hopeful that it does, the public market is one of the avenues we will ultimately have to use to raise capital,\" Brooks said.     Brooks also said the company would continue to attempt an exchange of technology and manufacturing agreement with Fujitsu Ltd if successful in its buyout bid.     Futjitsu withdrew an offer to acquire some 80 pct of Fairchild, a semiconductor maker, after U.S. government officials expressed opposition to the transaction.     Brooks told the news conference that any purchase would be in the form of a management buyout and not a leveraged buyout.     He also said the transaction could be financed through a debt issue or conventional financing from investors.     Brooks said management is pleased by a number of investment proposals bought to them, but he added, \"the investors must be willing to invest in the future growth of the company and not just selling off assets.\"     Brooks also said he was not aware of any direct intervention by the U.S. in an attempt to block the merger.     \"I am not aware of any direct contact between Washington and Fujitsu, but that doesn\'t mean it doesn\'t exist,\" Brooks said.     He also said Fujitsu executives remain enthusiastic about a link with Fairchild.  \n',acq
'Federal Reserve Board Governor Robert Heller said the banking system could be strengthened by permitting formation of financial services holding companies involved in areas like banking, insurance, real estate and securities.     In a speech prepared for delivery in New York to the Bank and Financial Analysts\' Association, Heller said, \"I believe that increased diversification along geographic and product lines is the key to strengthening the American banking system.\"     He said he supported the idea of financial services holding companies advocated by the Association of Bank Holding Companies in which regulation of various bank, thrift, insurance, investment, securities and real estate subsidiaries would be handled on functional lines.     \"Limits would be placed on the extension of credit by the bank to the associated institutions, and all transactions would have to be on an arms-length basis,\" Heller said.     Measures would be necessary to avoid abuse of the banks\' special position by such holding companies or subsidiaries.     Heller said he \"would require the holding company to serve as a \'source of strength\' to the bank by making a commitment to maintain the bank\'s capital.     \"In other words, the bank would not be allowed to fail as long as the holding company has a positive net worth.\"     Heller also said commercial enterprises should be permitted to own a financial services holding company, again with the provision that capital would flow to the financial enterprise if necessary.     Heller said the effects of these actions \"would be banks that are at least as strong as the corporations holding them\" in which customer deposits were assured while any incentive to \"loot the bank\" was removed.     Such diversification would give access to national and international financial services to corporations across the United States.     Heller said that would mean \"the steady decline of America\'s banks in the world financial league tables would be arrested\" by permitting them to become more competitive.  \n',acq
'The Ferruzzi Group\'s holding company Agricola Finanziara SpA will pay 630 mln dlrs for the European corn wet milling business of CPC International Inc under the agreement reached in principle between the two companies, a statement by Ferruzzi released by its Brussels office said.     When CPC announced the agreement yesterday in New York, it said only that the price would be in excess of 600 mln dlrs.     Ferruzzi said the deal is subject to agreement on several clauses of the contract and needs government authorisations.     It said the deal would involve 13 starch factories employing about 5,000 people in eight European Community countries plus facilities and commercial operations in other EC states.     The factories have a capacity to produce the equivalent of 1.6 mln tonnes of starch in starch and by-products a year, or about one third of EC production, from about 2.7 mln tonnes of cereals.     Ferruzzi said the acquisition of these assets would extend its presence in the European agro-industrial industry both geographically and in terms of products.     It said it is already the principal EC producer of sugar and of soya oil and cake, and the major cereal trader.     It noted that EC output of isoglucose is subject to maximum quotas, of which CPC currently holds a 25 pct share, and said it foresaw an increase in other industrial uses of starch in the future, notably in the production of ethanol for fuel.     Raul Gardini, president of the Ferruzzi Group, said the present management of the CPC milling business will be asked to remain in their posts.  \n',acq
'Gruppo Ferruzzi is studying a project which could result in a public share offer of up to 49 pct of its French unit European Sugar (France) and could raise around 400 mln dlrs, Ferruzzi chairman Raul Gardini said.     Gardini tolds the operation under consideration was aimed at \"international markets\" and that the figure of 400 mln dlrs given in some press reports \"was probably about right.\"     European Sugar, wholly-owned by Ferruzzi unit Eridania Zuccherifici Nazionali SpA, is expected to absorb the European corn wet milling business of CPC International Inc which Ferruzzi recently agreed to buy.     Ferruzzi announced last week it had agreed in principle to buy the CPC operation for 630 mln dlrs.     A Ferruzzi spokesman later confirmed that the group was studying the transfer of the CPC business to European Sugar along with a possible share offering in the Paris unit, but gave no details.     The flotation plan has been interpreted by financial analysts as a means of helping finance the acquisition of the CPC business.  \n',acq
'Italy\'s Gruppo Ferruzzi is in the advanced stages of negotiations that could result in an acquisition worth \"some hundreds of billions of lire\" in the European agro-industrial sector, a company spokesman tolds.     The spokesman declined to identify the other party or parties involved in talks, or whether a complete takeover was under discussion, but said an Italian newspaper report that Ferruzzi was studying the possibility of advancing an offer for 13 European cereal processing plants owned by the U.S. Group CPC International Inc CPC.N was incorrect.     The spokesman said that possibility had been evaluated by Ferruzzi but that the company\'s attention at the moment was \"decisively in another direction.\"     The spokesman, responding to a report in the Italian economic daily Il Sole-24 Ore that Ferruzzi was considering a possible bid for the CPC plants, tolds his company hoped to conclude the talks currently underway in a couple of months.     The spokesman said that since the U.K. Government last month blocked Ferruzzi\'s bid to acquire British Sugar Plc, the company had been looking at other investment opportunities.  \n',acq
'Sources close to Italy\'s Gruppo Ferruzzi said European Sugar (France), a French company owned by Ferruzzi, would take over control of CPC Industrial Division, the corn wet milling business acquired by the Italian group earlier this week from CPC International Inc CPC.     The sources tolds that European Sugar, owned by Ferruzzi subsidiary Eridania Zuccherifici Nazionali SpA ERDI.MI, planned to seek a listing on the Paris bourse and make a share offering there.     CPC International announced Tuesday it had agreed in principle to sell its European corn wet millng business to Ferruzzi. The deal is worth 630 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'Chatsworth Enterprises Inc, a publicly held shell corporation, said it signed a letter of intent to merger with Lotoquik International Ltd, a Nassau, Bahamas-based maker of video lottery machines.     Under terms of the merger agreement, Chatsworth said Lotoquik shareholders would own a majority of the surviving company.  \n',acq
'First Federal Savings Bank of Delaware said its agreement to negotiate exclusively for its sale with Oxford Financial Group has been extended until April 8 from March 18.     The company said it is in the final stages of talks with Oxford over the terms of the proposed acquisition.  Under a nonbinding letter of intent signed in June 1986, Oxford would pay 11 dlrs per First Federal share, subject to First Federal shareholder approval.  \n',acq
'Less than two months after First Interstate Bancorp withdrew its bold attempt to buy BankAmerica Corp, Chairman Joseph Pinola is still looking for a good buy, but he is also looking at ways to avoid being bought.     In a wide-ranging interview, Pinola said he\'s looking for ways to improve profitability and capital between now and 1991, \"so as to resist any potential look at us...to maintain our independence, if possible.\"     In 1991 federal regulatory changes will allow the major East Coast banks to buy banks in California.     First Interstate, the fourth largest California bank, and the nineth largest nationwide, owns 24 banks in 12 western states and has franchise operations in four additional states.     Bank industry sources say it is an attractive target for large U.S. or foreign banks, looking to quickly move into the  lucrative California market and the West Coast region.     While declining specifics on his corporate strategy, when asked if acquisitions will be part of the plan, Pinola replied, \"That\'s undoubtedly a fair statement...it would be almost naive not to think that.\"     Pinola characterized his acquisition strategy as \"opportunistic\".     He said he will look for banks in management trouble that he can get at a bargain, then add management to restore profitability, or for banks in states where First Interstate already operates, then cut costs by combining resources.     The exception, he said, would be Texas, where he said most of the banks are already well managed, but might be purchased at a discount because of the depressed regional economy.     Pinola declined comment on what circumstances might move him to rekindle his bid for BankAmerica, saying only, \"We continue to monitor and look at a lot of things and a lot of people continue to monitor and look at us.\"     Banking analysts, however, consider another First Interstate bid at BankAmerica a long shot, not likely to happen any time soon.     Pinola called his decision last month to withdraw his 3.25 billion dlr bid at the nation\'s second largest bank, \"a very, very difficult decision.\"     With that decision made, however, he acknowledged First Interstate may now have a difficult time keeping its number four position in the California banking community.     \"The competition in this state is tough,\" he said, noting CityBank\'s recent purchase of 50 financial service branches from Sears Roebuck company. \"CityBank is moving rapidly to move us down to fifth and Wells Fargo down to fourth,\" he said.     Outside California, Pinola acknowledged that Security Pacific Corp, with its recent acquisitions in Arizona, Washington and Oregon, is quickly becoming a regional competitor in areas where First Interstate has long dominated.     \"Security is, has been and continues to be a highly profitable and obviously well managed company,\" he said.     He added, however, First Interstate, at the moment, has the advantages of having owned and managed regional banks longer and has the recognition advantage of having given its regional banks a common name.     Pinola said while its coastal state banks are in good financial condition, First Interstate continues to sustain serious loan losses in its Rocky Mountain states, where energy, real estate and agriculture dominate the economy.     Asked if he thought loan losses in those areas had peaked, he said, \"I don\'t think it has bottomed out, because I think most of the problems are real estate-related and the real estate problems are going to be with us for several years.\"     Pinola said another failing economic sector, agriculture in the Midwest, has slowed expansion of First Interstate\'s franchise operation.     First Interstate has 42 franchise banks that offer First Interstate financial services in ten states.     While a year ago he was considering taking his franchise operation east of the Mississippi River, Pinola said because most of the franchise banks are now in the West, expansion into the Midwest must come first.     Calling the franchise system, \"moderately profitable,\" Pinola said, \"It is going to take a rejuvenation of the agriculture sector for us to commence franchising at the speed we were generating before the last year or two.\"     On the banking industry in general, Pinola said he thinks 1987 will be another bad year for loan losses, with only banks with minimal holdings in real estate able to improve profits.  \n',acq
'First National Bank Corp, the newly formed parent of First National Bank in Mount Clemens, Mich., and Bankers Fund Life Insurance Co, said it reached an agreement to buy a branch in Clinton Township from a nonrelated financial institution.     It said the acquisition brings to 10 the number of bank branches in Macomb County. Terms were not disclosed.     Separately, the newly formed holding company also said it named Arie Guldemond as chairman and Harold Allmacher as president and chief executive officer.  \n',acq
'First Sarasota Bancorp said its shareholders approved the acquisition of its City Commercial Bank subsidiary by First Union Corp\'s FUNC First Union National Bank of Florida.     The purchase price of the outstanding shares is about 8.6 mln dlrs.     The transaction, subject to regulatory approval, is expected to be completed during the second quarter of 1987.     After completing the City Commercial acquisition and four other acquisitions having combined assets of 248 mln dlrs, First Union will have assets of 28.6 billion dlrs.  \n',acq
'The investor group owning about 42 pct of the outstanding capital stock of The First Women\'s Bank said a cash tender offer for the bank\'s remaining outstanding shares at 11 dlrs per share expired on March three.     The investors said about 132,000 shares, or about 20 pct of the outstanding, had been tendered.  \n',acq
'Five consortia have applied to buy the French state-owned telephone equipment manufacturer Cie Generale de Constructions Telephoniques (CGCT), which will give the owners control of 16 pct of the French telephone switching market, sources close to Finance Minister Edouard Balladur said.     The French government has given itself until the end of April to decide which applicant will be accepted, they added.     While several foreign groups have said they want to gain a foothold in the French market, their potential stake in CGCT is limited to 20 pct under privatisation laws passed last year, with 80 pct to be left in French hands.     The Finance Ministry sources gave no details of the groups interested in CGCT, but several have publicly announced their candidacies.     U.S. Telecommunications giant American Telephone and Telegraph Co T.N which has been at the centre of the two-year battle for CGCT, has teamed up with the Dutch-based Philips Telecommunications Industrie B.V., a subsidiary of NV Philips Gloeilampenfabriek PGLO.AS and Societe Anonyme de Telecommunications (SAT) to present a joint bid, in association with holding company Cie du Midi SA MCDP.P and five French investment funds.     A second bid has come from the West German electronics group Siemens AG SIEG.F, which hopes to take a 20 pct stake in CGCT, with the French telecommunications Jeumont-Schneider taking the remaining 80 pct.     Sweden\'s AB LM Ericsson has also submitted a bid for the maximum 20 pct permitted, in association with French defence electronics group Matra, which would hold between 40 and 49 pct, and construction group Bouygues.     Matra has already acquired CGCT\'s private telephone business.... \n',acq
'Fletcher Challenge Ltd (FCL) Managing Director Hugh Fletcher said he was disappointed that Rada Corp Ltd had decided to sell its shares in N.Z. Forest Products Ltd (NZFP) to Australia\'s Amcor Ltd.     He said in a statement that FCL had made an offer for the 24 pct of NZFP held by Rada. He said the FCL offer was better than Amcor\'s because it would have been made to all NZFP shareholders, but he gave no further details.     Amcor and NZFP said earlier today they were merging their pulp and paper interests in a joint partnership and were increasing their existing cross-shareholdings.     The plan involves NZFP increasing its current holding in Amcor to about 20 pct from four pct. Amcor will acquire Rada\'s NZFP stake to add to its existing 11 pct and will seek statutory approval to increase its holding to 50 pct.     Rada bought its stake for 505.5 mln dlrs from Wattie Industries Ltd last year, but it has not disclosed the price to be paid by Amcor.     FCL originally launched a takeover bid for NZFP late last year with a scrip and/or cash offer at 3.90 dlrs a share, valuing the company at 1.3 billion dlrs. NZFP shares ended at 3.88 dlrs today.  \n',acq
'Foote Mineral Co said it signed a letter of intent to merge into Rio Tinto-Zinc Corp PLC for cash.     Foote, 83 pct owned by Newmont Mining Corp, said Newmont has informally indicated it would vote in favor of the Rio Tinto proposal.     Foote said terms of the agreement, including price for the proposed cash transaction, have not been released because they are subject to a continuing due diligence investigation.     The company said a definitive merger agreement is expected to be negotiated within six weeks and shareholders are expected to vote on the deal at a meeting expected to be held in June or July.  \n',acq
'President Nobuo Ito of International Telecom Japan Inc (ITJ), one of two rival firms seeking to enter Japan\'s international telecommunications market, said it will offer a stake in the company to 10 foreign firms.       But he declined to specify what share the firms would take, and tolds they would not participate in its management.     ITJ and International Digital Communications Planning Inc (IDC), in which both Cable and Wireless Plc and Pacific Telesis Group own 20 pct stakes, are set to merge into a new entity to compete against Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd.  \n',acq
'Gillette Co GS exercised an option to take a 51.2 pct stake in the French pen firm Waterman which it had previously been authorised to do by the French government, the French stockbrokers\' association (CSAC) said.     Gillette has given an undertaking to intervene on the Bourse until April 7 to prevent Waterman shares from falling below 650 francs, it added.     This compares with yesterday\'s rate of 625 francs.     Under the agreement concluded last November between Waterman owners Francine and Grace Le Foyer-Gomez and Alice Lundgren and the Gillette group, Gillette agreed to acquire 51.2 pct of the capital of Waterman at 700 francs a share.     Gillette is buying a total 180,000 shares, valuing the deal at 126 mln francs.  \n',acq
'The French government is to sell to the public its 47.42 pct direct holding in Societe Generale STGN.PA\'s regional bank subsidiary Societe Generale Alsacienne de Banque, SOGENAL, from next Monday, SOGENAL officials said.     SOGENAL, founded in 1881 and nationalised in 1982, is the leading French regional bank and has branches in Austria, Belgium, Luxembourg, East and West Germany and Switzerland.     Chairman Rene Geronimus told a news conference the share offer price, expected to be announced tomorrow by Finance Minister Edouard Balladur, would be between 110 and 130 francs.     Societe Generale, which will itself be privatised later this year, will retain its 52.58 pct majority holding in the bank, Chairman Marc Vienot said.     SOGENAL officials said they forecast 1987 consolidated group profit of around 170 mln francs after an estimated 160 mln this year and 159 mln in 1985.     SOGENAL\'s privatisation will be preceded by a capital increase to 320 mln francs from 263 mln, earning about 250 mln francs in new funds. Its shares will be divided by eight, giving a capital of 12.8 mln shares of 25 francs nominal.     The bank will be listed on the Nancy stock exchange, in line with the Finance Ministry and government\'s aim of a regional operation, Geronimus said.     He said he was hoping for shareholders to total around 30,000 to 35,000 against the 12,500 before nationalisation. Ten pct of the capital to be floated will be reserved for employees with the rest offered to the public. There will not be a share reserved for foreign investors. \"This is too small an operation and anyway they will be able to buy shares in France,\" he said.     Stockbroker sources said that a likely share offer price of 120 francs would value SOGENAL at 1.5 billion francs.     Geronimus said the bank\'s future aim would be to reinforce its existing strong points, with no major projects planned apart from the opening soon of a Basle branch.     SOGENAL is the only French bank in Austria, it set up the first foreign exchange dealing room outside Paris at its Strasbourg headquarters in 1985, and is the only foreign banking subsidiary to be a broker on the Zurich Bourse.     The government\'s banking adviser for the operation was Banque Privee de Gestion Financiere, BPGF, owned by French financier Pierre Moussa\'s Pallas group, assisted by Britain\'s Hambros Bank Ltd.  \n',acq
'State-owned Cie Generale d\'Electricite\'s electrical contracting unit CGEE ALSTHOM has taken a 34 stake in the U.S. Computer firm ESCA Corp, CGEE ALSTHOM chairman Philippe Boisseau told a press conference.     According to an agreement in principle between the two companies CGEE ALSTHOM could take a majority stake in the future but no time-scale has been set, he added.     ESCA, which had a turnover of 13.6 mln dlrs in 1986 and is expected to see this rise to 20 mln this year, is one of the leading U.S. Suppliers of electric despatching and telecontrol systems.  \n',acq
'Finance Minister Edouard Balladur, Industry Minister Alain Madelin and Telecommunications Minister Gerard Longuet met for more than an hour today to discuss the imminent sale of the French telephone switching group Cie Generale de Constructions Telephoniques, a spokesman for Longuet said.     No decision was announced as a result of the meeting, and the French government has given itself until the end of next month to choose between the candidates.     The sale of CGCT, which controls 16 pct of France\'s telephone market, has been priced at 500 mln francs, and three international consortia are battling for the right to buy it.     West Germany\'s Siemens AG SIEG.F has teamed up with the French group Jeumont-Schneider, in opposition to a bid from the U.S. Group ATT T.N and the Dutch Philips Telecommunications BV PGLO.AS in association with the French telecommunications firm SAT Societe Anonyme de Telecommunications.     A third bid has been lodged by Sweden\'s AB LM Ericsson ERIC.ST, allied with French defence electronics group Matra MATR.PA and Bouygues SA BOUY.PA.  \n',acq
'Universal Furniture Ltd said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it had increased its stake in Bench Craft Inc common stock to 2,548,975 shares or 45.3 pct of the total outstanding.     Universal said its Universal Furniture Industries N.V. unit bought 235,750 Bench Craft shares March 4 in the over-the-counter market.  \n',acq
'Galveston Resources Ltd said it agreed in principle for an option to earn up to a 50 pct interest from Hemlo Gold Mines Inc in certain mining properties known as the Interlake Property, subject to regulatory approvals.     Galveston said it will earn up to a 50 pct interest by spending a minimum of one mln dlrs in exploration and development work by December 31, 1989.     It expects work will commence shortly and continue during the 1987 exploration season.     Galveston also said it granted Hemlo Gold options to acquire up to two mln Galveston shares.     It said the options can be exercised at 10 dlrs a share up to December 31, 1987, then at 12.50 dlrs a share until December 31, 1988, and then at 15 dlrs a share until December 31, 1989.     Separately, Galveston said it agreed in principle with Noranda Inc unit Noranda Explorations Ltd for an option to earn up to a 50 pct interest in a major mineral property located at the Baie Verte Peninsula, Newfoundland.     Galveston can earn a 50 pct interest by spending six mln dlrs in exploration and development work on the property by December 31, 1989.     The company also said it granted Noranda an option to purchase two mln Galveston shares.     The options can be exercised at 10 dlrs a share until December 31, 1987, then at 12.50 dlrs a share until December 31, 1988, and then at 15 dlrs a share until December 31, 1989.  \n',acq
'Gateway Sporting Goods Co said it acquired all of the shares of stock of Innovative Dental Services Inc for an undisclosed amount of cash.     Gateway said the acquired company has contracts with 102 dentists in 144 locations.  \n',acq
'Gencorp Inc said it filed suit against the unsolicited 100 dlr-a-share tender offer of Wagner and Brown and AFG INdustries.     Gencorp said it is seeking an injunction against the offer because it is violates federal securities laws and margin regulations.     Gencorp also said its board is carefully studying the offer and will make a decision on whether or not shareholders should accept or reject it by March 31.  \n',acq
'Generale de Banque SA GENB.BR and Heller Overseas Corp of Chicago have each taken 50 pct stakes in factoring company SA Belgo-Factors, Generale de Banque said in a statement.     It gave no financial details of the transaction. SA Belgo-Factors\' turnover in 1986 was 17.5 billion Belgian francs.  \n',acq
'The placement of the German federal government\'s 25.6 pct stake in utility Veba AG VEBG.F would probably take place early next week, banking sources said.     Share dealers said speculation had arisen in the early pre-bourse market that the Veba announcement could come as early as today. But one banking source, though confirming that most of the details had been worked out, said the chances of an announcement today were about nil. He had no price details.     The 10 mln shares on offer are expected to bring a cash call in Germany for well over two billion marks. The share was around 253 marks today after a 6.50 drop to 252 yesterday.  \n',acq
'GNB Inc said it joined with the management of the French company Compagnie Francaise d\'Electro-Chimie to purchase the company for an undisclosed amount.     The French company, which produces lead-acid batteries, had sales in 1986 of 75 mln dlrs, GNB said.  \n',acq
'Golden Rule Resources Ltd and Goldsil Resources Ltd said they had agreed to merge.     The merged company will issue to each Golden Rule shareholder 1-1/2 shares and one warrant. The warrant will be for a term of two years. Payment of 3.10 dlrs and delivery of two warrants will entitle the shareholder to one additional share of the merged company, the companies said.     Each Goldsil shareholder will receive one share and one-half warrant. The warrant will be for a term of two years. Payment of 3.10 dlrs and delivery of two warrants will entitle the shareholder to one additional share of the merged company.  \n',acq
'Consolidated Grandview Inc said it acquired a 60 pct stake in All Ticket Group PLC, of London, for undisclosed terms. The seller was also undisclosed.     All Ticket is a special events travel company with exclusive European rights to UAL Inc UAL\'s United Airlines Apollo system, booking all United Airlines flights in Britain and Europe. All Ticket and its subsidiaries will also co-sponsor various events this year including the British Open golf tournament and rowing\'s Henley Regatta.     Its 1986 revenues totaled 12 mln Canadian dlrs.      \n',acq
'An investor group led by New York investor George Soros said it was dissatisfied with Fairchild Industries Inc management and was considering boosting its holdings to as much as 49.9 pct of the aerospace and aviation company\'s outstanding stock.     The group already controls 1,647,481 Fairchild Industries shares or 11.5 pct of the total outstanding.     The group said it filed on Wednesday with federal antitrust regulators for advance clearance to buy enough additional shares to increase its total stake to up to 49.9 pct of the total outstanding stock.     The group said its representatives had met with Fairchild Industries officials to inform them \"that they do not believe management has been successful in enhancing or protecting shareholder values.\"     It said it was considering the additional share purchases to enable it to \"assert a greater degree of influence over the future management and policies of the issuer.\"     It said a decision on the specific level of share ownership it would seek depended on market prices, future changes in management policies, available financial resources and other factors.     The group said it also reserved the right to pursue other measures intended to influence Fairchild management and policies, either alone or in concert with other investors.     The group includes Soros and Quantum Fund, an offshore investment firm headquartered in Curacao, Netherlands Antilles that is advised by Soros.     The group said that since its last SEC filing, made Jan. 2, it had purchased no additional Fairchild shares and had sold 6,700 shares on the New York Stock Exchange Jan. 19.     A Fairchild Industries official later said Soros had told the company he was not dissatisfied with its management.     \"Contrary to the filing, Mr. Soros has told the company today that he is not dissatisfied with management,\" Fairchild\'s Bill Fulwider tolds.     However, Fulwider said the company would have nothing to say at this time about Soros\' disclosure that he may buy up enough additional Fairchild shares to hold as much as 49.9 pct of the company\'s outstanding stock.  \n',acq
'Guardian-Morton Shulman Precious Metals Inc said Morton Shulman and Guardman Investment Management Services Inc agreed in principle for Andrew Sarlos to make a takeover bid for all special shares and series II warrants of Guardian-Morton, subject to regulatory approval and completion of definitive documentation.     Guardman Investment, current manager and owner of all common shares of Guardian-Morton, also agreed to sell the common and its management agreement to a company controlled by Sarlos if the takeover bid is successful, Guardian-Morton said.     Price to be offered for the Guardian-Morton special shares under the takeover bid will be 90 pct of the net asset value of the special shares at the time of the bid, and two dlrs for each series II warrant, the company said.     Guardian-Morton said the takeover bid will be conditional on Sarlos acquiring at least 90 pct of the special shares and 90 pct of the series II warrants, when combined the number of special shares and warrants owned by the offeror at the time of the bid.     Investment companies managed by Sarlos currently own slightly less than 10 pct of Guardian-Morton\'s special shares.  \n',acq
'Guinness Plc GUIN.L , the brewing group, has challenged a 5.2 mln stg payment to a U.S. Lawyer who says he organised its controversial takeover of Scotch whisky maker The Distillers Co Plc.     But attorneys for lawyer Thomas Ward, a member of the Guinness board, told a court yesterday in the Channel Island of Jersey that Ward saw the payment as his reward for services in last year\'s 2.7 billion stg takeover.     Britain\'s Department of Trade and Industry is investigating the takeover.     Guinness says its former chairman Ernest Saunders and Ward \"breached their fiduciary duty\" in authorising the payment to Ward, via a Jersey-based company, Marketing and Acquisitions Consultants and has gone to the Jersey court to recover it.     MAC said in defence documents that Ward was the main negotiator in the battle for Distillers against rival bidder Argyll AYLL.L Group Plc.     \"The bid would not have been successful but for the ... Services of Mr Ward,\" MAC attorneys said in the documents submitted in court. \"The payment was, in all the circumstances, reasonable, proper and fully earned.\"  \n',acq
'Guinness Plc GUIN.L will seek an injunction in the U.K. High Court today to freeze the assets of former Chairman Ernest Saunders in its attempts to recover 5.2 mln stg paid to a Jersey company as part of the company\'s takeover battle for Distillers Co Plc, a spokesman said.     He said the court move aimed to freeze Saunders\' assets up to the value of the sum it wanted to recover. It was uncertain whether the court would reach any decision on the request today. Guinness said last week it planned to take legal action to recover the funds, paid to non-executive director Thomas Ward via the Jersey company.     Lawyers representing Ward have said he saw the funds as his reward for services performed during the takeover of Distillers.     Guinness is also planning a resolution at the annual meeting in May to remove both Saunders and Ward from the company\'s board.  \n',acq
'Guinness Plc GUIN.L said it has started court proceedings against former chairman and chief executive Ernest Saunders and non-executive director Thomas Ward for recovery of 5.2 mln stg.     The money was paid to Ward via Marketing and Acquisition Consultants Ltd in Jersey.     Guinness said earlier it would propose a resolution at the annual meeting in May to remove Saunders and Ward as directors of the company.  Earlier this month, lawyers for Ward told a Jersey court that Ward saw the payment as his reward for services in last year\'s takeover battle for Distillers Co Plc.     Guinness has said that both men breached their fiduciary duty in authorising the payment.     Saunders resigned from his executive positions at Guinness in January in the aftermath of a government enquiry into share dealings during the battle for Distillers but retained his position on the board.     No spokesman for Guinness was immediately available for comment on the statement.  \n',acq
'Guinness Plc GUIN.L said that as part of a new strategy for the company it will be selling its retail interests to concentrate resources on developing its international beverage businesses.     Among the firms to be sold are Martin\'s and Gordon Drummond pharmacies, the 7-Eleven convenience stores, speciality U.S. Food importer Richter Brothers and the health products company Nature\'s Best/DSL.     Guinness said in a statement that the company\'s strength was in its well known beer and spirits brands.     Several had good brand development potential, including Gleneagles, Champneys, Cranks, Hediard and and Guinness publications.     Guinness shares were trading at 323p after the announcement after closing yesterday at 317p.  \n',acq
'Great Universal Stores Plc GUS.L said it has made an agreed offer for Pantherella Plc, valuing the company at 8.2 mln stg and each Pantherella ordinary share at 205 pence.     The offer is based on eight new \"A\" non voting ordinary shares in GUS plus 95.16 stg for every 100 ordinary Pantherella.     The new GUS shares will not receive the eight pence per share interim dividend in respect of the year ending March 1987, the statement said.     GUS has received irrevocable undertakings to accept the offer in respect of 39.1 pct of Pantherella shares from the company\'s directors and their families.     The Pantherella board estimates the company, which manufactures socks, will show a 1986 pretax profit of about 690,000 stg.  \n',acq
'Hanson Trust Plc HNSN.L said it will sell its Finlays confectionery, tobacco and newsagent business to a specially formed company, Finlays Plc for an estimated 16.9 mln stg cash.     The chain of stores was acquired when Hanson took over Imperial Group Plc last year.  \n',acq
'Hanson Trust Plc HNSN.L said its U.S. Subsidiary, Hanson Industries Inc, is to sell PCR Inc, a speciality chemicals unit, for 6.25 mln dlrs cash to Chemical Partners Inc.     PCR had sales of 13.2 mln dlrs in fiscal 1986 and an operating loss of 381,000 dlrs.  \n',acq
'Hawker Siddeley Canada Inc said that, due to poor market conditions for railway freight car manufacturing, it plans to sell its Trenton Works division in Trenton, Nova Scotia.     Hawker Siddeley said it set aside a provision of 7.7 mln dlrs for the proposed sale.     It also said lower 1986 earnings were due to much lower earnings in transportation equipment and losses in steel castings and forgings, which offset gains in the mining sector and improvements in forestry equipment.     Hawker Siddeley also said demand for new railway equipment was limited with export sales frequently restrained by customers\' financing difficulties.     Demand for steel castings and wheels for Canadian railways continued to be very depressed with maintenance requirements at the lowest level in the past decade.     However, there was demand for industrial casting due to increased hydro-electric power generation, the company said.     The company said manufacturing of mining machinery and tunnelling equipment showed greatly improved results in the U.S. and export markets, mainly China and India.     The Orenda division maintained a high level of activity in aircraft engine repair and overhaul and in the manufacture of engine components.     Sawmill equipment and skidder operations were affected by a strike in British Columbia and the extended debate on U.S. imports of Canadian lumber, but there were encouraging signs at yearend, the company said.  \n',acq
'The Hearst Corp is buying the Houston Chronicle from Houston Endowment Inc for 400 mln dlrs.     The announcement was made jointly by Frank Bennack Jr, president and chief executive officer of Hearst, and Richard Johnson, president of the Chronicle.     The Houston Endowment is selling the paper to comply with federal tax laws requiring charitable institutions to divest themselves of profit-making subsidiaries by 1989.     The Chronicle has a daily circulation of over 425,000 and is in competition with the Houston Post, owned by the Toronto Sun Publishing Corp, with a circulation of about 316,000.     The acquisition gives Hearst its biggest newspaper holding in Texas, where the California-based publisher already owns papers in San Antonio, Beaumont and Laredo.     The chain also owns, among others, the flagship San Francisco Examiner, the Los Angeles Herald Examiner and the Seattle Post-Intelligencer.  \n',acq
'H.J. Heinz HNZ.N chairman Tony O\'Reilly would be interested in buying Guinness PLC GUIN.L\'s brewery division if it were for sale, a spokesman said.     The spokesman, reacting to Irish and British press reports, said \"He continues to be interested were the group to offer the brewery side of Guinness for sale. But he has not put together a consortium, nor has he been buying shares.\"     He was quoted by the Irish magazine Business and Finance as saying he would be interested if it came on the market and that he had the support of two international banks if he decided such a purchase might be worthwhile.     In the magazine article, he suggested that if brewing profits were calculated to be in the region of 80 mln punts, the asking price would not be higher than 800 mln punts.     \"A multiple of ten times earnings would be the top whack for the brewing division in the current Guinness situation,\" he said.     \"This would mean an expensive exercise, right on the edge, but not impossible,\" he added.     The deal would mean buying the Dublin, London, Nigerian and Malaysian breweries because \"It could only be sold as an integral unit if it was going to be sold at all,\" O\'Reilly said.  \n',acq
'Applied chemicals group Henkel KGaA HNKG.F said it is selling its Hamburg vegetable oil and fats subsidiary Noblee und Thoerl GmbH to Oelmuehle Hamburg AG.     A company spokesman declined to give the purchase price. Noblee, a supplier of specialised refined oils and fats to the food processing industry, had turnover of 161 mln marks last year.     A Henkel statement said the divestment was part of the company\'s strategy of concentrating on its core businesses. For Oelmuehle, the acquisition of Noblee means access to new markets, the statement added.  \n',acq
'Henry Ansbacher Holdings Plc said it has acquired a 51 pct interest in the U.S. Retail and general corporate insurance broker Adams and Porter Inc.     The move is the first step in building a new international insurance broking group following the appointment of a new management team for its Seascope Insurance Holdings unit.     Ansbacher said A and P has exciting growth potential, particularly on the east coast of the U.S. And has an annual revenue of more than four mln dlrs. Ansbacher shares were up 4-1/2p to 90-1/2, helped by the announcement earlier today of a 1986 pretax profit rise to 5.56 mln stg from 2.74 mln in 1985.  \n',acq
'The price of Hongkong and Shanghai Hotels Ltd SHLH.HK\'s stock soared on speculation of a takeover battle between major shareholders the Kadoorie family and the Evergo Industrial Enterprise Ltd EVGH.HK group, stock brokers said.     They noted heavy buying in Hk Hotel shares after an announcement by Evergo\'s China Entertainment and Land Investment Co Ltd unit that it bought about 20 pct of Hk Hotels from the firm\'s deputy chairman David Liang for 1.06 billion dlrs. The stock rose 12 H.K. Dlrs to 62 dlrs today.     Thomas Lau, Evergo\'s executive director, declined comment on whether the group is seeking a further stake in Hk Hotels. But he tolds the group will hold the 20 pct stake bought from Liang as long term investment.     He said Evergo \"was attracted by the underlying strength of Hk Hotels.\"     Analysts said Evergo may be looking for a possible redevelopment of the Peninsula Hotel, one of Asia\'s best known hotels, and another site on Hong Kong island. Both are owned by Hk Hotels.     Lai Sun Garment Co ltd yesterday said it acquired a 10 pct stake in Hk Hotels from Liang for 530 mln dlrs.     Lau denied any link between China Entertainment and Lai Sun on their acquisitions of the Hk Hotels stake.     \"It is purely coincidence,\" he said.     But analysts were not so certain, saying that the Evergo group, which has a reputation as a corporate raider, may team up with Lai Sun Garment for a takeover.     Lau also denied any contact with the Kadoorie family, which analysts estimate has more than 20 pct of Hk Hotels. Michael Kadoorie is chairman of Hk Hotels.     Lau said two representatives of Evergo will be nominated to the Hk Hotels board.     A source close to the Kadoorie family said the family has not considered any countermoves so far.     Analysts said it would be difficult for Evergo and the Kadoorie family to cooperate because of different management styles.     \"Evergo may want to split up the hotel management and property developments of Hk Hotels but that strategy may not fit the conservative Kadoorie family,\" said an analyst who asked not to be named.     Another analyst noted the price of Hk Hotels had been distorted by the takeover talks because its net asset value is only worth about 50 dlrs a share. The offers by Evergo and Lai Sun were for 53 dlrs a share, though that is well below the current trading price.     Trading was suspended today in shares of Lai Sun, Evergo, China Entertainment and the group\'s associate Chinese Estates Ltd.     Chinese Estates lost 25 cents to 20.15 dlrs yesterday, China Entertainment five to 8.60 dlrs and Evergo one to 74 cents. Lai Sun gained 50 cents to 70.50 dlrs.  \n',acq
'Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corp HKBH.HK is close to a deal on the sale of a commercial building in Hong Kong\'s Mongkok business district, a bank spokesman said.     He said the 21-storey Wayfoong Plaza was likely to be sold for about 280 mln H.K. Dlrs but declined to identify the buyer.     The spokesman gave no further details.  \n',acq
'Dutch steel concern Hoogovens Groep BV said it had reached agreement with NV Philips Gloeielampenfabrieken PGLO.AS on its takeover of Cirex, a specialised Philips precision wax moulding unit.     Neither party would reveal financial details of the deal, initially announced in October.     Hoogovens said Cirex turnover had grown in recent years to 30 mln guilders in 1986 and it expected further expansion.     The unit delivers mainly to the car industry.     Hoogovens said the acquisition would strengthen its position as a supplier to industry of high-value metal products.  \n',acq
'Bass Plc BASS.L and Horizon Travel Plc said terms have been agreed for an offer worth around 94.8 mln stg for Horizon by Bass.     The offer values each Horizon share at some 0.213 of a Bass ordinary share, or 190p. This is based on a price of 892p, the Bass share quotation at 1630 gmt on April 2.     Horizon said its board and financial advisers consider the offer to be fair and reasonable and the board will unanimously recommend acceptance to its shareholders.     Horizon shares jumped 23p to 188 after the announcement while Bass shares dipped 13p to 879.     Bass has for some time regarded overseas holidays as an area for expansion and in pursuit of this objective, acquired a 25.6 pct holding in Horizon in 1985 when it set up the jointly owned hotel company.     Both Bass and Horizon said that Bass\'s resources will enable Horizon\'s businesses to expand strongly this year.     On March 30 Bass said it had agreed to sell its Pontins U.K. Holiday camps to a newly formed private company, Pontins Ltd, for some 57.5 mln stg.  \n',acq
'Hudson Valley Patrol Inc said it agreed to acquire privately held Federal Protection Services Inc, a Palm Beach, Fla., security firm, for 200,000 common shares and other considerations.     Hudson Valley, which provides guard and patrol services in upstate N.Y., said Federal Protection Services provides investigation, uniformed guard and armoured truck services to banks, corporations and residential communities in southern Florida.     The company said it will issue 200,000 shares of its common at closing and additional shares based on Federal Protection\'s pretax earnings over the next three years.     Closing is subject to setting a definitive agreement, it said.  \n',acq
'Hudson\'s Bay Co said it signed a letter of intent to sell its Hudson\'s Bay Wholesale unit to a private investment group. Terms were not disclosed.     The company said Normal Paul, a member of the private investment group, will head Hudson\'s Bay Wholesale management.     The unit\'s existing management group, headed by Ron McArthur, will also participate in ownership, the company said without elaborating.     The wholesale unit is a major distributor of tobacco, confectionary and other products through 34 wholesale and 28 vending branches in Canada. 1986 sales were 798 mln dlrs.     Hudson\'s Bay said the sale of its wholesaling unit is part of a program to concentrate financial and management resources on its core business of department stores and real estate.  \n',acq
'The directors of Hughes Tool Co HT said they would recommend to shareholders that they reject a merger with Baker International Corp BKO today.     Hughes vice-president Ike Kerridge said the recommendation would be put to shareholders at a meeting scheduled for 10 A.M. Local time (1600 GMT) to discuss the proposed merger.     Kerridge said the board met yesterday to discuss the merger but decided against it.     The Hughes board objected to a U.S. Department of Justice requirement that Baker sell off several specialised subsidiaries in businesses related to oil-drilling.     The Hughes board last week indicated that it might cancel the merger because of the Department of Justice requirement.     The board of directors of the California-based Baker had approved the merger. On February 17 Baker said it had signed an agreement to sell one of the subsidiaries.     The companies had been given until April 22 to comply with the Justice Department requirement, Kerridge said.  \n',acq
'An investor group led by members of the Hunt family of Dallas, Texas, told the Securities and Exchange Commission it has acquired a 6.2 pct stake in Comdata Network Inc CDN and may try to influence company policy.     The investor group, led by Rosewood Financial Inc, said it opposes a company recapitalization plan worked out between Comdata and Mason Best Co, a Texas investment firm, which last reported holding about 9.5 pct of the company\'s stock.     The Hunt group said it offered on March 3 to buy the entire 5.3 pct stake held by dissident shareholder Donald Carter at 14 dlrs each, but has received no reply as of yesterday.     Rosewood, which is owned by the Caroline Hunt Trust Estate, whose trustees include Margaret Hunt Hill, also said it has notified the Federal Trade Commission of its intent to buy between 15 and 25 pct of Comdata\'s common stock.     Under federal law, it cannot buy more than 15 pct of Comdata\'s stock until a 15 to 30 day waiting period is over, unless the FTC gives it early approval.     Under the proposed Comdata recapitalization plan, the company would buy up to 10 mln of its common shares at 13.25 dlrs each.     Mason Best, which belongs to CNI Parnters, a Texas partnership, would not tender any of its stake under the plan, but would instead buy another one mln Comdata common shares and would get representation on the company\'s board.     The Hunt group said it has told Comdata that it considers required payments under the plan, such as a 1.5 mln dlr fee and the issuance of a warrant to buy 500,000 common shares to be a waste of the company\'s assets.     The Hunt group, which also includes securities Texas firms Cypress Partners L.P and Driftwood Ltd, said it spent 15.2 mln dlrs on its 1,197,700 Comdata common shares.  \n',acq
'Imperial Continental Gas Association ICGS.L, IC Gas, said its board is not making a recommendation on the partial tender offfer at 710p per share announced by Tractebel SA and Groupe Bruxelles Lambert SA.     At the same time, however, the board would not recommend a general offer for all the shares at a price of 710p, the statement added.     Shareholders wondering whether to tender either to the Tractebel consortium or to the rival 700p per share partial offer from SHV Holdings NV should consult professional advisers.  \n',acq
'Corporate raider Carl Icahn acknowledged that he is one of the targets of an investigation by the Securities and Exchange Commission into possible violations of securities laws.     Icahn, who heads and controls Trans World Airlines Inc TWA, made the acknowledgement in a filing TWA was required to make with the SEC disclosing its 14.8 pct stake in USAir Group.     The SEC issued a formal order launching the private investigation on Nov 12, 1986, Icahn said in the SEC filing.     The order empowers SEC investigators to try to find out whether any persons, including Icahn, violated securities laws and related rules, Icahn said.     Specifically, the probe is examining the acquisition and subsequent sale of more than five pct of the stock of certain unspecified companies, he said.     Federal law requires individuals or groups of individuals who have made shareholder agreements, to disclose stakes in companies of at least five pct within 10 days.     Icahn has acknowledged that he has been subpoenaed in connection with SEC probes, but this is the first time he has disclosed that he is among those being investigated.     By making the disclosure in a filing with the SEC, which is obviously already aware of its own probe, Icahn was also alerting current and potential shareholders of TWA.     It is not uncommon for companies which are aware that they or their officers are the targets of government probes to acknowledge the existence of the otherwise secret investigations to fulfill their legal disclosure requirements to their shareholders.     Icahn said the SEC is looking into whether he and others whom he did not name violated securities laws by acquiring and selling more than five pct of a company\'s stock.     SEC investigations into those kinds of possible securities law violations have been spawned by the agency\'s widening probe into the Wall Street insider trading scandal, according to published reports.     Making late filings of 13D forms, which disclose the amount of stock over five pct an investor has in a company, or making no filing at all could indicate a scheme to \"warehouse\" shares of stock.     In a warehousing scheme, a group of investors acting in concert would each amass stock in the company without disclosing that they have an agreement among them.     By failing to disclose that they are acting together the market is unware of the amount of stock of a company that is controlled by a group acting in concert.     Last year, the SEC charged members of the wealthy Belzberg family of Canada with taking part in a warehousing scheme while it was accumulating stock in Ashland Oil Inc.  \n',acq
'The Icelandic government said it will privatise the state-owned bank Utvegsbanki, the country\'s second largest. Parliament also granted an 800 mln crown cash infusion to ease cash flow problems that arose when the bank lost 600 mln crowns in a shipping firm bankruptcy two years ago.     Utvegsbanki director Halldor Gudbjarnarson tolds the decision to privatise the bank was a relief and that foreign banks had already expressed interest in taking a share.     A quarter of the one billion crown total share capital will be available to foreign investors, government officials said.  \n',acq
'Imperial Chemical Industries Plc ICI.L said it had today placed its 19.4 pct stake in Lister and Co Plc with L Messel and Co and that it had now been placed widely among institutions.     Lister is a manufacturer, dyer and finisher of cotton, silk wool and man-made fibres.  \n',acq
'Industrial Equity Ltd (IEL) unit Acmex Holdings Ltd said it proposed to make a formal takeover offer for all the issued capital of Cheetham Ltd, a producer of salt, animal feed and seeds.     Acmex said in a statement it would offer one share for every two Cheetham shares or 3.40 dlrs cash for each share.     Acmex said it was presently entitled to 5.1 mln Cheetham shares or 16.85 pct of its 30.27 mln issued shares.     The scrip offer values Cheetham at about 110 mln dlrs, based on Acmex\'s current price of 7.20 dlrs, and the cash offer at about 104 mln. Cheetham last traded at 3.10 dlrs.  \n',acq
'Finland\'s medical group Instrumentarium Oy INMR.HE said it has acquired electronics components importers and marketers Ferrado Oy and Insele Oy, subsidiaries of Finland\'s electronics group Nokia Oy NOKS.HE.     It said in a statement Ferrado and Insele will be merged into Instrumentarium\'s Professional Electronics and Information Systems Division.     It did not disclose a price for the acquisitions but said it had issued 30,000 restricted B shares as partial payment to Nokia.  \n',acq
'British package courier Interlink Express Plc does not plan to bid for the whole or part of   Purolator Courier Corp PCC.N, a spokesman said.     \"There is no intention of making any sort of approach to Purolator,\" the spokesman tolds, adding, \"it would be a case of David versus Goliath.\"     Interlink shares started trading in the U.K. Unlisted Securities Market in October 1986. It posted pre-tax profits of 2.13 mln stg on turnover of 9.6 mln stg in the six months to December 31, 1986. Purolator last year topped turnover of 465 mln dollars, the spokesman said. between Purolator and Interlink in view of a takeover or participation. He categorically denied press reports suggesting Interlink was developing a buyout bid.     The reports said the proposed bid would be a price above the 35 dlrs per share offered by E.F. Hutton LBO Inc. The Hutton offer expires tomorrow.     The spokesman said Interlink was seeking to expand business, first in continental Europe and later in the U.S. But the company did not expect to gain foothold in the U.S. Market until 1989 at the earliest, he said.  \n',acq
'Internatio-Mueller NV INTN.AS said it will acquire Promac Controls Inc of Canada but declined to comment on the amount of the payment, which will be in cash.     Promac, which produces measurement and regulating equipment, has a work force of 50 and had 1986 turnover of five mln guilders, an Internatio spokesman said.     He said the takeover fits into the company\'s drive for expansion in the U.S and Canada and further acquisitions are possible.     Promac Controls will be part of Internatio\'s electrotechnical sector.  \n',acq
'International Fine Foods Inc said it has acquired 2001 Distributors Inc of West Babylon, N.Y., for 875,000 common shares, plus contingent shares based on future earnings.     2001 distributes fresh-squeezed juices and had a loss on sales of about one mln dlrs in 1986, its first year of operation.  \n',acq
'Inverness Petroleum Ltd said it acquired the oil and gas assets of its controlling shareholder Silverton Resources Ltd for 26.4 mln dlrs, effective March 3, 1987.     Inverness said it issued 2,640,000 class A convertible retractable redeemable preferred shares in exchange for the assets, which include all Silverton\'s oil and gas properties, undeveloped acreage and its shares of Australian subsidiary S.R.L. Exploration Pty Ltd.     The preferred shares were immediately retracted for cash, the company said.     The transaction resulted in a discharge of Silverton\'s bank debt of 21.0 mln dlrs and a three mln dlr loan to Inverness from Silverton, Inverness said.     As a result of the acquisition, Inverness has bank debt of 18.0 mln dlrs, it said.  \n',acq
'Halcyon Investments, a New York risk arbitrage and securities dealing partnership, told the Securities and Exchange Commission it has acquired 288,000 shares of Cyclops Corp, or 7.1 pct of the total outstanding.     Halcyon said it bought the stake for 26.1 mln dlrs as part of its ordinary risk arbitrage and securities trading business. Other than that, the firm said there was no specific purpose in its purchases.     Halcyon said it might buy more stock or sell some or all of its current stake. It said it bought the bulk of its stake between Feb 6 and March 13.  \n',acq
'One of a pair of private investors in Frost and Sullivan Inc told the Securities and Exchange Commission he increased his stake in the firm by about two pct, to 15.4 pct.     He is Theodore Cross, Princeton, N.J., editor of Business and Society Review.     The other investor is Mason Slaine, Cos Cob, Mass, president of Dealers\' Digest Inc.  He holds a 3.3 pct stake.     Cross told the SEC he bought the new shares at between 7.75 and 8.0 dlrs.  \n',acq
'Companies will henceforth be able to own stakes in banks, but these should not constitute a \"dominant\" holding, an Italian government committee ruled.     The Interministerial Committee on Credit and Savings, headed by Treasury Minister Giovanni Goria, said its decision reflected the \"need to safeguard the principle of separation between banks and non-financial concerns.\"     It did not quantify what might constitute a \"dominant\" holding.     The committee also set conditions for the allocation of credits by banks to companies or individuals holding stakes in them, and stipulates conditions under which the Bank of Italy could exercise its powers of control in the case of stakes held by banks in companies or other banks.     Under the ruling, credits given by banks or their subsidiaries to groups or individuals holding five pct or more of the bank\'s capital must not exceed defined limits.     The value of credits given cannot exceed either one-fifth of the combined capital and reserves of the bank itself or two-fifths of the value of the stake owned in the bank by the group or individual concerned.     Exceptions to these conditions include credits to concerns in which the bank itself has a stake and to branches of foreign banks. Credits made by foreign companies or banks to subsidiaries which have their legal base in Italy will also be excluded from the conditions.     The Bank of Italy will request banks to insert rules in their statutes to ensure that companies or individuals holding five pct or more of the bank\'s capital are not given privileged treatment with regard to credit allocation and terms.     With regard to bank holdings in companies, the Bank of Italy can exercise supervisory controls when information on a bank\'s consolidated activities show single shareholdings in a company or another bank of 25 pct or more, owned directly or indirectly.     Such controls can also be exercised even if the stake held is below 25 pct if it can be considered a controlling interest.     The controls will not be exercised in cases where the value of the bank\'s stake in a concern is below the lesser of two predefined limits.     These limits are set at 15 billion lire or two pct of the total assets of the parent company of the shareholding bank.  \n',acq
'Italy\'s state-owned Banca Nazionale Del Lavoro-BNL said it is negotiating to buy a West German bank as part of its foreign expansion policy.     BNL president Nerio Nesi told a news conference the Italian bank was currently involved in talks but declined to name the German institution.     He said the takeover move could be seen as BNL\'s reply to Deutsche Bank AG DBKG.F, which entered the Italian market in December 1986, with the purchase of BankAmerica BACN subsidiary Banca D\'America e D\'Italia.     Nesi said BNL had also approved a 200 mln dlr credit line to the Soviet Union aimed at enabling Soviet companies to pay for Italian imports. He gave no further details.     BNL officials said the group had also decided to increase its activities in the Soviet Union by opening a representative office in Moscow this month through its subsidiary Sogecred, which specialises in Italian-Soviet trade.  \n',acq
'Italy\'s Ferruzzi SpA has taken a 67 pct stake in Spanish sunflower seed and cotton mill Cooperativa Agricola del Guadalete SA (GUADALCO), sources at GUADALCO said.     The Italian firm\'s Spanish subsidiary, Ferruzzi Espana SA, took the majority equity stake, with the remaining 33 pct retained by GUADALCO.     Ferruzzi plans to set up a sugar division and import some 30,000 tonnes of industrial sugar from its French factories in its first year of operation.     GUADALCO has a processing capacity of 250 tonnes a day of sunflower seeds and 12,000 tonnes a day of raw cotton.  \n',acq
'Jacobs Suchard AG said it acquired a \"comfortable majority\" interest in its takeover bid for Cote d\'Or SA, Belgium\'s leading producer of chocolate.     In a statement, Jacobs said it had acquired all the shares tendered by the time its offer expired on March 30. The offer, for 100 pct of Cote d\'Or at 8,050 Belgian francs per ordinary share, was agreed with the Belgian firm\'s board.     A Jacobs spokesman declined to specify the size of the majority stake and said Jacobs had not decided what it would do about acquiring the outstanding shares.  \n',acq
'Jannock Ltd said it acquired a 50 pct interest in Intercon Security Ltd for five mln dlrs and Intercon founders Brian Legge and Richard Grange will hold the remaining 50 pct and will continue to manage the company.     Intercon Security, employing 850 people, provides a full range of security equipment and services, Jannock said.  \n',acq
'Japan has sought to assure the U.S. It is not trying to keep foreign equity in a new Japanese international telecommunications company below the legal limit of 33 pct, a Post and Telecommunications ministry official said.     In a letter sent yesterday, Postal Minister Shunjiro Karasawa told U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige that the ministry does not object to foreign participation by those U.S. Firms that have expressed interest.     But it does oppose any foreign international telecommunications carrier having a management role, he said.     The move appears to be an effort to dampen U.S. Opposition to the planned merger of two rival firms seeking to compete with the current monopoly Kokusai Denwa Denshin Co Ltd, and to reduce the share held in any KDD rival by U.K.\'s Cable and Wireless Plc CAWL.L, industry analysts and diplomats said.     One of the rival firms, International Telecom Japan Inc (ITJ) has offered a stake in the company to eight U.S. Firms including General Electric Co GE, Ford Motor Co F and Citibank NA CCI), and two European companies, ITJ president Nobuo Ito said yesterday.     Cable and Wireless holds a 20 pct share in a second potential KDD rival, International Digital Communications Planning Inc, along with C Itoh and Co. Merrill Lynch and Co Inc MER and Pacific Telesis International Inc PAC, both of the U.S., Hold three and 10 pct shares respectively.     The Post and Telecommunications Ministry has urged the merger of the two firms because it says the market can only support a single KDD competitor.     It has also rejected management participation by an international common carrier, such as Cable and Wireless, arguing no international precedent for such a stake exists.     Cable and Wireless Director of Corporate Strategy, Jonathan Solomon, yesterday again told ministry officials he opposes a merger proposal that would limit Cable and Wireless\' share to less than three pct and total foreign participation to about 20 pct, the ministry official said.     Channeling the U.S. Firms into a single merged competitor would most probably result in diluting Cable and Wireless\' share, industry analysts said.     \"Eventually the ministry will get what it wants -- one combined competitor,\" Bache Securities (Japan) Ltd analyst Darrell Whitten said.     \"Political ... Leverage may get the total foreign share up to a certain amount, but you won\'t find any one company with an extraordinarily large holding,\" Whitten said.     Western diplomatic sources were more blunt.     \"They (the ministry) don\'t want to see Cable and Wireless with a reasonable share and they think of all sorts of strategies to reduce that share,\" one said.     Fumio Watanabe, a senior Keidanren (a leading business organization) official who has been trying to arrange the merger, will present a new outline of his proposal on Thursday, the ministry official said.  \n',acq
'A Foreign Ministry official dismissed arguments made by senior U.S. Government officials seeking to block the sale of a U.S. Microchip maker to a Japanese firm.     \"They appear to be linking completely unrelated issues,\" Shuichi Takemoto of the Foreign Ministry\'s North American Division tolds.     U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige has asked the White House to consider blocking the sale of Fairchild Semiconductor Corp to Japan\'s Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T, U.S. Officials said yesterday.     Baldrige expressed concern that the sale would leave the U.S. Military dependent on a foreign company for vital high technology equipment. Pentagon officials said Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger also opposes to the sale.     U.S. Officials have also said the sale would give Fujitsu a powerful role in the U.S. Market for supercomputers while Japan\'s supercomputer market remains closed to U.S. Sales.     Takemoto said national security should not be an issue since the planned purchase of Fairchild from its current owner, Schlumberger Ltd SLB, does not include Fairchild\'s main defence-related division.     In addition, Takemoto said tension over the supercomputer trade should not affect the sale as Fairchild does not make supercomputers.     Analysts noted that Fairchild does make sophisticated microchips used in supercomputers. Fujitsu makes similar chips and supplies them to U.S. Supercomputer makers, they said.     Takemoto also dismissed U.S. Fears that the proposed takeover would violate U.S. Antitrust law, saying \"the purchase would not result in Fujitsu monopolising the U.S. Semiconductor market.\"     Two separate issues appear to have come together to boost pressure to block the purchase, industry analysts said.     The move is in part an attempt to force Japan to open its domestic market to more U.S. Supercomputer sales, they said.     U.S. Officials have repeatedly charged that the Japanese public sector is closed to U.S. Supercomputer sales despite U.S. Firms\' technological lead in the field.     \"The United States believes Japan will only react when bullied, and this is a bullying ploy,\" Salomon Brothers Asia analyst Carole Ryavec said.     However, the analysts said more is at stake than supercomputer sales as the U.S. Fears it is losing its vital semiconductor industry to Japanese competitors.     \"The real issue is xenophobia in (the U.S.) Silicon Valley,\" said Tom Murtha of brokerage James Capel and Co.     U.S.-Japanese tension over the semiconductor trade has failed to subside despite recent efforts by Japan\'s Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) to get Japanese firms to abide by a bilateral pact aimed at halting predatory pricing and opening Japan\'s market.     A MITI official said that while Japan is faithfully abiding by the agreement, problems remain in halting the sale of microchips in Europe and Southeast Asia at prices below those set by the pact.     \"It is only a matter of time before we solve this problem,\" he tolds.     Despite the furore, Fujitsu will proceed with talks on the acquisition in line with the basic agreement reached with Schlumberger last year, a Fujitsu spokeswoman tolds.  \n',acq
'Cable and Wireless PLC CAWL.L and the Pacific Telesis group PAC.N may take part in a proposed merger of two rival firms seeking to enter Japan\'s international telecommunications market, a senior industry official said.     Fumio Watanabe, head of a telecommunications committee with the Federation of Economic Organisations (Keidanren), told a news conference Japanese shareholders in the two consortiums agreed that the U.S. And British companies will be invited to participate in the new merged firm.     The planned linkup will satisfy Tokyo\'s request that only one private company should enter the market.     The two consortiums, International Digital Communications Planning Inc (IDC) and International Telecom Japan (ITJ), were set up in 1986 to compete with monopoly Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co (KDD) after the market was deregulated in 1985.     Watanabe said the Post and Telecommunications Ministry wanted only one competitor for the time being because of the size of the Japanese telcommunications market and that foreign investors will only be allowed to hold a minority stake.     He estimated the two foreign firms\' share in the merged consortium at less than three pct and added that even the largest shareholders could own only some five pct .     Cable and Wireless and Japanese trading house C. Itoh and Co. each have a 20 pct stake in the IDC consortium while Pacific Telesis and Merrill Lynch and Co. Inc. MER.N jointly hold 13 pct .     ITJ is headed by a rival group of trading houses. Several firms including Toyota Motor Corp. TOYO.T  belong to both.     Watanabe said progress was being made towards a merger agreement and added that Japanese industry agreed with the government on having only one private consortium as two companies might invest \"excessive\" amounts.     He said talks with Cable &amp; Wireless will continue this week.  \n',acq
'Cable and Wireless Plc CAWL.L is resisting attempts to merge two Japan-based telecommunications firms in the hope that overseas political pressure will force a change in those plans, a company executive said.     Cable and Wireless, which holds a 20 pct stake in one of the two Japanese firms, is opposed to plans to reduce its share to three pct in the merged firm, director of corporate strategy Jonathan Solomon told reporters.     That plan, put forward by a senior member of the powerful business organization Keidanren with the tacit backing of the Post and Telecommunications Ministry, has caused a storm of protest from abroad that Japan is seeking to exclude foreign firms from a meaningful position in the market.     Pacific Telesis Group PAC.N of the United States also holds a 20 pct stake in one of the newly formed consortia, International Digital Communications Inc (IDC).     Solomon said that both British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher and U.S. Secretary of State George Schultz have written to the Japanese government about the planned merger.     A key U.S. Senate committee, Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige and Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter have also expressed opposition to the merger, he said.     The Post and Telecomunications Ministry reiterated again that it sees no need for two competitors to Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd, which holds a monopoly on international calls from Japan. The ministry has also suggested that foreign shareholders not hold managerial positions in the new firm.     In an attempt to hammer out an agreement, Solomon today met Fumio Watanabe, the senior Keidanren officer trying to arrange the merger. But the two sides remained deadlocked.     At stake is C and W\'s 400 mln dlr project to lay fibre optic cables between Japan and Alaska, to form part of its global network.     \"C and W wants to start right away on the project, such as application and other procedures,\" said Watanabe, who is also chairman of Tokio Marine and Fire Insurance Inc. The Japanese side is saying that the decision on such a plan should be left with the new firm, after the merger.     \"These decisions (on the merger) were made in consideration of Japan\'s economic conditions and legal systems. I told him we are not a colony or something,\" said Watanabe.  \n',acq
'Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige has asked the White House to consider blocking the planned Japanese acquisition of a major U.S. Computer and semiconductor maker, U.S. Officials said yesterday.     The officials told reporters Baldrige had serious concerns on national security grounds about the sale of Schlumberger Ltd SLB unit Fairchild Semiconductor Inc to Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T. The officials said the sale could leave the United States overly dependent on a foreign company for equipment used in advanced missiles, aircraft electronics and intelligence gathering.     The U.S. Officials added the sale would also worsen the strained relations between the two countries stemming from the huge Japanese trade surplus.     The White House Economic Policy Council would consider the sale in the coming weeks, they said.     Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger\'s position was not known, but in the past, he has opposed the transfer of high technology to foreign governments or companies.     Computers made by U.S. Manufacturers are widely used in the world, but Tokyo told U.S. Negotiators recently it prefers local manufacturers and would not buy U.S. Supercomputers.  \n',acq
'The Justice Department told the Transportation Department it supported a request by USAir  Group that the DOT dismiss an application by Trans World Airlines Inc for approval to take control of USAir.     \"Our rationale is that we reviewed the application for control filed by TWA with the DOT and ascertained that it did not contain sufficient information upon which to base a competitive review,\" James Weiss, an official in Justice\'s Antitrust Division, tolds.  \n',acq
'West German retail group Kaufhof AG KFHG.F is considering taking a stake in shipping and transport group Hapag-Lloyd AG HPLG.F but has yet to reach a final decision, a spokesman said in response to queries.     Press reports said Kaufhof wanted a stake of up to 12.5 pct in Hapag-Lloyd.     The Kaufhof spokesman noted any decision on purchasing shares in the shipping group would have to be approved by the supervisory board, which is due to hold a meeting tomorrow.     Late last year the Gevaert group of Belgium and West Germany\'s VEBA AG VEBG.F said they had each acquired a 12.5 pct stake in Hapag-Lloyd from Deutsche Bank AG DBKG.F and Dresdner Bank AG DRSD.F.      Industry sources estimate Deutsche and Dresdner, Hapag-Lloyd\'s majority shareholders, held about 75 pct of Hapag-Lloyd\'s share capital before selling portions of it to Gevaert and VEBA.     The two banks have said they eventually wanted to reduce their stake in the shipping group to 15 pct each.  \n',acq
'Kleer-Vu Industries said the company\'s board authorized the sale of its Neslemur Co, its cosmetic and toiletries company.     The company said it is evaluating two separate proposals and will complete the sale within 10 days.  \n',acq
'NV KLM Royal Dutch Airlines KLM.AS is \"absolutely not\" negotiating a takeover of U.S. Regional carrier Air Atlanta, a KLM spokeswoman said in a comment on an article in the leading Dutch evening paper NRC Handelsblad.     \"U.S. Law requires that at least 75 pct of shares in a U.S. Airline be owned by American firms or persons,\" the spokeswoman added.     The newspaper said that Air Atlanta, which flies to 11 U.S. Cities, has a fleet of five Boeing jets with passenger capacity of 110 and employs 400 people, is making losses.     She said KLM had started talks with Vendex International NV VENN.AS on their jointly owned courier service XP Express Parcel Systems, but declined to confirm an NRC Handelsblad report saying it wanted to buy the Vendex stake in XP.     KLM said last week it is negotiating a minority stake in British courier service IML Air Services Group Ltd, a subsidiary of British and Commonwealth Shipping Plc BCOM.L, to strengthen its position in the fast-growing worldwide door-to-door delivery market.     The KLM spokeswoman said she expected further announcements about the talks with Vendex to be made early next week.  \n',acq
'KLM Royal Dutch Airways KLM.AS said it agreed to take full control of a partially owned Dutch-based parcel delivery service and will offer a minority stake in it to British and Commonwealth Shipping Plc BCOM.L     KLM, seeking to strengthen its market position in the fast growing door-to-door delivery market, said it agreed with Dutch retailer Vendex International VENN.AS to take over Vendex\'s 50-pct in their jointly-owned courier, XP System VOF.     Ownership of XP will now be brought into the talks started by KLM last week with British and Commonwealth for a one-third stake in the latter\'s IML Air Services Group Ltd courier.     When announcing the negotiations with British and Commonwealth last week, KLM said buying a minority stake in IML could involve a convertible loan issue.     A KLM spokeswoman said the Dutch flag carrier would now offer a minority stake in XP to British and Commonwealth in the negotiations on IML, but declined to elaborate on financial aspects of the talks.     She said KLM would like the two courier services to cooperate in future and did not exclude a future merger between them to combine IML\'s strong world-wide network with XP\'s mainly European activities.     XP System is based in the southern Dutch airport of Maastricht and has an annual turnover of 100 mln guilders.     KLM, which is also negotiating with British and Commonwealth for a 15-pct stake in the latter\'s regional airline Air U.K. Ltd, says door-to-door delivery courier services are seeing substantially faster growth than traditional cargo activities.  \n',acq
'KLM Royal Dutch Airlines KLM.AS is discussing marketing cooperation with U.S. regional carrier Air Atlanta Inc but it is not seeking to take a stake in the airline, a KLM spokesman said.     \"We\'re not considering taking either a majority or minority stake in Air Atlanta, but we are thinking of providing them with a loan,\" the spokesman tolds in a comment on a Wall Street Journal report saying debt-laden Air Atlanta could sell as much as 25 pct of its stock to the Dutch airline.     KLM last week denied a Dutch press report saying it was discussing a takeover of Air Atlanta.     The KLM spokesman said Air Atlanta\'s regional route network, centred on Atlanta, Ga, could serve as a feeder to KLM\'s international network, which includes direct flights between Atlanta and Amsterdam.     KLM and Air Atlanta had been talking \"for some time,\" he said, but declined to elaborate further on the talks or give details of the loan to Air Atlanta.  \n',acq
'KLM Royal Dutch Airlines KLM.AS said it is negotiating for a minority stake in a British and Commonwealth Shipping Plc BCOM.L courier service in a transaction which might include a convertible loan issue.     KLM, already active in the fast growing door-to-door delivery market through a 50-pct stake in a Dutch courier service, is seeking to buy one-third of IML Air Services Group Ltd from British and Commonwealth.     The two companies agreed earlier this month for KLM to take a 15-pct stake in British and Commonwealth commuter airline Air U.K. Ltd in a deal worth around two mln stg.  \n',acq
'KLM Royal Dutch Airlines KLM.A said it agreed to take a 15 pct stake in Air U.K. Ltd, a subsidiary of British and Commonwealth Shipping Plc BCOM.L, in a transaction worth around two mln stg.    A KLM spokesman said KLM already cooperated closely with Air UK, which runs 111 flights a week to Amsterdam\'s Schipol airport from nine UK cities.    British and Commonwealth Shipping said last week it held preliminary talks about a KLM minority stake in Air U.K. But gave no further details. KLM said it hoped the move would attract more British feeder traffic to Amsterdam Airport.  \n',acq
'The state-owned Krung Thai Bank Ltd will start taking over state-owned Sayam Bank Ltd and complete the process in a year, Finance Minister Suthee Singhasaneh told a press conference.     He said the takeover decision was made this week to stem the current heavy losses of Sayam and to avoid competition between the two state-owned institutions.     The minister said some of the existing 30 Sayam Bank branches will be merged with their Krung Thai counterparts, while others will continue operating but under Krung Thai\'s name.     Sayam Bank has existed since August 1984 when the Finance Ministry took over and re-named the Asia Trust Bank Ltd.     Sayam president Waree Havanonda told reporters last month her bank posted a loss of more than 400 mln baht in 1986. At the end of 1985 the bank, with 13.8 billion baht of assets, was ranked 12th among Thailand\'s 16 local commercial banks.     Waree said Sayam Bank was trying to recall about six to seven billion baht of loans extended by its previous private management and was taking legal action to collect another four to five billion baht of doubtful debts.     Krung Thai is Thailand\'s third largest bank.  \n',acq
'Forstmann Little and Co said Lear Siegler Holding Corp plans to divest its aerospace group subsidiary, comprised of the Defense Electronics Group and the Components Group.     Divestitures had been expected since Lear-Siegler, a diversified conglomerate, was acquired last December in a 2.1- billion-dlr-leveraged buyout by the Wall Street firm of Forstmann Little.     Lear\'s aerospace group revenues for fiscal 1987 are expected to be about 700 mln dlrs, said Forstmann.     The Defense Electronics Group designs and manufactures weapons, management systems, flight control systems, remotely piloted vehicles and reference and navigation systems, mainly for military markets.     The Defense Group subsidiaries are Astronics Corp, which is based in Santa Monica, Calif., and employs 1,076 people; Instrument and Avionic Systems Corp, based in Grand Rapids, Mich., and employs 3,479 people; International Corp, based in Stamford, Conn., and employs 266 people; and Development Sciences Corp, based in Ontario, Calif., and employs 237 people.     The Components Group manufactures pumps, bearings, and other industrial components as well as nuclear control drive rod mechanisms and valves.     The Group\'s subsidiaries include Power Equipment Corp, based in Cleveland, which employs 880 people; Energy Products Corp, based in Santa Ana, Calif., which employs 755 people;  Romek Corp, based in Elyria, Ohio, which employs 262 people; and Transport Dynamics in Santa Ana, which employs 254 people.     Overall, Lear\'s Aerospace Group\'s eight subsidiaries employs 7,200 people.     Lear Siegler said it plans to retain Management Services Corp, engaged in aircraft maintenance modification for various Department of Defense agencies.     Morgan Stanley and Co will act as financial advsiors for the group\'s divestitures.     Last month, Lear Siegler said it planned to sell its Smith and Wesson handgun business, Starcraft Recreational Products Ltd, the Peerless truck trailer operations, and other units, as part of its restructuring plans.     Lear apparently will retain its Piper Aircraft unit.      \n',acq
'The Bank of England does not favour the introduction of rules to shield companies from hostile takeover attempts, its governor, Robin Leigh-Pemberton, said.     Instead, merchant banks advising bidding companies must show restraint and responsibility to avoid the excesses that have marred recent takeovers, he told the Yorkshire and Humberside Regional Confederation of British Industries\' annual dinner.     Leigh-Pemberton also called on companies to improve ties with institutional investors, suggesting representatives of those institutions be granted seats on the boards of directors of companies they invest in.     \"Boards cannot expect protection from unwelcome predators, for that is but a short step from saying that they should be protected from their own shareholders -- who are, after all, the proprietors of the company,\" Leigh-Pemberton said.     He added takeovers and mergers had an important role to play in furthering economies of scale, integration and more efficient market penetration. \"The degree of success or failure (of a takeover) has not in my experience depended on whether or not the takeover was contested,\" he said.     Leigh-Pemberton noted there had been excesses in takeover activity in the recent past. \"The aim is to pressurise a company\'s management into action dedicated solely to a favourable impact on the share price in the short-term, partly or even primarily at the expense of the future,\" he said.     Such bids \"often depend for their success on creating a highly-charged and artificial situation in the share market, and give rise to temptations, on both sides of the battle, to engage in aggressive, even manipulative tactics that are immensely damaging to the interest of the shareholders,\" he said.     In a clear reference recent events, he said \"those in the City who act for companies or individuals .. Must, I suggest, be ready to accept a full measure of responsibility -- even if it entails opprobrium -- for the transactions that may result.\"     They \"should exercise the most careful judgment at the outset with respect to the clients for whom they act and the activities contenplated. Those who sow wind cannot expect the whirlwind to visit elsewhere,\" he added.  \n',acq
'London International Group Plc LONL.L said it had agreed to sell its Haffenden Moulding Co Ltd unit to Melton Medes Ltd for 2.1 mln stg.     Haffenden is a moulder of hot water bottles and also produces a variety of rubber and plastic mouldings. The book value of its assets is 4.4 mln stg.     LIG said the disposal was part of its strategy of concentrating on its core activities.     LIG shares were one penny firmer at 277p.  \n',acq
'McAndrews and Forbes Holdings Inc said it will offer 18.50 dlrs per share for all of Revlon Group Inc\'s REV outstanding common stock.     McAndrews said terms of the acquisition have not been determined and are subject to the acquisition of financing.     Revlon closed yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange at 14-3/4.     The company said it would bid for all stock it or its affiliates do not already own.     McAndrews and Forbes said it informed the board of directors of Revlon that it expects to make a formal proposal in the near future. It also said there can be no assurance as to the terms of the proposals or that the deal can be concluded.  \n',acq
'Malaysia\'s central bank said it acquired a 59.2 pct stake in ailing United Asian Bank Bhd (UAB), the sixth largest commercial bank in the country, to rebuild public confidence in it.     UAB called for a rights issue last November to raise 152.49 mln ringgit to rectify its capital deficiency following an accumulated loss of 107.61 mln ringgit at end-1985, the central bank, Bank Negara, said in a statement.     But only 16.99 mln ringgit in shares was taken up by shareholders, mainly local Indian and Malay businessmen and the Indian Government.     Bank Negara said it subsequently took up the unsubscribed shares, totalling 135.5 mln of UAB\'s new paid-up capital of 228.74 mln ringgit.     It said the shares, held in trust, will be eventually sold.     The central bank early this week also announced that it had bought 49.4 pct stake in another troubled commercial bank, Perwira Habib Bank Malaysia Bhd, after the latter raised its capital to 405 mln ringgit from 105 in mid-January this year.     Bank Negara said it does not intend to hold on to the shares of the two banks.     \"The injection of capital in PHB and in UAB including the recamp of management in these banks are some of the measures taken by the bank to strengthen public confidence in the stability of the these banks,\" it added.     The central bank said it is invoking Section 39A of the Banking (Amendemnt) Act 1986 empowering it to grant loans to an ailing bank or to buy a stake in it.  \n',acq
'Malrite Guaranteed Broadcast Partners L.P. said it bought WTRK Inc from Cox Enterprises Inc for 13.8 mln dlrs in cash.     It said WTRK owns and operates WTRK-FM, a Philadelphia radio station. Transfer of the license for the sation has been approved by the Federal Communications Commission.     Malrite Guaranteed said it is a limited partnerhip formed to acquire and operate radio and tv stations. It said Malrite Communications Group Inc MALR is the general partner.  \n',acq
'A government commission that controls 51 pct of San Miguel Corp (SMC) stock will increase its nominees on the firm\'s 15-member board to nine from six.     \"We want to correct business practices,\" Ramon Diaz, chairman of the Presidential Commission on Good Government (PCGG), tolds.     \"Right now there are a lot of companies that keep so many things from their shareholders and one of them is San Miguel,\" he said.     A San Miguel spokesman declined comment.     Diaz said New York investment bank Allen and Co Inc told the PCGG it was interested in tendering for all outstanding SMC stock, with the subsequent dispersal of 60 pct of the stock to Filipino investors to comply with investment laws.     He said Australian businessman and brewer Alan Bond and the brewing company Elders IXL Ltd ELXA.S were interested in buying 40 pct each of SMC stock.     He added that the PCGG wanted some foreign input but would not allow foreign control of the brewing and food conglomerate, the Philippines\' biggest manufacturing concern.     Diaz said the PCGG did not plan to remove SMC president Andres Soriano from his family company.     \"He has tremendous prestige to run the company,\" Diaz said. \"We appreciate his management, but certainly some practices have to be corrected.\"  \n',acq
'Mannesmann AG MMWG.F said it has reached a series of agreements giving it an indirect majority stake in the Fichtel und Sachs AG car parts group.     The takeover is contingent on approval from the Federal Cartel Office in West Berlin, a spokesman said, adding that Mannesmann was confident the authorities would not block the purchase.     Mannesmann is buying 75 pct of MEC Sachs Vermoegensholding which owns 37.5 pct of Sachs AG, which in turn holds 96.5 pct of Fichtel und Sachs. The MEC shares will be bought from the granddaughters of the firm\'s founder.     Mannesmann is also purchasing a 25.01 pct stake in Fichtel und Sachs from Commerzbank AG CBKG.F and has an option to buy the bank\'s remaining 10 pct stake, a company statement said.     In addition to these firm agreements, Mannesmann is also talking with the state-owned steel group Salzgitter AG  SALG.H on buying its 24.98 pct stake in Fichtel und Sachs.  This would give Mannesmann around 75 pct of Fichtel und Sachs.     Salzgitter said it decided to give up its own original plans to seek a majority stake in Sachs after holding talks with the government in Bonn.     Earlier this month Mannesmann disclosed that it might want a majority stake in Sachs after previously saying it was seeking to buy only a minority holding in the company, which has annual turnover of 2.2 billion marks and employs 17,000.     The acquisition is part of Mannesmann\'s efforts to diversify into high-technology areas and away from its previous reliance on steel and pipe-making. More     A spokesman for the Federal Statistics Office later said the anti-cartel authorities would probably rule on the takeover in the new few weeks.  \n',acq
'A Mannesmann AG MMWG.F spokesman said the company has lodged an application with the Federal Cartel Office for approval of a possible majority stake in car parts company Fichtel und Sachs AG.     He described the application as a precautionary move and said no agreement on buying a majority stake had yet been reached. Until now Mannesmann has said only that it wanted to buy a 37.5 pct stake in Fichtel from the heirs of Ernst Wilhelm Sachs, the grandson of the firm\'s founder.     The spokesman declined to say from whom it may buy the other shares to create a majority stake in the firm.     Fichtel\'s other principal shareholders are Commerzbank AG CBKG.F, with 35.01 pct, and Salzgitter AG ISLG.F, with 24.98 pct. Spokesmen declined to comment directly on the possibility of selling Fichtel shares to Mannesmann.     Mannesmann said in January it hoped to take a 37.5 pct stake in Fichtel\'s holding company Sachs AG in the first quarter.     Last week a spokesman said Mannesmann had a letter of intent on the 37.5 pct stake but completion was being delayed by legal questions surrounding the inheritance.  \n',acq
'Mannesmann AG MMWG.F, the diversified engineering and pipe-making group, is interested in taking a stake in a U.S. Company or companies but has not yet found a suitable firm, a spokesman said in reply to questions.     Mannesmann managing board chairman Werner Dieter told the business weekly Wirtschaftswoche in an interview that Mannesmann wanted to invest in a U.S. Company in order to strengthen its presence on the U.S. Market.     Dieter said Mannesmann would act quickly when and if it found a firm in which it wanted to take a stake.     The Mannesmann spokesman declined to say in which industrial sector the group may make a U.S. Acquisition or how big the acquisition might be.     He also said the group had not yet completed taking over a stake in car components firm Fichtel und Sachs AG.     Mannesmann had said in January it hoped to take a 37.5 pct stake in Fichtel und Sachs\'s holding company, Sachs AG, in the first quarter. The spokesman said Mannesmann had a letter of intent on the takeover from the heirs of the company\'s late owner but completion has been delayed by legal questions concerning the inheritance.  \n',acq
'Mathematical Applications Group Inc said it has signed a letter of intent to sell all of its operating business and will propose a plan of liquidation following the sale.     If the company is unsuccessful in obtaining the approvals needed for the sale and liquidation, it said, the company may be required to initiate reorganization proceedings under federal bankruptcy law to facilitie the distribution of its assets.     Mathematical Applications said it tentatively agreed to sell its direct marketing business to Pagex Inc for 400,000 dlrs plus an amount equal to the working capital of the business at closing as well as a 1.7 mln dlr note payable in installments over six years.     Mathematical Applications said the business\' working capital is estimated to be about 600,000 dlrs.     Pagex has been formed by Paul A. Goldner the owner of Pagex Systems Inc, which is also engaged in the direct marketing computer service business.     Mathematical Applications said the tentative agreement calls for Pagex to buy substantially all of the assets and liabilities related to the direct marketing business and continue to use the Mathematical Applications name.     It said the sale is also subject to renegotiation of a real estate lease and approval of a definitive agreement by the company\'s board, stock holders and debenture holders.     The company said it has obtained waivers from holders of its six mln dlrs principal amount of debentures due March 31, 1993, to defer interest payments aggregating 270,000 dlrs through March 31, 1987. The company said it will seek waivers to defer these interest payments, and those due March 31, for enough time to enable the company to accomplish the proposed sale of its operations.     Mathematical Applications said it is talking to debenture holders, its landlord, a lessor of equipment to the marketing operation and holders of other liabilities not being assumed by Pagex to arrange distribution of assets after the proposed sale, adding that these assets will be significantly less than its liabilities.     The company said it has obtained waivers from holders of its six mln dlrs principal amount of debentures due March 31, 1993, to defer interest payments aggregating 270,000 dlrs through March 31, 1987. The company said it will seek waivers to defer these payments, and those due March 31, for enough time to accomplish the proposed sale of its operations.     Mathematical Applications said it is talking to debenture holders, its landlord, a lessor of equipment to the marketing operation and holders of liabilities Pages is not assuming to arrange distribution of assets after the proposed sale, adding these assets will be significantly less than its liabilities.     As part of the distribution of assets, the company said, it expects shareholders to receive an amount based on the bid price of the company\'s stock, which was 1/16 on March five.  \n',acq
'Attorney General Edwin Meese said he saw some benefit in the proposed purchase of American Motors Co AMO By Chrysler Corp C in that it would return the smallest of the U.S. auto manufacturers to American hands.     Meese told the House Appropriations Subcommittee that consideration would be part of the Justice Department\'s review of the proposed merger. He said the agency has not yet received a formal notice of the merger which would start the review process.    Chrysler has made a 1.3 billion dlr bid to buy AMC from its French parent Renault.     \"I think one of the things that has to be recognized in that merger is that it appears, at least, that a good portion of the ownership of American Motors, which has been in overseas hands will be put back in American hands,\" Meese told the subcommittee.     \"That may be one of the factors that would be weighed in the judgment,\" he added.     Renault currently holds about 46 pct of AMC.  \n',acq
'Memotec Data Inc said it completed the previously announced 488.3 mln dlr acquisition of Teleglobe Canada from the federal government.     Memotec Data said Teleglobe, which has provided Canada\'s overseas telecommunications services since 1950, now becomes Teleglobe Canada Inc, a unit of Memotec.     Teleglobe president and chief executive Jean-Claude Delorme will continue in the same post, the company said.     In addition to the sale price, the government will receive Teleglobe\'s accumulated cash of 102 mln dlrs and a special 18 mln dlr dividend, making total proceeds 608.3 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'Automobile dealerships have become large, multi-store operations, and the largest sell more than 1 billion dlrs a year worth of vehicles a year.     Around the auto industry there is talk of mergers and buyouts among dealerships, and there are rumors that the largest are considering offering shares to the public, analysts say.     Retail car sales \"are at a point of transition. There\'s not much that\'s off the table in terms of creative thinking\" about ways to sell cars, says David Cole, analyst with the University of Michigan\'s Transportation Research Institute.     The retail car market is \"much more freeform now\" than it was in 1956, the year things began to change, says Detroit analyst Arvid Jauppi of Arvid Jauppi and Associates.     Thirty years ago, in 1956, the situation was different. Dealerships sold one kind of car--a \"Chevy\" or a Ford or a Studebaker. The average dealer had 17 employees and sold 738,000 dlrs worth of vehicles, according to the National Automobile Dealers Association.     That year a tiny car from overseas--Germany\'s Volkswagen Beatle--began to gain popularity. The \"Bug\" caused \"a rebellion\" among dealers, who demanded greater freedom from restrictions placed on them by the major American automakers, says Jauppi.     One of the most visible changes in retail car sales has been in the size of dealerships, auto analysts say. Last year, the average dealership had 11.2 mln dlrs in sales--a 15-fold increase from 1956--and employed 34 workers.     \"I had one of these guys tell me he makes six, seven mln dlrs a year and didn\'t know what to do with all his money,\" says Cole.     \"There\'s a whole lot more rich guys who sell cars than that make cars,\" he says.     With the increase in size, large dealers have been buying up other dealerships, and auto analysts see few signs the trend will let up.     Donald Keithley, vice president, dealer services, for J.D. Power, a California-based market research firm, says that, by 1990, 12,000 people will own dealerships compared to 16,800 principal owners today.     Many dealers are experimenting with owning several franchises, some of which might compete against each other. \"It used to be a Chevrolet dealer was a Chevrolet dealer. Now a Chevrolet dealer might handle several lines,\" Jauppi says.     As dealers get bigger, industry officials are talking about the possibility that some of them might become publicly-owned or open international operations.     Offering shares to the public is an option large dealers, \"are obviously thinking of very seriously,\" says Cole.     Although some say the franchise system might get in the way of a public offering, Jauppi says there are few obstacles to trading in car dealer shares.     \"Dealers are large enough now to go public. The only thing the manufacturer cares about is that the dealer sells those cars. It could happen any time,\" Jauppi says.     \"If you look at the whole merger mania, and look at the scale some of these dealers, it\'s going to be very hard to resist taking them public,\" said another analyst.     And Jauppi says that dealerships can be expected to become international.     \"We\'re going to have international dealers--dealer networks that are worldwide,\" he says. U.S. dealers will be attracted particularly to Europe, where the market will expand faster than the U.S., he says.     \"It\'s not totally off the wall,\" says Cole.  \n',acq
'Messidor Ltd said it signed a letter of intent to acquire 100 pct of the outstanding shares of Triton Beleggineng Nederland B.V., a European investment portfolio management company.     If approved, two mln shares of stock held by the Messidor Ltd officers and directors would be issued to Triton shareholders.     Triton will become a subsidiary of Messidor, it said.     If approved, the president of Triton, Hendrik Bokma, will be nominated as chairman of the combined company.     There are about 1.5 mln Messidor units issued to the public consisting of one share of common stock, four Class A common stock warrants, four class B common stock warrants and four class C common stock warrants.     In addition there are four mln restricted shares outstanding.     Messidor said the acquisition is expected to be completed by June three.  \n',acq
'Metro Funding Corp said its shareholders approved its merger into Maxcom Corp and its change of incorporation from Nevada to Delaware.     Metro Funding also said its subsidiary, Comet Corp, will be renamed Maxcom USA.     The company also reported shareholders approved the authorization of 500,000 shares of common stock to be set aside for an incentive stock option plan.  \n',acq
'Metromedia Co said it purchased from Time Inc\'s TL Home Box Office Inc a warrant to purchase 800,000 shares of common stock of Orion Pictures Corp OPC.     The price for the warrant was 10 mln dlrs, Metromedia said. It added that it now owns 16.4 pct of the outstanding common stock of Orion.  \n',acq
'Midivest Inc said it acquired all the assets of Business Aviation Inc of Sioux Falls, S.D., for an undisclosed amount of stock.     Midivest said it expects to sell 10 to 20 of the renovated Beechcraft planes next year. It said management will also lease these airborne intensive care units to hospitals and government subdivisions through Metropolitan Leasing, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Midivest.  \n',acq
'MIM Holdings Ltd MIMA.S said it has issued 23.33 mln shares to Preussag AG PRSG.F to complete the previously announced purchase of 20 pct of Norddeutsche Affinerie AG from Preussag.     Terms of the acquisition of 10 pct of Norddeutsche Affinerie from Degussa AG DGSG.F are currently being resolved, MIM said in a statement.     Norddeutsche Affinerie will then be owned 40 pct by Metallgesellschaft AG METG.F and 30 pct each by MIM and Degussa, but MIM said it and Metallgesellschaft are proposing a further arrangement to give them 35 pct each.  \n',acq
'Mount Isa Mines Holding Ltd plans to acquire a 30 pct stake in Europe\'s largest primary copper producer, Norddeutsche Affinerie AG, a spokesman for Metallgesellschaft AG said.     MIM intends to take Preussag AG\'s total 20 pct share in the copper producer in exchange for some three pct of MIM\'s share capital. MIM will also take another 10 pct now held by Degussa AG, reducing Degussa\'s share to 30 pct from 40. Metallgesellschaft\'s share will remain at 40 pct.     The move is subject to approval of the federal cartel office and supervisory boards of the companies involved.  \n',acq
'Beaver Creek State Bank in Beaver Creek, Minn., failed and the bank\'s insured assets were transferred to Citizens State Bank of Silver Lake, Minn., the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. said.     Separately, the Federal Home Loan Bank Board said Victor Federal Savings and Loan Association of Muskogee, Okla., was placed into receivership.     Beaver Creek\'s two offices will re-open as branches of Citizens on Monday.     The transfer was arranged because there were no bids to buy Beaver Creek, the FDIC said.     Citizens will pay a premium of 30,000 dlrs  to the FDIC and purchase Beaver Creek\'s assets for 5.3 mln dlrs.     It was the 43rd bank failure in the nation this year.     The FHLBB said Victor Federal Savings was insolvent and its assets were transferred to a newly chartered federal mutual association with directors named by the FHLBB.     Victor was a stock association with 564 mln dlrs in assets.     The new association is to be known as Victor Savings and Loan Association and its assets continue to be insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp, the FHLBB said.  \n',acq
'Mitsubishi Corp MITT.TOK said it has taken a 25 pct stake worth five mln krone in Danish Dairy Farms Ltd and will jointly market its produce from April.     The company was set up last year by three major Danish livestock cooperative federations to expand markets for their dairy products, a Mitsubishi official said.     This is the first time a Japanese trading house has traded non-Japanese dairy products in the world market, he said.     He said Mitsubishi expects the Danish company\'s annual sales to be 10 billion yen in its first year, from April 1.  \n',acq
'Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd MITH.T (MHI) and C. Itoh and Co Ltd CITT.T have decided to sell their combined 65 pct stake in Indonesia\'s Pt Triguna Utama Machinery Industries to Caterpillar Tractor Co,  spokesmen for the two Japanese companies said.    Triguna, set up in 1982, is owned 40 pct by MHI and 25 pct by C. Itoh and 35 pct by an Indonesian company. It makes about 10 forklift trucks and a similar number of excavators each month in technological cooperation with MHI.     The spokesmen said the sale results from an expected restructuring later this year of the 50/50 Caterpillar/MHI joint venture Japanese company Caterpillar Mitsubishi Ltd, formed in 1963.     They said the venture will be renamed Shin Caterpillar Mitsubishi Ltd and capitalised at 23 billion yen. It will still be owned equally by MHI and Caterpillar and will be set up with the aim of centralising MHI\'s excavator business.  \n',acq
'A Mitsui and Co MITS.T spokesman said its subsidiary Mitsui and Co USA Inc bought two mln dlrs of newly-issued shares in Imatron Inc, an unlisted California-based medical equipment manufacturer.     Mitsui and Co USA is now Imatron\'s fifth-largest shareholder with 3.1 pct of the firm\'s outstanding shares. Imatron is capitalised at 32.76 mln dlrs, the spokesman said.     Mitsui and Co intends to import Imatron\'s computerised diagnostic equipment into Japan, he said.  \n',acq
'Mobil Corp\'s MOB Mobil Oil Francaise unit said it will take a stake of about 10 pct in the French butane and propane gas distribution company Primagaz in exchange for the transfer to Primagaz of Mobil\'s small and medium bulk propane activity.     Small and medium bulk propane sales totalled 55,000 tonnes in 1986 and the transfer will increase total business of Primagaz by about 12 pct, equal to 32,000 extra customers.     A Primagas spokesman said Mobil will take the stake by means of a capital increase, terms of which have not yet been established. \n',acq
'Mono Gold Mines Inc said NIM and Co Ltd Partnership agreed to buy flow-through shares with an aggregate purchase price of up to 300,000 dlrs.     It said, subject to fulfillment of certain conditions, the price of the shares to NIM will be 79.6 cts per share, and said it will issue 376,955 shares to the partnership.     Mono also said options to buy up to 300,000 dlrs of its capital stock at 65 cts per share expire March three. It said 39,000 options have been exercised to net the company 25,530 dlrs to be added to working capital.  \n',acq
'Montedison SpA MONI.MI has acquired a 70 pct stake in Plant Cell Research Institute - PCRI of California from Atlantic Richfield Co ARC.N for \"several tens of millions of dollars,\" a senior Montedison executive said.     Renato Ugo, a member of Montedison\'s management committee, told reporters that Stanford Research Institute International of Menlo Park, California, had acted as a partner in the purchase, itself acquiring a stake in PCRI of under 10 pct.     PCRI, based in Dublin, California has a biotechnology research laboratory.     Ugo said the price paid included outlays for the laboratory technology and staff.     He said other negotiations were under way with biotechnology companies in the health care and diagnostics sectors through Montedison\'s health care subsidiary Erbamont NV, but gave no details.     \"We hope they will be concluded by the year end,\" he said.     Montedison currently invests around 30 billion lire a year in biotechnology research and expects to increase this figure to around 50 billion lire in the next few years.  \n',acq
'Montedison Spa MONI.MI said it has concluded its negotiations with Spanish pharmaceuticals company Antibioticos SA.     A company spokesman tolds \"We have concluded the talks and we are now awaiting authorization from Spanish authorities.\" He declined to comment further.     Earlier today the Italian company postponed a scheduled press conference on its talks with Antibioticos. An Italian press report today said Montedison has agreed to acquire Antibioticos for 500 billion lire.  \n',acq
'The 20 pct stake in Moulinex SA MOUP.PA sold by Scovill Inc of the U.S. Was spread among at least 50 institutional investors worldwide, a spokesman for brokers James Capel said. Capel handled the deal.     The buyers were based in centers ranging from Europe to North America and Japan, he added.     Moulinex\'s capital is split among Jean Mantelet, president of the company, with 42 pct, along with private investors holding 38 pct and the 20 pct which has just been sold, company sources said earlier in Paris.  \n',acq
'Mountain States Resources Corp said it acquired two properties to add to its strategic minerals holdings.     The acquisitions include a total of 5,100 acres of titanium, zirconium and rare earth resources, the company said.     Both properties, located in southern Utah, consist of approximately 1,430 acres of unpatented mining claims and one state lease, it said.     The company also announced the formation of Rare Tech Minerals Inc, a wholly-owned subsidiary.  \n',acq
'(Mountain View Investment Corp), Phoenix, Ariz., said it acquired Maratech Communications Cos Inc.     Under terms of the transaction, the present directors of Mountain View have resigned and have elected directors of Maratech as new directors of Mountain View.     It said a combined shareholders\' meeting will soon be held to vote on the acquisition.  \n',acq
'Swiss-based Nestle S.A.\'s Nestle Enterprises Ltd unit said it signed a letter of intent to acquire Nabisco Brands Ltd\'s Club, Melrose, Dickson and Chase and Sanborn businesses for undisclosed terms.     Nestle said the final agreement, subject to required approvals, would be signed shortly.     The businesses involved in the deal provide products to hotels, restaurants and other parts of the food and beverage industry. Nabisco is 80 pct-owned by RJR Nabisco Inc RJR.  \n',acq
'Independent Newspapers Ltd (INL) said it bought two more community newspapers in Houston, Texas, through a subsidiary there, for an undisclosed sum.     INL said in a statement Houston Community Newspapers Inc bought the South West Advocate and the South Bend Advocate, with combined circulation of 74,000 copies, and associated assets, from The Advocate Communications Corp Inc.     INL publishes Wellington\'s morning and evening newspapers as well as New Zealand provincial dailies and newspapers in Rhode Island. Just under 40 pct of INL is owned by News Ltd, an Australian subsidiary of News Corp Ltd NCPA.S.     Production and administration of the two publications would be transferred to the company\'s existing centre in Houston. INL said the acquisition took effect on March 1.     INL chairman Alan Burnet said the purchase would enable the subsidiary to offer advertisers a combined distribution of nine community newspapers to 340,000 homes in the greater Houston area. Trading conditions in the area are particularly difficult because the city\'s economy depends to a large extent on the fortunes of the petroleum industry, but the situation should improve in the medium to long term and the investment will prove to be sound, he said.  \n',acq
'Newman Industries Plc said it was discussing the possible merger of its electric motor operations with Hawker Siddeley Group Plc\'s HSID.L Brook Crompton Parkinson Motors Ltd unit.     Newman has electric motor operations in the U.K. And Australia. The company gave no further details but said a further statement would be made shortly.     Newman shares eased one penny on the announcement to 43p while Hawker was unchanged at 528p, three pence higher on last night\'s close.  \n',acq
'Newmont Mining Corp said it completed the previously announced reduction of its share in Peabody Holding Co Inc to 49.97 pct from 61.47 pct.     Newmont realized 116.8 mln dlrs in the transaction.     For 1986, Newmont reported net income of 74.2 mln dlrs. Peabody, the largest coal producer in the U.S., had net income of 100.8 mln dlrs on sales of 1.4 billion dlrs in 1986.     Newmont doubled its ownership in Peabody in January by purchasing 30.74 pct interest held by the Williams Cos for 320 mln dlrs.     The reduction resulted from completion of an earlier announced agreement by Peabody to sell a 15.01 pct interest in the company to Eastern Gas and Fuel Associates in exchange for all the coal properties owned by Eastern.  \n',acq
'Toshin Steel Co Ltd TOSS.T and Azuma Steel Co Ltd, affiliates of Nippon Kokan KK NKKT.T, are considering a merger, company spokesmen said.     Toshin Steel, owned 41.9 pct by Nippon Kokan, and Azuma Steel, owned 41.3 pct by Nippon Kokan, are expected to decide by the end of March, they said. Both firms have been struggling with losses caused by the recession in the steel industry and the yen\'s appreciation.     Azuma Steel\'s current losses are estimated at 3.1 billion yen in the year ending March 31 against a 6.99 billion loss a year earlier, a spokesman said. The firm employs 1,100 workers     Toshin Steel, with 1,700 workers, has given no forecast for the year ending March 31.     But industry sources said they expected the company to show current losses of about five billion yen or more in 1986/87 compared with a 2.98 billion loss in 1985/86.  \n',acq
'Nippon Life Insurance Co is pursing a possible link with an American securities house to expand its overseas investment portfolio, a company spokesman said.     But he declined to comment on rumours the company would take a 10 pct stake in Shearson Lehman Brothers, an investment banking unit of American Express Co AXP.     He said the firm started to sound out several U.S. Investment banks on capital participation about 18 months ago and was narrowing the number of prospects, but he did not say if it had set its sights on one firm.     Nippon Life, Japan\'s largest life insurer, also plans to set up a wholly owned investment unit, Nissei International America, in New York next month and subsidiaries in Canada, Singapore, the Cayman Islands and Jersey this year, he said.     These moves are in line with its long-term strategy to put more emphasis on overseas investment management as opportunities at home are declining while the company\'s assets are growing.     The company is especially attracted by the scale and depth of U.S. Money and credit markets and wants to establish a firm foothold there, the spokesman added.  \n',acq
'Nippon Life Insurance Co\'s 538 mln dlr purchase of a 13 pct stake in Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc brokerage unit is a shrewd move that other Japanese insurers are likely to follow, securities analysts said.     The investment in one of Wall Street\'s top brokerage houses is likely to pay off in dollars and international market position, they said. \"It\'s part of a trend towards growing capital participation by Japanese insurance firms in foreign financial institutions,\" said Simon Smithson, an analyst with Kleinwort Benson International Inc in Tokyo.     The investment in Shearson Lehman, a growing firm described by some analysts as the top U.S. Retail brokerage, will give Nippon Life a ringside seat and possibly lower commissions on Wall Street, where it invests an increasing percentage of its assets of 90.2 billion dlrs, they said.     Nippon Life staff will also acquire expertise in business sectors which have not yet opened up in Japan, they added.     The agreement between the two companies calls for a 50-50 joint venture in London focussing on investment advisory asset management, market research, and consulting on financing.     Nippon Life is Japan\'s largest insurance company and the world\'s biggest institutional investor, analysts said.     The Japanese finance ministry is expected to approve the deal in April, making Nippon Life the first Japanese life insurance firm to take a stake in a U.S. Financial firm.     The limit on foreign assets as a proportion of Japanese insurers\' assets was increased to 25 pct from 10 pct last year. Since then, they have stepped up purchases of foreign stocks and sought to deepen their understandng of foreign markets and instruments.     Last year, a Sumitomo Life Insurance Co official was appointed to E.F. Hutton Group Inc unit E.F. Hutton and Co\'s board and Sumitomo Bank Ltd spent 500 mln dlrs to become a limited partner in Goldman, Sachs and Co.     Smithson said Japanese banks started buying smaller and problem-plagued banks in 1984. \"But now Japanese are going for blue-chip organisations,\" he said.     \"It\'s a reflection of what has happened in manufacturing industries,\" said Brian Waterhouse at James Capel and Co. \"With a historically high yen, and historically low interest rates, there\'s an increasing disincentive to invest in Japan.\"     Competition in fund management has grown along with greater Japanese savings. The typical salaried employee has 7.33 mln yen in savings, reflecting an annual average savings rate of 17 to 18 pct, he said.     To stay competitive, fund managers must invest overseas and gain experience with financial instruments which are likely to spread to Japan with further deregulation. \"The high regulatory environment has delayed (life insurance firms\') diversification. Now there\'s a growing number of new products in an environment of increasing competition for performance on fund management,\" Smithson said.  \n',acq
'GTX Corp said Nippon Steel Co of Japan, in a move to diversify into high technology, invested eight mln dlrs in GTX.     Nippon\'s move was the result of current exchange rates and the revaluation of the yen, which \"have made the U.S. electronics industry an attractive investment opportunity for Japanese corporations,\" according to a GTX statement.     GTX noted that Nippon is expecting sales of 27 billion dlrs by 1995. Of that amount, six billion dlrs is targeted for electronics. GTX, located in Phoenix, makes computerized systems that read drawings and transfer them into data bases.  \n',acq
'Kokusan Kinzoku Kogyo Co Ltd (KKK), a Japanese autoparts maker owned 25 pct by Nissan Motor Co Ltd NSAN.T, has exchanged a memorandum to acquire over 50 pct of U.S. Autoparts firm Master-Cast Co to avoid losses on U.S. Sales caused by the yen\'s rise against the dollar, a KKK spokesman said.     The final agreement should be signed this year when KKK forms the new company Alfa K Technology, he said.     The new firm should supply all the U.S. Major car makers, including Ford Motor Co F, General Motor Corp GM and Chrysler Corp C, he said.  \n',acq
'Nobel Industries Sweden SA NOBL.ST said its arms subsidiary, AB Bofors, plans to sell its 40 pct stake in Allied Ordnance Co of Singapore Ltd because of its part in weapons exports which contravene Swedish law.     \"The events we have uncovered are unacceptable and highly regrettable incidents in our company\'s history,\" Nobel chairman Lars-Erik Thunholm told a news conference.     Nobel managing director Anders Carlberg said an internal inquiry has revealed an extensive network of international arms smuggling.  \n',acq
'Noranda Inc said it agreed to buy an initial 1,000,501 treasury shares of Sanivan Group Inc at 5.25 dlrs per share.     Noranda also has an option until June 30, 1988, to acquire an additional 1,000,501 Sanivan treasury shares at 5.75 dlrs per share.     Sanivan is the largest hazardous waste management company in Canada.  \n',acq
'Norcros NCRO.L Plc said it has no intention of proceeding any further with talks on Williams Holdings Plc\'s suggestion that there would be benefits arising from a merger between the two groups.     Norcros said any such benefits could be achieved through normal trading and did not warrant a closer formal association.     Norcros shares firmed 30p to 342p after the news on investor speculation of a possible hostile bid from Williams, dealers said. Williams rose 2p to 742.     Williams earlier informed Norcros that it holds some 2,890,000 of its ordinary shares or 2.2 pct of those issued.  \n',acq
'Norcros Plc NCRO.L the building products and packaging group said its board had no hesitation in unanimously rejecting this morning\'s 542.2 mln stg bid from Williams Holdings Plc, the industrial holding firm.     The company said Williams\' 432.7p per share offer was unsolicited and unwelcome and significantly undervalues Norcros. By 1228 gmt Norcros shares were quoted at 418p, up from 397p at yesterday\'s close. Williams was 15p higher at 765.     The Norcros board\'s detailed views will be sent to shareholders when the formal offer document has been issued by Williams.  \n',acq
'Sweden\'s Nordbanken banking group said it would sell the 4.2 mln B free shares deposited as loan collateral by Fermenta AB\'s FRMS.ST founder and former chief executive Refaat el-Sayed and it planned to buy them up itself.     The bank said the sale - by public auction on March 16 -- was because of a debtor\'s inability to repay an overdue loan.     The B free shares closed at 16.50 crowns on the bourse\'s unofficial list -- down from a peak of 300 in January 1986. Nordbanken said it did not exclude accepting a suitable bid for the shares although it expected to buy them back itself.     The statement said the sale did not represent any withdrawal from Nordbanken\'s undertakings towards the Fermenta group and that it had been sanctioned by the other main shareholders.     Nordbanken is Fermenta\'s third largest creditor with loans of 155 mln crowns. It was one of the four Swedish banks which last month agreed to advance the group 110 mln crowns to solve its immediate liquidity problems. Together with two other main shareholders, it also advanced Fermenta an additional 65 mln crowns until a new equity issue could be made.     Fermenta is due to hold an extraordinary shareholders\' meeting on Tuesday to approve the planned equity issue.     Nordbanken had to make a provision against a 200 mln crown loan to el-Sayed in its 1986 results.     Fermenta\'s new management originally hoped to raise 160 mln crowns through the new one for four rights issue and an extra 170 mln from an issue to Nordbanken, another major creditor and shareholder Gotabanken and the group\'s new majority owner Industrivarden AB.     The share price was to be 20 crowns. But there has been doubt over the plans since the stock fell below this level this week after Fermenta\'s former chairman Kjell Brandstrom said the company was in a much worse state than he thought.  \n',acq
'North Broken Hill Holdings Ltd NBHA.ME (NBH) said it will offer one Norgold Ltd share for every five NBH shares in the float of its newly created gold offshoot.     The 20 cent par-value shares will be offered at 22 cents to shareholders registered April 3, NBH said in a statement.     Norgold\'s issued capital will be 240.5 mln shares, of which 63 pct will be held by NBH after 89 mln are issued to shareholders to raise 19.6 mln dlrs, it said.     Norgold will take control of a portfolio of precious metal exploration and pre-development interests held by NBH.     The major gold deposit to be acquired by Norgold is 100 pct of the Bottle Creek deposit, west of Leonora in Western Australia, NBH said.     Production of gold from the project, at an annual rate of 35,000 ounces, is scheduled to begin early in 1988.     Norgold will also have a 10 pct stake in the Coronation Hill gold/platinum project in the Northern Territory and 43 pct of the Poona copper/gold project in South Australia.     Other gold exploration interests to be acquired by Norgold are in Western Australia, Queensland, New South Wales and Tasmania, NBH said.  \n',acq
'VBI Corp, an offshore-based investment firm, told the Securities and Exchange Commission it raised its stake in the France Fund Inc FRN to 681,800 shares, or 9.1 pct of the total, from 551,000, or 7.4 pct.     VBI, which is based in Turks and Caicos Islands, the British West Indies, said it bought the additional shares between Feb 24 and March 4.     It has said it bought its France Fund stake for investment purposes only.  \n',acq
'Ing C Olivetti EC SpA OLIV.M does not exclude the possibility of investing in a semiconductor venture currently under discussion between Italy\'s STET - Societa Finanziaria Telefonica P.A. and France\'s Thomson-CSF TCSF.PA, an Olivetti spokesman said.     He said that if Olivetti were approached by the two partners involved and the financial conditions of any proposal were considered interesting, the company did not exclude the possibility of investing in the venture. However, Olivetti had made no decision on any such investment and did not have at its disposal information to evaluate such a move.      Stet and Thomson said last Thursday they were negotiating an accord involving their respective subsidiaries SGS Microelettronica SpA and Thomson Semiconducteurs in the civil semiconductor field.     They said the accord, once concluded, would be put for approval to the French and Italian authorities.     The Olivetti spokesman was responding to as query about Italian press reports today saying that Olivetti might participate in the venture with a two pct stake.  \n',acq
'Oxford Financial Inc said it acquired Clancy Systems International Inc for an undisclosed sum.     The company said Clancy has developed a fully automated parking citation system, currently in use in Oklahoma City, the University of California at Sacramento, and in a pilot program in San Francisco.  \n',acq
'The Reagan administration will consider curbing foreign takeovers of security-sensitive industries such as semiconductors and computers, the New York Times said, quoting an unnamed senior administration official.     \"I think there\'s a strong sentiment here that some industries are not totally up for grabs,\" the paper quoted the official as saying.     \"Two of the most visible (industries) are semiconductor and computer companies,\" said the official, who the newspaper said was a central figure in the opposition to Japan\'s Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T takeover bid for Fairchild Semiconductor Corp.     The Fairchild-Fujitsu deal was abandoned on Monday, and industry analysts said the move was a victory for the Reagan administration in its drive to beat back Japanese competition in the important computer chip manufacturing industry.     Officials tolds last week that Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige and Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger fought the planned sale of Fairchild by French-controlled Schlumberger Ltd SLB to Japan\'s largest computer maker because it could have left the U.S. Military dependent on foreign sources for vital technology.     The New York Times quoted Baldrige as saying the time had come to limit takeovers in security-sensitive areas.     \"Everybody wants an open investment policy, but there have to be some exceptions for the national interest,\" Baldrige was quoted as saying.     The newspaper said Baldrige and Weinberger are expected to bring the takeover issue before a top-level interagency policymaking group, such as Treasury Secretary James Baker\'s Economic Policy Council or the president\'s National Security Council.  \n',acq
'Paperboard Industries Corp said it planned to make an unconditional 21 dlr a share cash offer for Belkin Inc\'s 7.6 mln common and 2.3 mln non-voting shares.     Paperboard said Balaclava Enterprises Ltd, owned by Morris Belkin, agreed to tender 98.2 pct of Belkin\'s common shares. It added that in case of a competing offer of more than 23 dlrs, it had the right to match it. If it did not match the offer, Balaclava could accept the competing bid.     The two companies manufacture linerboard and boxboard from recycled fibre. Their combined revenues are about 500 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'Petroleos de Venezuela, S.A. said it will sign a contract March 17 to buy a half interest in a Corpus Christi, Texas refinery and related operations.     The contract, to be signed by PDVSA and Champlin Petroleum\'s parent company, the Union Pacific Corp, will create a new joint venture called Champlin Refining.     The state oil company said PDVSA will pay on the order of 30 mln dlrs for the half interest in Champlin.      Energy minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said Wednesday the cost would be 33 mln dlrs in cash, plus an additional 60 mln in crude and refined oil shipments.     PDVSA and Union Pacific have sought a line of credit from a group of North American and Japanese banks to finance the new company\'s working capital, the Venezuelan company said.     Under the deal, PDVSA will supply up to 140,000 barrels a day to the refinery with the option to place 50,000 bpd more - mostly gasoline and distillates - through Champlin\'s distribution system in 10 U.S. states.     The new company will be directed by a six-member board, with three representatives each from PDVSA and Union Pacific.     According to PDVSA, Venezuelans will occupy such key positions such as treasurer and vice-president for manufacturing.     The total capacity of the Champlin refinery is 160,000 bpd of crudes and another 40,000 bpd of intermediates. The plant will be able to handle 110,000 bpd of Venezuelan heavy crudes, which make up more than half of the country\'s crude oil exports.  \n',acq
'Peabody Holding Co Inc said it has completed its acquisition of substantially all Eastern Gas and Fuel Associate\'s EFU coal properties for 15.01 pct of Peabody Holding\'s stock.     Peabody said the purchase includes seven underground mines and seven coal preparation plants currently operated by Eastern, as well as coal properties being mined by several contractors in West Virginia.     The acquisition also involves about 800 mln tons of coal reserves, mostly in West Va., and includes Eastern\'s coal reserves and inactive Powderhorn operations near Palisade, Colo, Peabody said.     Peabody added that it expects to announce within the next week how it will staff and operate the properties and offices it has acquired from Eastern.  \n',acq
'Peat Marwick, an accounting and management consulting firm, and Nolan, Norton and Co, an information and technology planning concern, said they have merged.     The companies said with the merger Nolan now will be known as Nolan, Norton and Co-partners, the information technology arm of Peat Marwick.     Also as part of the merger, Nolan\'s 21 principals have become Peat Marwick partners, the companies said.  \n',acq
'Peat Marwick and KMG Main Hurdman said their merger will be completed tomorrow.     The new firm, to be known as KPMG Peat Marwick, will rank among the largest public account and consulting firms in the U.S. based on combined 1986 revenues of 1.35 billion dlrs, 1,825 partners and a total staff of 16,500 in 136 offices.     KPMG was created as part of the merger announced last September of Peat Marwick International Klynveld Main Goerdeler to form Klynveld Peat Marwick Goerdeler.  \n',acq
'peru will sell about 40 state-owned firms to trim a projected 740 mln dlrs loss this year among government-owned companies.     Some companies would be sold in their entirety and others would be privatised only partially, according to jose palomino, president of the government\'s state company holding firm, the national development council (conade).      He told reporters in a radio interview that the aim was to slim a projected public sector firm deficit of 11 billion intis. He did not say if foreigners would be allowed to buy all or part of the companies.     Independent economists warn that the deficit could push inflation to between 60 and 100 pct in 1987, against the govenment target of 40-50 pct.     Palomino said aeroperu, the government flagship airline with a 10-jet fleet, would issue stock for purchase by private investors. The company in 1986 registered its first profit in eight years, earning about 44.6 mln intis in pre-tax profits.     Peru has about 140 non-financial state firms. Palomino said the government would soon publish a list of those to be sold, including those whose shares would be offered on the lima stock exchange.     Last november, palomino said conade\'s plans included the possible sale of a company producing palm oil and another manufacturing electrical appliances. Shares could also be sold in a copper mine, empresa nacional tintaya sa, in the southern state of  arequipa.     Neither Palomino nor conade\'s general manager, enrique estremadoyro, were available for comment on whether foreigners would be allowed to purchase the companies. Their secretaries said they were out of their offices.     Jose antonio almenara, the general manager of the lima stock exchange, where shares of the state-owned firms could be sold, tolds that the only foreigners who could purchase stock at the exchange had to be tax-paying residents of peru.     He said foreign stockholders cannot remit profits abroad until at least july 1988.  \n',acq
'Alpha Health Systems Corp, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Pesch and Co, said it submitted a merger proposal to the board of REPH Acquisition Co, the parent company of Republic Health Corp, which is 64 pct owned by Pesch interests.     The balance of REPH\'s common stock is owned by members of Republic management, McDonnell Douglas Corp MD, Donaldson, Lufkin and Jenrette and Pacific Asset Holdings L.P.     Republic currently owns 44 hospitals and manages 46 other facilities, in 25 states.     Details of the proposal were not disclosed.  Company representatives were not immediately available.     The proposal provides that REPH would become a wholly-owned subsidiary of Alpha and that the existing REPH common stockholders would become stockholders of Alpha, it said.     REPH\'s board has appointed a special committee to negotiate terms of the proposed merger, Pesch said.     Last year, Republic was acquired by REPH in a leveraged buyout transaction led by Dr. LeRoy Pesch, the principal shareholder of Pesch and Co.     Alpha recently submitted a second offer to acquire the stock of American Medical International Inc (AMI) at 22 dlrs a share in cash and securities, which is still being considered by American Medical\'s board, Pesch said.  \n',acq
'The Philippines\' Social Security System (SSS) is planning to buy eight mln shares in diversified brewer San Miguel Corp (SMC), SMC chief financial officer Ramon del Rosario said.     He told reporters the government organisation had expressed interest in one seat on SMC\'s 15-man board and was preparing to invest 800 mln pesos, assuming a purchase price of 100 pesos a share.     The shares involved in the proposal were part of the block of 38 mln shares owned by the United Coconut Planters Bank (UCPB) and sequestered by the government.     The block is split between class A and class B stock.     SMC also proposed to sell a further five mln shares to A.N. Soriano Corp, the family company of San Miguel president Andres Soriano, del Rosario said.     The shares are worth some 500 mln pesos at recent prices.     Del Rosario said the 14 mln B shares in the block which are open to foreign ownership would probably be sold to unidentified foreign purchasers.     He said SMC and UCPB would meet later this week to try to resolve disputes over the pricing of the shares.     President Corazon Aquino earlier this month established an arbitration panel to settle a row over the disposal of the shares.     Their initial sale to Soriano through SMC Hong Kong unit Neptunia Corp was blocked by the Presidential Commission on Good Government.     The commission sequestered the stock on suspicion that the real owner of the block was Eduardo Cojuanco, the former chairman of San Miguel and the UCPB and a close associate of deposed former president Ferdinand Marcos.  \n',acq
'Philips Electrical (Ireland) Ltd has arranged the sale of the one mln ordinary shares it holds in its subsidiary Unidare Aluminium Ltd, Unidare said.     The placing has been arranged through Allied Irish Investment Bank Plc at an ex-dividend price of 371 Irish pence per share.  \n',acq
'Phoenix Steel Corp said a group of investors offered to buy its Clayton steel plate mill for eight mln dlrs and the assumption of a bond obligation.    Phoenix did not disclose the indentity of the investors.     Phoenix was forced to close the Clayton mill last month.     The company said the offer represents a major step in restructuring the company.  \n',acq
'Pilgrim Venture Corp said it signed a letter of intent to merge with Marketing Technologies Group Inc, Rockville Center, N.Y.     Under terms of the agreement, Pilgrim, a publicly held corporation, said it will issue two mln shares of authorized but unissued restricted common stock to Marketing Technologies shareholders. The company said it expects to complete the merger by June 17.     Marketing Technologies is developing a computer-based advertising system geared toward large advertisers, the company said.  \n',acq
'Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd said it considered the proposed 2.20 dlrs a share cash takeover offer announced by CSR Ltd CSRA.S on March 31 to be too low in view of the group*hK!UiIe and prospects.     Pioneer recommended in a statement that shareholders retain their stock, pending the board\'s response once it receives full details of the CSR offer.  \n',acq
'Plaza Group said it completed a transaction in which it merged its wholly owned subsidiary, Flyfaire International Inc, into Shefra Inc, a public company, in return for a controlling interest in Shefra.     With completion of the merger, Shefra changed its name to Flyfaire International Inc.     Flyfaire, with annual sales of 100 mln dlrs, is engaged in the wholesale vacation travel business.  \n',acq
'Principal Neo-Tech Inc said it completed the sale of its subsidiary, Neo-Tech Inc, to Seismic Holdings Inc and Energy Holdings Inc, of Denver, Colo.     As part of the price, Principal Neo-Tech received notes and preferred shares of Energy Holdings. However, terms were not disclosed.  \n',acq
'The Queensland Press Ltd (QPL) board said it unanimously recommended the one billion dlr takeover bid by Cruden Investments Pty Ltd, a family company of News Corp Ltd NCPA.S chief executive Rupert Murdoch.     The 23 dlrs a share cash-only offer is nearly double the market price before News announced its now-completed bid for The Herald and Weekly Times Ltd HWTA.S in early December and no other offer is likely, it said in a statement.     Independent adviser, Wardley Australia Ltd, had also concluded the offer was fair and reasonable, it added.     QPL is already owned 48.3 pct by HWT.  \n',acq
'New Zealand investment companies Rainbow Corp Ltd and Equiticorp Holdings Ltd have placed the majority of their joint shareholding in oil and gas conglomerate Ultramar PLC UMAR.L at prices up to 2.20 stg per share, the companies said in a statement.     The companies said they had bought their 4.9 pct stake in Ultramar for a total of 50 mln N.Z. Dlrs through a joint venture company formed for that purpose in October.     They said the joint venture made a profit of 15 mln N.Z. Dlrs on the deal, but they did say how many shares they had sold. No further details of the sale were available.  \n',acq
'Rainbow Corp Ltd said it has lifted its stake in supermarket group Progressive Enterprises Ltd to 52 pct from 44 pct.     It said in a statement it has bought an extra 9.4 mln shares at prices ranging from 3.80 N.Z. Dlrs to 4.80.     Progressive is currently the subject of both a proposed merger with Rainbow and a full takeover bid from Brierley Investments Ltd (BIL). The BIL bid, launched on Monday, is at 4.20 dlrs a share. The Rainbow merger involves shareholders in both Rainbow and Progressive being issued shares in a new company, Astral Pacific Corp Ltd, on a one-for-one basis.     Rainbow chief executive Craig Heatley said, \"In our opinion BIL\'s actions over the last few days have been undertaken for their own strategic purposes which conflict with the desire of both companies to merge their interests.\"     BIL has said it is against the merger because it sees Progressive shares as being worth twice as as much as Rainbow\'s.     Progressive traded today at 4.42, Rainbow at 3.66 and BIL at 4.30 at the end of morning trading on the New Zealand Stock Exchange.  \n',acq
'Rainbow Corp Ltd said Brierley Investments Ltd (BIL) is trying to disrupt Rainbow\'s planned merger with Progressive Enterprises Ltd.     Rainbow chairman Allan Hawkins said in a statement, \"In our opinion BIL have deliberately tried to create anomalies in the market prices of Rainbow and Progressive shares since the merger was announced.\"     The merger, announced in February, involves the formation of a new company, Astral Pacific Corp Ltd, which Rainbow and Progressive shareholders will enter into on a one-for-one share basis. Both boards have approved the merger.     BIL has said it was the mystery bidder behind a recent stand in the market for three mln Progressive shares.     \"We simply regard Progressive Enterprises shares to be worth approximately twice as much as Rainbow shares and do not think the merger, as proposed, is soundly based,\" BIL chief executive Paul Collins said in an interview in the weekly National Business Review newspaper published today.     Collins was not immediately available to respond directly to Hawkins\' statement.     Hawkins said the merger has been assessed by independent consultants and declared fair in all respects, with benefits to all shareholders.     \"We are not going to stand by while other parties distort the picture for their own strategic purposes and distract the market away from the real benefits of the merger,\" he said.     \"In our opinion, BIL\'s actions are clearly not designed to be in the long term interests of either Progressive or Rainbow shareholders,\" Hawkins said.  \n',acq
'Ranks Hovis McDougall Plc RHML.L said it was making an increased and final offer for the Avana Group Plc AVNA.L. The company already holds about 22.9 pct or 7.1 mln Avana ordinary shares.     It said in a statement the terms of the offer will be 13 new Rank Hovis shares for every five Avana ordinary shares, valuing each Avana share at 829p.     Avana shareholders will be entitled to receive and retain the net interim dividend of 5.25p per Avana share for the year ending 28 March 1987.     Accepting Avana shareholders will also be entitled to receive Ranks Hovis\'s forecast net interim dividend of 2.65p for the financial year ending 5 September 1987.     Ranks Hovis said that full acceptance of the increased offer would result in the issue of a maximum of 72.3 mln new Ranks Hovis shares or about 20 pct of the enlarged issued ordinary share capital of the company.     The latest offer will lapse on 17 April. Ordinary shareholders in Avana who accept the increased offer will have the opportunity to elect for cash for all or part of their holdings on the basis of 800p cash for each Avana share.     Ranks Hovis said the cash required for the cash alternative would be met by one of several methods.     For the first 10 mln Avana shares received opting for the cash alternative, Ranks Hovis would make a cash payment from its own resources.     For cash alternatives of more than 10 mln Avana shares, Morgan Grenfell, as agent for participants, will make a separate offer to purchase at 300p per share, net of expenses, up to 46.3 mln Ranks Hovis new shares to which such shareholders will be entitled under the increased offer. This is equivalent to 780p per Avana ordinary.     In addition, Ranks Hovis will make a further cash payment of 20p per Avana ordinary. Avana shares traded at 800p after the announcement, 32p up from last night\'s close of 768p. \n',acq
'Regie Nationale des Usines Renault RENA.PA said it and Chrysler Corp C have signed a letter of intent in which Chrysler plans to buy American Motors Corp AMO.N, 46 pct owned by Renault.     Renault President Raymond Levy said in a statement issued by the French state car group the agreement was an important stage in Renault\'s redeployment. \"It will allow Renault to continue its export programme to the U.S. And also opens a perspective of cooperation with a major American constructor,\" the statement said. Under the terms of the letter of intent, Chrysler will purchase Renault\'s stake held in the form of bonds and shares.     The Renault statement quoted Chrysler Chairman Lee Iacocca as saying, \"We welcome AMC shareholders into the Chrysler family.\"     He added that the accord would allow Renault and Chrysler to study the development of future products destined to be distributed by Renault and Chrysler in the North American and world markets.     \"Renault is a leader in our industry and I am happy to be working with them,\" Iacocca was quoted as saying.     Chrysler will pay for Renault\'s AMC interests held in bonds by a 200 mln dlr bond and will pay up to 350 mln dlrs for Renault share interests, depending on AMC sales and future profits, the Renault statement said.     The statement said the agreement in principle gave each side 30 days to put together a definitive accord. Approval would also be necessary from the Renault, Chrysler and AMC boards, from AMC shareholders and the relevant government authorities.     If the deal goes ahead, the statement said, AMC shareholders other than Renault will receive Chrysler shares for each of their shares valued at four dlrs.     AMC shareholders with convertible preferential shares will have the possibility to exchange them for Chrysler shares on the same conditions as those they would have had in exchanging them for AMC shares.  \n',acq
'Renouf Corp Ltd said it sold its 10.83 pct stake in NZI Corp Ltd to Brierley Investments Ltd, (BIL), for 207.7 mln N.Z. Dlrs.     Renouf managing director Mike Cashin said in a statement it had been Renouf\'s intention to build up a long-term strategic position in NZI. \"But it became clear to us that it was in the best interests of both NZI and ourselves for Brierley Investments to acquire our holding,\" he said.     He said Renouf built up its NZI holding over the past six months. The sale comprised 74.9 mln shares at 2.725 N.Z. Dlrs a share and 2,095 warrants at 1,709 dlrs each.     The warrants are attached to a 150 mln Swiss franc note issue. Each bond of 5,000 francs carries a detachable warrant entitling the bearer to 2,486 NZI shares.     In its 1986 annual report BIL reported that it held a 19 pct stake in NZI.     NZI has 673.4 mln ordinary shares on issue. Total capital including shares attached to warrants is 678.8 mln shares.     Cashin said the sale will result in a significant profit and places Renouf in a good position to consolidate on recent transactions and pursue other opportunities.     NZI shares were at 2.18 N.Z. Dlrs, BIL at 4.08 and Renouf at 6.15 at the close of trading.     BIL executives were unavailable for comment.  \n',acq
'REPH Acquisition Co said its board appointed a special committee to negotiate the terms of an offer made earlier today by Pesch and Co to merge with its Republic Health Corp REPH unit.     Pesch, through its Alpha Health Systems Corp unit, offered to acquire the 36 pct of Republic Health stock that it does not already own.     Terms of Pesch\'s offer have not been disclosed.      \n',acq
'Reuters Holdings Plc RTRS.L said it had agreed in principle to buy I P Sharp Associates Ltd of Toronto for 30.4 mln stg.     Sharp is a time-sharing network and database company specialising in finance, economics, energy and aviation. It operates a global packet-switching network and global limits systems for foreign exchange trading.     Sharp shareholders will be offered cash, shares or a mixture of the two in settlement. The acquisition, which is subject to Canadian government approval, would be through amalgamation into a specially-created company.    s said it had been given options by a number of Sharp shareholders covering 67 pct of the common stock pending completion of as review of the company.     Sharp operates 38 offices in 20 countries. In 1986 it reported revenue of 55 mln Canadian dlrs with a pretax loss of 1.6 mln compared with a 1.9 mln profit in 1985.     However, Sharp said that internal accounts showed the company was in profit in the first two months of 1987.     End-1986 net assets totalled 11.85 mln dlrs.     As statement said the acquisition would fit perfectly into its package for the banking and securities industries.  \n',acq
'French ski and tennis equipment maker Skis Rossignol said its 97.7-pct owned subsidiary Skis Dynastar SA agreed to buy Canadian ski stick and boot manufacturer CFAS from Warrington Inc.     A Rossignol spokesman declined to give financial details but said turnover of CFAS was about 100 mln French francs, doubling the Rossignol group\'s activities in the boot and stick sectors.  \n',acq
'Royex Gold Mining Corp said it is making an offer for International Corona Resources Ltd of 50 dlrs per share and 40 dlrs per warrant.     The offer covers four mln Corona common shares and all outstanding 9.50 dlr Corona share purchase warrants expiring August 31, 1987, Royex said.     Royex said that if it gains four mln Corona common shares, its interest in Corona will increase to 50 pct from 38 pct. It also said that if more than four mln shares are tendered, it will pay for them on a pro rata basis.     Royex said the purchase price for each Corona share consists of one Royex convertible retractable zero coupon Series B first preference share at 20 dlrs nominal value, one Royex convertible 6-1/2 pct Series C first preference share at 20 dlrs nominal value, one five-year 7.50 dlr Royex share purchase warrant and four dlrs in cash.     The price for each Corona warrant consists of 1.75 convertible retractable zero coupon Series B first preference share at 35 dlrs nominal value and one five-year 7.50 Royex share purchase warrant.      Royex said both series of preference shares will be convertible into Royex common shares, initially on a basis of 3.33 common shares for each preference share converted.  \n',acq
'Carburos Metalicos of Spain has bid 2,205 francs a share for French chemicals group Duffour et Igon, rivalling the 2,100 franc bid announced yesterday by Union Carbide France, the French subsidiary of the U.S. Chemical giant Union Carbide Corp UK.N, the stockbrokers\' assocation (CSAC) said here.     Duffour et Igon\'s capital is comprised of 133,100 shares with a nominal value of 100 francs each. Shares were last quoted at 856 francs on January 9.     Banque Paribas will act for Carburos Metalicos, while Union Carbide France\'s bid is being led by Rothschild et Associes Banque.     Duffour et Igon shares will be suspended on April 6 and 7 and will resume trading on April 8.  \n',acq
'The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (FHLBB) announced the acquisition of Home Savings and Loan Association in Seattle, Washington, by InterWest Savings Bank of Oak Harbour, Washington.     The FHLBB said Home Savings was the 12th troubled savings institution requiring federal action this year.     It said Home Savings had assets of 150.6 mln dlrs in assets and InterWest had assets of 342.9 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'Advertising agents Saatchi and Saatchi Co Plc SACHY said it was buying Cleveland Consulting Associates Inc for an initial consideration of 2.0 mln dlrs.     Additional payments may be made annually through the year ending March 31, 1991 to bring the total consideration up to 9.5 pct of Cleveland\'s average post-tax profits in the last two years of the period.     The purchase of Cleveland is a further step in Saatchi and Saatchi\'s fast growing consulting industry, the company said. It said its consulting operations now provide a platform for major future expansion.     For the 12 months ended 31 March 1986, Cleveland had 479,000 dlrs in pretax profits and forecasts one mln for 1987.     At the Saatchi and Saatchi annual meeting today, the company reported a particularly strong start to the current year, with profits sharply higher than the same period last year.     Saatchi and Saatchi shares rose one pence on the Cleveland announcement to 885p after yesterday\'s 870p close.  \n',acq
'Sale Tilney Plc said it has purchased 80 pct of the ordinary share capital of B and R International Inc., a U.S. Insurance broker, for 5.6 mln dlrs.     Sale is paying 3.6 mln dlrs in cash on completion, with the balance plus interest to be paid in equal instalments over the next six years.     B and R posted pretax profit of 855,000 dlrs in the year to Dec 31, 1986 when it had net tangible assets of 563,000 dlrs.  \n',acq
'Italian state bank Istituto Bancario San Paolo di Torino said its fully-owned San Paolo U.S. Holding Co of Wilmington in the U.S. had signed a letter of intent to acquire Valley National Bank of California.     San Paolo said in a statement that, subject to obtaining official authorization from the relevant bodies, it would merge Valley National Bank with its subsidiary First Los Angeles Bank.     Value of the planned acquisition was not disclosed.  \n',acq
'Sandoz Corp\'s Northrup King Co said it bought Stauffer Seeds, a unit of Stauffer Chemical Co.     Terms were not disclosed.  \n',acq
'Santa Fe Southern Pacific Corp will later today formally ask the U.S. Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) to reconsider its earlier rejection of the merger of the holding company\'s railroad assets, a company spokesman said.     \"We expect to file papers late tonight\" asking the ICC to reopen the rail merger case, spokesman Rich Hall said in a telephone interview from the company\'s Chicago headquarters.     The ICC had rejected in July, on grounds it would reduce competition, the merger of the Santa Fe and Southern Pacific Railroads.     The deadline for seeking ICC reconsideration of the merger plan is midnight tonight.  \n',acq
'Cooper Basin oil producer Santos Ltd STOS.S said it will bid 4.00 dlrs a share for the 96.03 pct it does not already hold in diversified oil and gas company TMOC Resources Ltd.     Santos said the bid values TMOC at 248.5 mln dlrs. It said it already holds 1.91 mln of TMOC\'s 25 cent par shares.     TMOC held interests outside the Cooper Basin region of South Australia and Queensland and the acquisition would further the Santos objective of developing as a broadly based oil and gas company with interests outside its existing base in the Cooper Basin, the company said in a statement.     Santos said TMOC holds several important domestic oil and gas production, exploration and pipeline interests.     In the Northern Territory it has a 43.75 pct stake in and operates the Mereenie oil and gas field in the Amadeus Basin and owns 32 pct of N.T. Gas Pty Ltd, owner and operator of the Alice Springs to Darwin gas pipeline.     In Queensland, TMOC has extensive interests in the Surat Basin, including the 100 pct owned and operated Moonie oil field and 33 pct of the Boxleigh gas field.     TMOC owns 80 pct of the Moonie Pipeline Co Pty Ltd which owns and operates the Moonie to Brisbane oil pipeline.     TMOC also holds 25 pct of the Jackson to Moonie oil pipeline, 20 pct owned by Santos. Output from the Naccowlah block, 40 pct owned by Santos, provides the bulk of the throughput of both pipelines.     TMOC has exploration interests in a number of areas in the Amadeus, Surat, Eromanga and Canning basins.     It also has oil and gas interests in Britain\'s North Sea, Ecuador, and the U.S., Along with gold and base metal production through its associate Paringa Mining and Exploration Co Plc, Santos said.  \n',acq
'Sanwa Bank Ltd ANWA.T has agreed to buy a two pct stake in Oporto-based Banco Portugues de Investmento Sarl (BPI), Portugal\'s largest merchant bank, a Sanwa official said.     Sanwa will purchase the shares from International Finance Corp, a BPI shareholder and sister organisation of the World Bank, for 351 mln yen, he said.     The acquisition will be completed this month as both the Japanese and Portuguse governments are expected to give permission soon.  This is the first time a Japanese bank has bought a stake in a Portuguese bank.     Sanwa plans to increase its stake in BPI to four pct, the ceiling for foreign shareholders, the official said.     The bank has also agreed with Banco Portugues do Atlantico, a state-owned merchant bank in Oporto, to exchange information on customers and help accelerate Japanese investment and technological transfers to Portugal, he said.  \n',acq
'The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (FHLBB) announced the acquisiton of South Bay Savings &amp; Loan Association in Gardena, Calif., By Standard Pacific Savings of Costa Mesa, Calif.     The FHLBB said South Bay had assets of 62.5 mln dlrs and Standard Pacific had 312.8 mln dlrs in assets.     It was the fourth federally-assisted merger or acquisition of a troubled savings institution this year, the FHLBB said.  \n',acq
'Scan-Graphics Inc said it will be acquired by Captive Venture Capital Inc, a public company, in a stock transaction approved by shareholders of both companies.     As a result of the merger, the former shareholders of Scan-Graphics will become the majority shareholders of Captive Venture Capital. The name of the corporation will be changed to Scan-Graphics Inc and its borad of directors will be composed of individuals now on the Scan-Graphics board.     Under the terms of the deal, Capitive Venture Capital will issue 1.6 mln shares of restricted convertible preferred stock, convertible into 16 mln shares of common stock, in exchange for all outstanding stock of Scan-Graphics.     Upon completing the deal, there will be 2,649,500 common shares of Capitive Venture Capital issued and outstanding, of which 149,500 shares will be held by the public.     In addition, there are 95,050 tradeable class A warrants and 100,000 B warrants, each of which entitles the holder to buy 10 shares of common stock at 1.25 dlrs and 1.50 dlrs, respectively, a share.     Scan-Graphics makes systems that allow users to convert graphic documents, such as charts, maps and engineering drawings, into computer data that can be displayed, edited and stored by computer.     Currently, Captive Venture Capital stock is traded over the counter and will soon trade under the Scan-Graphics name. Application for Nasdaq listing is expected as soon as requirements are met.  \n',acq
'Scan-Graphics Inc said it has completed a merger with Captive Venture Capital Inc in which former shareholders of Scan-Graphics have beome majority shareholders of the merged company and the Scan-Graphics board has been named the board of the merged company.     It said the merged company is now known as Scan-Graphics Inc and expects to be listed on the NASDAQ system soon.     It said Captive Venture issued 1,600,000 restricted preferred shares convertible into 16 mln common shares for Scan-Graphics.  Captive had 2,649,500 common shares outstanding before the merger.  \n',acq
'Charles Schwab announced the completion of the 280-mln-dlr purchase from BankAmerica Co of Charles Schwab and Co Inc and its holding company Charles Schwab Corp.     The leveraged buyout is being financed by a syndicate of seven banks led by the Security Pacific National Bank unit of Security Pacific Corp SPC, the announcement said.     Charles Schwab and Co is the nation\'s largest discount brokerage firm.     The Schwab announcement said BankAmerica received 175 mln dlrs in cash, 50 mln of 10 pct senior subordinated debentures, 55 mln dlrs of nine pct junior subordinated debentures and the right to receive 15 pct of the appreciated value of the common equity of the new company over a maximum period of eight years.     Security Pacific also acquired a stock appreciation right, equal to 1.8 pct of the value of the new company\'s fully diluted common stock, Schwab said.     The right is exchangeable into warrants upon transfer to a Security Pacific non-affiliate, Schwab said.     BankAmerica originally acquired Schwab in 1983 for 57 mln dlrs worth of BankAmerica common stock.     The sale of the profitable discount brokerage firm back to Charles Schwab was aimed at raising capital and was seen by banking analysts as a means of heading off a hostile takeover attempt by First Interstate Bancorp I.  \n',acq
'Scott\'s Hospitality Inc said it acquired all issued shares of Capital Food Services Ltd, of Ottawa. Terms were not disclosed.     Scott\'s said Capital Food had 1986 sales of more than 20 mln dlrs and will continue to operate under its present name with existing management.     Capital Food provides food services to several Ottawa institutions, the company said.  \n',acq
'The Securities and Exchange Commission reminded corporate raiders and others tendering for the shares of companies that they must extend the period their offers are open if key conditions are changed.     Specifically, the agency said those making tender offers for companies\' stock must extend the offers if they decide to eliminate conditions requiring a minimum number of shares to be tendered in order for the offers to be valid.     Tender offers typically include minimum share conditions. As a result, a purchaser would not be bound to buy the shares that were tendered if the minimum level were not reached.     In an interpretation of current rules, which officials said clarifies the SEC\'s present position, the agency said a tender offer must be extended if a minimum share condition is waived, even if the purchaser reserved the right to do so.     The interpretation makes clear that waiving a minimum share condition is a \"material change\" of the tender offer under U.S. securities law, SEC officials said.     The SEC has already said that other specific material changes, such as changes in the percentage of securities being sought or the price being offered, made during the course of a tender offer require a 10-day extension of the offer.     The length of the extension, which is aimed at giving shareholders an adequate chance to assess revisions of a tender offer, was not specified in cases where the minimum share conditions were waived.     SEC officials said the length of the extension in such cases would depend on the facts and circumstances surrounding each case, but would generally be between five and 10 days.     The agency cited two recent tender offers in which waivers of a minimum share conditios were tried on the last day of each offer, denying shareholders the chance to react to the new information. Officials declined to identify the two offers.     \"If a bidder makes a material change near or at the end of its offer, it will have to extend the offer to permit adequate dissemination,\" the SEC said.     Federal securities law requires that all tender offers remain open for at least 20 business days.  \n',acq
'Sedgwick Group Plc SDWK.L said its wholly-owned Canadian subsidiary Sedgwick Tomenson Inc had acquired BSi Incorp for a maximum eight mln Canadian dlrs.     The funds will be raised through the issue of up to 1.16 mln ordinary Sedgwick shares to the vendors of BSi by no later than 31 January 1991. Some 427,054 shares already have been issued.     BSi is a privately-held Canadian company involved in actuarial, employee and executive benefits consulting and administration. Its 1986 pretax profits excluding extraordinary items totalled 1.14 mln Canadian dlrs.  \n',acq
'Senate Banking Committee chairman William Proxmire called for curbs of hostile corporate takeovers and new restrictions on risk arbitrageurs.     \"At the very least, it is high time that we require all risk arbitrageurs to register seperately and specifically  with the Securities and Exchange Commission and that we consider precluding brokerage firms and their employers from investing in, or owning any securities issued by, third party risk arbitrage operations,\" Proxmire said at the start of a hearing on corporate takeovers.     \"A burning issue must be whether there ought to be a complete seperation in the future of risk arbitrage and investment banking,\" Proxmire said.     He said he was concerned that hostile takeover attempts were hurting the economy, a view shared by corporate executives who tesitified at the hearing. \"I believe that takeovers have become so abusive and so tilted in favor of the financial buccaneers that remedial action is required,\" USX Corp chairman David Roderick said. \"For Congress to allow the takeover game to continue unchecked, would be economic suicide,\" Champion International Corp chairman Andrew Sigler added.  \n',acq
'The chairman of the Senate antitrust subcommittee said the Transportation Department was allowing too many airline mergers and proposed its authority be transfered to the Justice Department.     \"The Transportation Department\'s antitrust enforcement has been disastrous, permitting rampant merger mania,\" Ohio Democrat Howard Metzenbaum said in a statement.     \"The nine largest airlines now control 94 per cent of the market. That\'s bad for competition and bad for the consumer,\" he said.     Metzenbaum said he introduced a bill to transfer antitrust authority over airline mergers to the Justice Department in hopes it would more restrictive than the Transportation Department.  \n',acq
'Senior Engineering Group Plc said it reached agreement with Cronus Industries Inc to acquire the whole share capital of South Western Engineering Co for 12.5 mln dlrs cash. This sum is being financed by a term loan.     South Western is one of the U.S.\'s leading manufacturers of heat transfer equipment, with a turnover of 54.86 mln dlrs and pre-tax profits of 1.72 mln in 1986.     Completion of the deal is conditional on approval under U.S. Hart-Scott-Rodino regulations which is expected within 30 days. Some 350,000 dlrs is payable immediately, 12 mln dlrs payable on completion with the balance due by June 30, 1987.  \n',acq
'Service Control Corp said it has started a tender offer for all shares of American Service Corp at 37 dlrs each.     In a newspaper advertisement, the company said the offer and withdrawal rights expire April Nine unless extended.  The American Service board has approved the offer, which is to be followed by a merger at the same price.     Service Control said the offer is conditioned on receipt of at least 534,806 shares.  It said holders of 534,819 shares have agreed to tender their shares under the offer and have granted Service Control an option to buy them at 37 dlrs each.  \n',acq
'Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman John Shad said the SEC favors shortening the current 10-day period for disclosing takeover attempts but opposes putting restrictions on the use of so-called junk bonds.     \"We favor shortening the disclosure period to two days,\" Shad told members of the House Telecommunications and Finance subcommittee when asked for his recommendation.     He said the SEC\'s responsibility was to provide full disclosure for securities, including junk bonds, and not to make decisions based on merit. He said junk bonds had some value because of their liquidity.     Shad said he opposes proposals to require those attempting takeovers to file a statement on the impact the takeover would have on the communities involved.     \"We\'ve opposed it in the past. It goes far beyond investor protection,\" Shad said.     He said he had no comment on a proposal by House Speaker Jim Wright, D- Texas, to tax securities transactions.  \n',acq
'Securities and Exchange Commission chairman John Shad said progress was being made in stopping insider trading, but the chairman of a House subcommittee with jurisdiction over securities laws said he was concerned about conditions on Wall Street.     \"Greed has created a feeding frenzy on Wall Street and in the process laws are broken and multi-billion dlr corporations have become easy prey,\" Rep. Edward Markey, D-Mass, the chairman of the Telecommunications and Finance said at the start of a hearing on SEC activities.     \"Congress is understandably nervous. We perceive the current scandals as a warning of even worse things to come,\" Markey said. \"The frenzy and disruption created by merger mania is particularly distressing.\"     Shad said the recent cases involving Ivan Boesky, Dennis Levine and others was a warning that those who engage in insider trading were taking a heavy risk of imprisonment, high fines and disbarment from the securities industry.     \"Insider trading has not been eradicated, but it has been inhibited and multimillions of dollars of profits that Boesky and others have been siphoning off the markets are now flowing through to legitimate investors and traders,\" Shad said in his statement.     Shad said insider trading cases involved only 10 pct or less of SEC enforcement actions in recent years but they have increased significantly to 125 cases brought during the past five years compared to 77 cases in the preceeding 47 years.     Markey said he did not favor banning takeovers but thought the tender offer process needed reform including earlier disclosure of takeover attempts.     N.J. Rep. Mathew Rinaldo, the senior subcommittee Republican, said he was introducing legislation to create a five member commission to study the securities industry for a year and report its findings and recommendations to Congress. Commission members would be appointed by the SEC.     \"Its primary mission would be to analyze the extent of illegal trading on insider trading and to assess the adequacy of existing surveillance systems and government oversight operations. The commission would advise Congress as to what additional resources or civil or criminal remedies are needed to combat fraud and improve compliance with federal laws,\" Rinaldo said.  \n',acq
'Shamrock Holdings Inc said its subsidiary, Shamrock Holdings of California, acquired controlling interest in DBMS Inc through the purchase of 575,000 shares of its preferred stock.     The company said the stock was purchased for an undisclosed amount from an unnamed group of investors.     Shamrock said Raymond Nawara, a former executive vice president of DBMS, a privately-held software company, also granted it options and voting rights on a major portion of his shares of common stock.         The combination of preferred and common stock holdings permit Shamrock and Nawara to exercise voting control over approximately 53 pct of the shares of the company.     Shamrock also said Nawara has been elected president of DBMS and one of its directors.  \n',acq
'Public Relations consultancy Shandwick Plc said it had agreed to buy the Los Angeles-based Rogers and Cowan Inc which specialises in the entertainment industry.     A total of 2.25 mln dlrs is payable on completion, 1.5 mln will be injected into the business through an interest free loan and the expenses of the acquisition amount to 660,000 stg.     Shandwick said it would raise 5.1 mln stg through the placing of 1.16 mln shares to finance the deal, with the balance of 2.04 mln stg used to strengthen the balance sheet and in anticipation of future performance-related payments.     In the year to end-September Rogers\' operating income was more than 10 mln dlrs. After the acquisition Shandwick\'s U.S. Operating income will be comparable to that it earns in the U.K.     Rogers\' estimated that pretax profit in the year to end-1987 would exceed 900,000 dlrs. An extraordinary loss of 504,000 dlrs in 1986 resulted from the write off of assets.     Net tangible assets at end-September were 363,000 dlrs.     Shandwick shares were unchanged at 460p.  \n',acq
'Sheppard Resources Inc said it signed a letter of intent to merge with Breast Centers Inc, an owner, operator and franchiser of clinics that provide services for the early detection of breast cancer.     Terms were not disclosed.     After the merger, Breast Centers shareholders would become the majority shareholders of the combined company.     Also, if approved, Sheppard will change its name to Breast Centers.  \n',acq
'SHV (United Kingdom) Holding Co Ltd said it was making a tender offer for up to 33 mln ordinary shares in Imperial Continental Gas Association.ICGS.L.     It said in a statement the offer was on the basis of 700p for each IC Gas ordinary and 252p for every one stg nominal of IC Gas loan stock.     SHV already holds 6.8 mln IC Gas ordinary stock units representing around 4.9 pct of the current issued share capital.     Successful completion of the offer would increase SHV\'s stake in IC Gas to 39.8 mln shares, representing around 27.9 pct of issued share capital, it said.     The offer capitalises IC Gas at around one billion stg.     It said it was tendering for both ordinary stock and loan stock, which when fully converted, gave a total of 33 mln IC Gas ordinary. It is making the tender offer through N.M. Rothschilds.     IC Gas said in a statement it noted the SHV tender offer and the terms were being considered.     It said a further statement would be made as soon as possible. ... \n',acq
'SHV Holdings NV said it is withdrawing its take-over bid for Imperial Continental Gas Association ICGS.L after failing to gain the minimum number of pledges sought from IC Gas shareholders.     SHV said in a statement it had sought to gain 750,000 IC Gas shares under a 700p offer for IC Gas ordinary stock but was informed that level was not reached when the deadline expired. \"The tender offer is therefore void,\" it said.      SHV also offered 252 pence for every one stg nominal of IC Gas loan stock under the bid, made by SHV (United Kingdom) Holding Co Ltd.  \n',acq
'Siemens AG\'s SIEG.F fully-owned subsidiary Siemens Informations Systems Inc. Has raised its stake in Telecom Plus Communications Inc. by 65 pct to 100 pct, a Siemens spokesman said.     He added that Telecom Plus Communications was the largest independent supplier of telephone exchange systems in the U.S. And had turnover of 234 mln dlrs in 1986.    The stake had been acquired from Telecom Plus International Inc. The spokesman declined to comment on U.S. Newspaper reports that the purchase price totalled 173 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'Siemens AG SIEG.F rebutted U.S. Criticism it is blocking American Telephone and Telegraph Corp\'s T.N, AT and T, entry into French telecommunications firm Compagnie Generale Constructions Telephoniques, CGCT.     Management board member Hans Baur told journalists that the acquisition of a joint 20 pct stake in CGCT by AT and T and Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken NV PGLO.AS had not been decided on two years ago as claimed by AT and T.     The French government, which owns CGCT, had asked Siemens at the start of 1986 to submit an offer for the stake in CGCT. The result of the negotiations was still open.     Baur said Siemens had first made an offer last summer.     The Handelsblatt newspaper today quoted AT and T chairman James E. Olson as saying that Siemens\' attempt to stop AT and T and Philips could lead to a resurgence of protectionism in the U.S.     Baur said he expected the French government to decide on the winning bid by the end of April. CGCT\'s share of the French switchboard market amounts to around 16 pct.     The French government has limited CGCT participation by foreign companies to 20 pct and set a price of 500 mln francs for the whole company.     Bauer said the 20 pct limitation would only apply to the initial stake. He did not rule out a stake increase later but said Siemens\' aim was to introduce its technology.     Bauer said Siemens and French telecommunications firm Jeumont-Schneider SA submitted a joint offer at the start of March because of the 20 pct limitation. Both companies will form a joint venture to take over the whole of CGCT.    Siemens will have a 20 pct stake in the new company while Jeumont-Schneider will own 80 pct. Apart from investing 100 mln francs for the modernisation of CGCT, a new research centre with was also being planned.  \n',acq
'The Singapore government has taken over 82 mln dlrs worth of Goodwood Park Hotel Ltd shares and loan stock certificates belonging to the company\'s chairman, Khoo Teck Puat, banking sources said.     Khoo is a major shareholder of the National Bank of Brunei Bhd (NBB), which closed in November after the Brunei authorities alleged 90 pct of its loans of 1.3 billion Brunei dlrs had been extended to Khoo-related firms without documentation or guarantee.     The Goodwood securities are now held by the Commercial Affairs Investigation Department, the banking sources said. The department declined to comment.     The government move is aimed at protecting Goodwood\'s minority shareholders and securing Goodwood deposits at the NBB, the banking sources said.     Goodwood had a total of 87.3 mln dlrs in fixed deposits, bank balances and accrued interest due from NBB as of last November, according to Goodwood\'s annual report.  \n',acq
'Skandia International Holding AB, the overseas offshoot of Swedish insurance group Forsakrings AB Skandia SKDS.ST said it was buying a 29.9 pct share in the London-quoted property and financial services company Nevi Baltic Plc. No financial details were given.     Nevi Baltic, with a 1986 turnover of 20 mln stg and total assets of 70 mln stg, is controlled by Norwegian finance company Nevi AS which will retain a 30.1 pct stake in the British unit, Skandia said in a statement.     The deal is subject to formal approval from the Swedish central bank, the statement added.   \n',acq
'Swedish construction and real estate company Skanska AB skbs.St. said it will sell its 49 pct holding in Canadian building firm Canadian Foundation Company Ltd to rival Banister Continental Ltd.     A company spokeswoman tolds Skanska will receive Banister shares as payment, giving the Swedish group 15 pct of the stock in the expanded Banister firm.     She said Skanska will also be appointing two board members to the Canadian company.  \n',acq
'SmartNames Inc said it reached an agreement in principle to buy American Information Network.     Terms of the agreement were not disclosed.     The company said the purchase of American will allow it to meet the needs of a broader range of direct mail industry customers.  \n',acq
'Southam Inc said it agreed to sell its 49 pct interest in Sun Publishing Co Ltd, which publishes The Brandon Sun, to majority shareholder publisher Lewis D. Whitehead.     Terms were not disclosed.     Southam said the proposed sale resulted from an offer made by Whitehead, whose family has had majority control of the newspaper since 1905.     The Brandon Sun has daily circulation of 19,100.  \n',acq
'Southam Inc said its Flyer Force unit acquired three community newspapers in Winnipeg with a combined circulation of 65,000 for undisclosed terms.     Southam said the newspapers, The Herald, The Lance and Metro One, will be printed at its Canadian Publishers division in Winnipeg.     Flyer Force intends to expand distribution of the newspapers to begin improved service to the Winnipeg market, Southam said.  \n',acq
'(Sportscene Restaurants Inc) said it acquired (Cafe Christophe Van Houtte Inc), a cafe chain with ten franchises and one corporate restaurant, for an unspecified amount of cash and Sportscene shares.  \n',acq
'Sweden\'s Stora Kopparbergs Bergslags AB SKPS.ST said it has now acquired 90 pct of shares in rival pulp and paper makers Papyrus AB, thus passing the threshold above which it can compulsorily buy the rest of the company.     Remaining shareholders would have until later this month to sell their shares to Stora, the company said in a statement.     Stora announced last September it would acquire Papyrus at a price of 5.8 billion crowns, thus forming Europe\'s second largest forest group after London-based Reed International Plc REED L.  \n',acq
'Sturm, Ruger and Co Inc said it submitted a bid in excess of 60 mln dlrs for Smith and Wesson, a manufacturer of law enforcement firearms, and a unit of Lear Siegler.     Smith and wesson is among a number of companies being sold by Forstman and Little after its recent acquisition of Lear Siegler.  \n',acq
'Swedish Match AB SMBS.ST said it was selling one of its Portuguese subsidiaries, Sociedade de Iniciativa e Aproveitamentos Florestais Sarl (SIAF), to the Porto-based Sonae Group for an undisclosed price.     SIAF, a subsidiary of Swedish Match since 1946, had a turnover last year of 62 mln crowns, the Swedish group said in a statement.  \n',acq
'A top Swiss banker called for an obligatory, continuous rating for all Swiss franc bonds and said he believed anyone buying more than five pct of a company should be made to declare their share.     In comments at a news conference of Vontobel Holding AG, chairman Hans Vontobel said he believed it was up to the banks\' own self-regulating bodies, such as the Swiss Admissions Board, to take such action before governmental bodies stepped in.     A decline in the average quality of borrowers on the Swiss franc market and a debate on the use of registered shares to prevent takeovers have made both major issues among bankers.     Vontobel noted that many borrowers already came to the market with ratings from the major U.S. Agencies, which were readily available to professionals through specialised information systems.     \"We should make this classification obligatory and publish it in places that are easily accessible to lay people,\" he said. The quick changing nature of the financial market meant these ratings should also be continually updated, he said.     Vontobel also noted that recent years had seen companies, worried about takeovers, increasingly issuing registered shares and participation certificates rather than bearer shares.     However, both types of issue had a drawback, he said. The recent attempt by Jacobs Suchard AG JACZ.Z to take over Hero Conserven Lenzburg HERZ.Z had shown the limits of a 1961 pledge by the banks not to sell registered shares to someone who was not eligible according to the company\'s statutes.     Excessive issue of participation certificates, which do not carry voting rights, would also be contrary to the principle of greater democracy in the new share law before Parliament.     \"People buying, for example, more than five pct of a company\'s shares should be made to declare their purchase,\" he said.  \n',acq
'Trilogy Resource Corp said Teck Corp agreed to purchase 4.5 mln Trilogy common shares at one dlr per share in a private placement, which would increase its stake in Trilogy to 37 pct from 29 pct.     Trilogy also said its board approved a private placement of 3.5 mln common shares at a price of 90 cts per share to a group of investors.     The placement will be made through McNeil Mantha Inc.  \n',acq
'(Telemedia Inc) said its (Telemedia Publishing Inc) subsidiary agreed to buy privately-owned Harrowsmith and Equinox magazines for an undisclosed amount of cash.     Telemedia said the acquisition is expected to have a small positive impact on short-term earnings.     Harrowsmith, an alternative life-style magazine, is Canada\'s seventh-largest paid circulation English-language magazine while Equinox is the country\'s eighth largest. Each has a circulation of about 160,000 copies.      The magazine group had revenues of eight mln dlrs last year and employs 50 people, Telemedia said.                  Telemedia said it will also acquire a 10 pct interest in the company which recently launched the U.S. edition of Harrowsmith.     The magazine\'s U.S. editiion, begun last year, now has a paid circulation of 180,000, the company said.     It said a final deal is expected in mid-April.     Telemedia said the magazines\' founder has agreed to continue to provide editorial and publishing direction for the magazines.  \n',acq
'Tesco Plc TSCO.L said that County Ltd had yesterday bought on its behalf 2.06 mln shares, or around 4.2 pct, in Hillards Plc for between 302p and 310p a share.     Tesco yesterday launched a 151.4 mln stg bid for the north of England supermarket chain, which Hillards promptly rejected.     Hillards shares were last quoted at 324p, compared with last night\'s close of 313p.  \n',acq
'Tesco Plc TSCO.L said County Bank Ltd had bought 165,000 shares in Hillards Plc on its behalf, increasing its stake to 5.4 pct. The shares were bought at 313.25p each.     Tesco is making an opposed 151 mln stg bid for Hillards.     Hillards shares at 0900 GMT were quoted one penny firmer at 317p while Tesco was one penny easier at 479p.  \n',acq
'Tesco Plc TSCO.L said it was extending its 151 mln stg contested bid for Hillards Plc until May 1.     It said it now controlled 9.8 pct of Hillards shares, comprising acceptances of the offer for 1.5 mln, or 3.1 pct, and 3.2 mln, or 6.7 pct, owned by itself, its pension fund or its associates.     It also controlled 23,250 convertible preference shares, or 0.2 pct.     Hillards shares were unchanged at 313p while Tesco was two pence firmer at 475p.  \n',acq
'Timminco Ltd said it acquired Universal Adhesives Inc, of Memphis, for undisclosed terms, in a move to expand Timminco\'s operations into the United States.     The company said Universal Adhesives, with five U.S. plants, has annual sales of 12 mln U.S. dlrs, which will double Timminco\'s presence in the North American adhesives market.     Timminco said Universal Adhesives will complement the company\'s Canadian-based industrial adhesives division and is a key step in its long-term goal for expansion in the specialty chemical field.  \n',acq
'TMOC Resources Ltd told shareholders not to accept Santos Ltd\'s STOS.S 4.00 dlr a share takeover bid pending advice from Macquarie Hill Samuel Corporate Services, its corporate advisor.     It said in a statement the Santos bid was below the underlying value of the shares as assessed by Macquarie Hill Samuel at between 4.08 dlrs and 4.72.     TMOC, formerly the Moonie Oil Co Ltd, said the valuation was made in response to an earlier and still current bid of 2.55 dlrs a share by Elders Resources Ltd. Elders Resources holds 19.9 pct of TMOC\'s 62 mln shares.     TMOC said it did not know Elders Resources\' response to the bid or that of its other major shareholder the Australian Gas Light Co. The latter has a 10.5 pct stake in TMOC.     Avalon Corp of the U.S. Has a 17 pct stake in TMOC through an option agreement.     Santos, which is 15 pct owned by Elders Resources, yesterday said its bid valued TMOC at 248.5 mln dlrs.     TMOC said today this was not a premium over the share price before the bid and that TMOC had traded at up to 4.06 dlrs a share in the last two weeks.     TMOC said in the statement that the bid was unsolicited and that Santos had only a 3.07 pct stake despite paying up to four dlrs a share on-market.     TMOC has oil and gas interests and pipelines which complement the operations of Santos, the major Cooper Basin oil and gas producer.     TMOC shares today closed five cents up at 4.15 dlrs on turnover of 182,000 shares while Santos, due to release its profit result today, rose eight cents to 4.50 dlrs on volume of 245,000 shares.  \n',acq
'Toshiba Corp TSBA.T said it regrets its plan to enter the U.K. Business facsimile and telephone market may be caught up in a diplomatic row over the position of Cable and Wireless Plc\'s CAWL.L in the Japanese market.     Britain is considering how to retaliate against Japan\'s attempt to prevent Cable and Wireless from taking a major position in a Japanese international telecommunications venture.     \"As a matter of timing it is regrettable that this has been linked with the question of market access in Japan,\" a Toshiba spokesman tolds.     Toshiba Information Systems (U.K.) Ltd, a Toshiba subsidiary, said yesterday it planned to enter the U.K. Market under the Toshiba own brand name and had applied for government approval to do so.     Toshiba has supplied equipment to U.K. Manufacturers for sale under their brand names since last year.     The Toshiba spokesman said the sale of such equipment was not comparable to Cable and Wireless\' efforts to take a stake in the new Japanese telecommunications firm.     \"They are matters of a different category,\" he said.  \n',acq
'The state-owned Philippine National Bank (PNB) will fund Toyota Motor Corp\'s TOYO.T planned purchase of its bankrupt former local partner\'s manufacturing facilities for at least 193 mln pesos, a bank official told reporters.     Toyota has informed the Philippine government it plans to produce cars again here in joint venture with a local partner.     It proposes to invest about 400 mln pesos in the manufacture of car spare parts and other items, and generate about 100 mln pesos in export earnings over five years.     The banker said today a letter of intent was signed three weeks ago but the sale requires approval from government agencies charged with selling private sector assets taken over by state-owned banks.     Official sources said Toyota\'s application was likely to be approved.     Toyota severed ties with its Philippine partner of 20 years, Delta Motor Corp, in 1984 because the local company was suffering financial difficulties. PNB later foreclosed on Delta\'s assets.  \n',acq
'Equity investment company Battery Group Ltd said it had agreed to buy Occidental Life Insurance Co of Australia Ltd from TransAmerica Corp TA of the U.S. For 105 mln Australian dlrs.     The acquisition has been made possible by the efforts of its major shareholder, Pratt and Co Financial Services Pty Ltd, Battery Group said in a statement.     The purchase will be partly funded by the issue of eight mln shares at 4.50 dlrs each and four mln free options to the Pratt Group, controlled by entrepreneur Dick Pratt, plus four mln shares to professional investors at 4.50 each, it said.     The balance will be funded by debt, Battery Group said.     The acquisition is subject to the approval of its shareholders.     On completion of the share placements, Pratt Group will effectively have 51 pct of Battery\'s enlarged capital, assuming exercise of all options, it said. Battery now has 22 mln shares on issue.     Battery said Occidental Life is a major underwriter of individual term life insurance and a recent but fast-growing entrant in the individual account superannuation market.     It has some 200 mln dlrs in funds under management.  \n',acq
'Swedish tyres, process equipment and components firm Trelleborg AB said it was taking a larger stake in mining and metals concern Boliden AB BLDS.ST than it had originally intended.     Trelleborg had previously announced it was exercising an option to acquire up to 65 pct of Boliden\'s voting rights.     In a statement, the company said they had received offers of up to 68 pct of the rights, and that they would accept all.  \n',acq
'The U.K. Trade Department said it would not refer Consolidated Goldfields Plc\'s CGLD.L purchase of American Aggregates Corp to the Monopolies Commission.     Cons Gold said last month that its ARC America Corp unit had agreed to buy the Ohio-based company for 30.625 dlrs a share cash, or 242 mln dlrs, in a deal recommended by the Aggregates board.  \n',acq
'The Secretary of State for Trade and Industry said he had decided not to refer the proposed acquisition by Reed International Plc REED.L of Technical Publishing Company Inc to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.     The proposed acquisition by Rosehaugh Plc of The General Funds Investment Trust Plc was also cleared.  \n',acq
'The British Conservative government said it would sell off its remaining 31.7 pct shareholding in British Petroleum Co Plc BP.L during the next financial year which starts on April 1.     Treasury Financial Secretary Norman Lamont made the announcement to Parliament. He said, \"The government\'s policy is to sell its minority holdings in companies as and when circumstances permit.     \"As part of this policy I am now able to announce that, subject to market conditions, the government will sell its remaining shares in BP during the 1987/88 financial year.\"     The last sale of British government shares in BP was in September 1983. The government currently holds some 578.5 mln ordinary shares in the company.     Lamont said the Treasury would appoint financial advisers for the sale. Merchant banks and stockbrokers interested in being considered for this would be interviewed in early April.     In September 1983, the U.K. Government sold 150 mln shares in an underwritten offer for sale by tender. The striking price then was 435 pence - 7.5 pct above the minimum tender price, a Treasury spokesman said.     He said the sale of BP shares would not cut across the government\'s plans to privatise Rolls-Royce, in either April or May, or the sale of BAA Plc, the British airports authority which is slated for privatisation in either June or July.  \n',acq
'A U.S. House subcommittee voted to give President Reagan authority to block foreign takeovers of U.S. companies similar to the takeover of Fairchild Semiconductor Corp. by Fujitsu Ltd which was withdrawn.     The Energy and Commerce Subcommittee on Commerce approved as an amendment to the overall House trade bill a provision giving Reagan the power to block sales to foreign companies if the sale was not in the national or economic interest.     The subcommittee rejected a proposal requiring the U.S. to pay investors one pct for the right to hold their gold investments in government storage. His amendment called for the government to sell gold coins and gold-backed bonds with maturities of 30 to 50 years to investors to reduce the federal debt.  \n',acq
'A House subcommittee voted to give President Reagan authority to block foreign takeovers of U.S. companies similar to the takeover of Schlumberger Ltd\'s SLB Fairchild Semiconductor Corp by Fujitsu Ltd which was withdrawn.     The House Energy and Commerce Subcommittee on Commerce approved as an amendment to the overall House trade bill a provision giving Reagan the power to block sales to foreign companies if the sale was not in the national or economic interest.                     The takeover provision was sent to the full Energy and Commerce Committee for consideration as part of the overall trade bill which is being written by several House committees.     The subcommittee\'s bill would bar imports of digital audio recording equipment that is not made with anti-copying chips. This provision is designed to protect U.S. companies from the unauthorized use of U.S. designs in foreign products.     The bill calls for an investigation of whether U.S. engineering and construction firms are given adequate opportunity to bid on Japan\'s civil works procurement practices including the construction of the Kansai airport.     The Energy and Commerce subcommitte rejected a plan offered by Rep. William Dannemeyer, a California Republican, to require the U.S. to pay investors one pct for the right to hold their gold investments in government storage.     His amendment called for the government to sell gold coins and gold-backed bonds with maturities of 30 to 50 years to investors to reduce the federal debt.                 \n',acq
'The U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) is reviewing whether Trans World Airlines Inc TWA and Chairman Carl Icahn violated federal antitrust law by failing to seek advance clearance from the DOJ or the Federal Trade Commission for his extensive open-market purchases of USAir Group Inc U stock, a DOJ official told a Senate panel.     \"This is a matter that is being looked into,\" Charles Rule, acting assistant attorney general-antitrust, told the Senate Judiciary Committee\'s Antitrust Subcommittee.     Rule declined further comment while the review was continuing.     Rule was responding to panel Chairman Howard Metzenbaum (D-Ohio), who had asked why the department was not acting against \"what appears to be a clear violation of the law.\"     Metzenbaum said Icahn had failed to file a pre-merger notification form with the FTC prior to purchasing more than 15 mln dlrs\' worth of USAir stock.     But Rule said that, for airline companies, a purchaser would be exempt from the requirement if it instead had filed a merger application with the U.S. Department of Transportation.     Icahn filed such an application with the DOT, but the filing was thrown out by the DOT on Friday.     The DOT threw out the application late Friday on grounds it lacked the necessary data for the government to review the proposed USAir takeover bid.     Icahn refiled a more complete application form Monday.     Rule pledged to act against Icahn and TWA if a violation were found.  \n',acq
'The Securities Industry Association backed a variety of restraints on insider trading and hostile corporate takeovers and asked Congress to define insider trading in law.     The industry trade association called on U.S. securities firms to take steps to protect sensitive corporate secrets to guard against illegal trading by employees.     The association also backed broad federal restrictions on a variety of tactics used in hostile corporate takeovers.     But it said investment banking firms should be allowed to continue to engage in both arbitrage and merger and acquisition activities so long as those functions were kept separate.     The SIA, in a report adopted yesterday by its board of directors, backed a higher enforcement budget for the federal Securities and Exchange Commission and called on U.S. stock exchanges to beef up their supervision of member brokerages.     The report said securities firms \"should be more rigorous in restricting sensitive information on a need-to-know basis.\"     It said firms should train their employees to understand the need for confidentiality of market-sensitive information.     It said legislation to define insider trading should avoid expanding current law in a way that would impede the market.     It said an insider trading definition should exempt a securities firm from liability for law violations by its employees unless the firm had participated in or was aware of the wrongdoing.     In the mergers and acquisitions area, the association advocated a ban on greenmail payments or poison pill takeover protection plans without prior shareholder approval.     It said a group or individual buying up a company\'s stock should be required to file a public disclosure statement before acquiring more than five pct of the company\'s shares. Under current law, disclosure may be made as late as ten days after exceeding the five pct limit.     The association said all purchases exceeding 20 pct of a company\'s voting stock shouls be made only through a tender offer open to all shareholders. Under current law there is no limit on open market purchases.     The group said the federal government should preempt state regulation of defensive takeover tactics.     The group said all tender offers should remain open for at least 30 calendar days.     The current requirement is expressed in business days.     It said so-called \"lockup\" devices, in which securities are issued to a friendly investor to seal a takeover deal or fend off an unfriendly predator should be limited to 18.5 pct of the target company\'s total common stock.     Association president Edward O\'Brien said the group acted out of concern over the ad hoc restructuring of corporate America on Wall Street and investor fears about insider trading and fairness in the marketplace.  \n',acq
'U.S. Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day O\'Connor early this morning lifted an Appeals Court injunction blocking the planned merger of Delta DAL Airlines Inc and Western Airlines WAL, the Court said.     O\'Connor\'s action came hours after a three-judge panel of the 9th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in San Francisco had blocked the merger until a dispute over union representation had been settled by arbitration.     A Supreme Court spokesman said O\'Connor granted a stay of the injuction, allowing the merger, worth nearly 860 mln dlrs, to go through as planned later today.     The Supreme Court spokesman provided no other details. Each of the nine Supreme Court justices has jurisdiction over a particular regional Appellate circuit and has the power to provisionally overturn its rulings without comment.     The Appeals Court ruling surprised officials of Atlanta-based Delta, which had been preparing for the merger for months and had already painted Delta logos on airplanes belonging to Western, which has headquartera in Los Angeles.     \"Our plans were to finalize the merger at midnight tonight,\" Delta spokesman Bill Berry told the Atlanta Constitution late last night. \"There was really very little that remained to be done.\"     The ruling in San Francisco came in a lawsuit that had been filed in a Los Angeles federal court in which the Air Transport Employees union sought to force Western\'s management to fulfill a promise that it would honor union contracts if a merger took place.     The airlines argued that Western\'s promise could not be enforced in a takeover by a larger company.     After learning of the appeals court ruling, Delta officials last night spread the word by telephone that Western employees should report for work today in their old uniforms, not in new Delta outfits.     Delta announced last September that it was purchasing Western. The merger took place in December, and Western has been operated as a Delta subsidiary since then. The Western name was to have disappeared at midnight last night.     At issue is whether the Western unions would continue to represent Western employees after the integration of the two airlines.     While all but eight pct of Western\'s 11,000 employees are unionized, only Delta\'s pilots are union members.     Delta had maintained that the three unions having contracts with Western -- The Association of Flight Attendants and the Teamsters, as well as the Air Transport Employees -- would be \"extinguished\" after today.  \n',acq
'Ultramar Plc UMAR.L said it had reached agreement in principle to sell its wholly owned U.K. Marketing companies to Kuwait Petroleum Corp for around 50 mln stg.     Ultramar\'s marketing units include Ultramar Golden Eagle Ltd which in 1985 made a profit of around 1.4 mln stg before financing and group administration charges. A small loss was recorded for the first nine months of 1986.     The sale is due to take place on April 1 with the proceeds intended to reduce group debt in the short term. But Ultramar said the funds would ultimately be used for further development of its core businesses in the U.K. And North America.  \n',acq
'Union Enterprises Ltd said holders of 7.2 mln or 80 pct of its class A series one preferred shares requested to retract their shares under terms of the issue, thus raising Unicorp Canada Corp\'s voting stake in Union to 58 pct from 50.     Union said it paid about 90 mln dlrs on April 1 for the retraction, using existing credit lines.  \n',acq
'Union Miniere SA said in a statement that it has acquired an eight pct interest in Pancontinental Mining Ltd PANA.S for a sum equivalent to 1.2 billion Belgian francs.     Pancontinental operates gold and coal mines in Australia and natural gas and oil fields in Canada.     Union Miniere said the location of its interest within the Pancontinental group will be decided later. It did not elaborate.     Union Miniere is a wholly owned subsidiary of Societe Generale de Belgique BELB.BR.  \n',acq
'Upland Minerals and Chemicals Corp said it agreed to acquire Consolidated Brazilian Mines International Inc, a public company with one mln acres of diamond and gold properties in Brazil.     Terms were not disclosed.     Consolidated owns 42 mining concessions in three regions of eastern and northern Brazil -- Gammara, Santo Antonio and Diamazon, the company said.     Upland also said the previously announced acquisition of Aslaminas Aslambeck Mining Corp, a Minas Gerais, Brazil, mining concern, will produce revenues of 9.6 mln dlrs a year for the next 25 years.  \n',acq
'Dutch shipping and transport group PHS Van Ommeren NV OMMN.AS said it has taken over a small Dutch gas container firm as a first step in establishing a world-wide gas container organisation.     The firm, Liquid and Gas Transport BV (LGT), employs 10 people and has a fleet of 200 gas containers.     Van Ommeren will shortly open an office in Singapore and expand its facilities in Houston to establish the gas container network.     \n',acq
'The sale of the government\'s 25.55 pct stake in VEBA AG VEBG.F is still expected this month, banking sources closely linked with the transaction said.     A spokesman for the Finance Ministry said no exact date had yet been set for the privatisation, which the government has tabled for the second half of March. However, he added a scandal at Volkswagen AG VOWG.F, VW, over currency losses \"has nothing to do\" with the timing of the VEBA sale.     Finance Minister Gerhard Stoltenberg has said the sale of the Federal government\'s stake in VW, originally scheduled for later this year, may be delayed because of the currency affair.     A banker involved in the VEBA placement said \"Nothing has changed in the planning. I still presume that it will take place in the second half of March.\"     This banker said there would be no reason to postpone the issue of the 10 mln VEBA shares for a few days. He added that the consortium which is arranging the deal had completed its preparatory work, although the price had not been decided.     The VEBA share has been weaker ahead of the placement but West German stocks have been generally bearish and news of the VW scandal last week put further pressure on the market.  \n',acq
'the council of ministers approved petroleos de venezuela\'s planned purchase of a half interest in the champlin petroleum refinery at corpus christi, texas, government sources said.     The cabinet authorized energy and mines minister arturo hernandez grisanti to approve the purchase in the shareholders assembly of the state oil company petroleos de venezuela (pdvsa).     Pdvsa last april 14 signed a letter of intent to buy a half interest in champlin\'s corpus christi refinery for an undisclosed sum.     Under the terms of the provisional agreement, venezuela would supply up to 160,000 barrels a day to the plant through a new company which would be jointly owned by the pdvsa and champlin, a subsidiary of the union pacific corp unp.     The deal would also allow pdvsa a joint share in champlin\'s refinery and distribution network.     The purhcase is one of a series of overseas joint ventures by which venezuela has managed to assure markets for some 400,000 barrels of its approximately 1.5 mln bpd exports.     Hernandez grisanti told reporters after the cabinet meeting that pdvsa will pay 93 mln dlrs for its half ownership in the champlin refinery - 33 mln dlrs in cash and 60 mln dlrs crude oil and products.     Through the deal, he said, venezuela will be assured the sale of at least 140,000 bpd of crude and products.     Hernandez said pdsva has entered similar joint ventures with veba oel of west germany, nynas petroelum in sweden, and citgo in the united states.  \n',acq
'Ventra Management Inc, an over the counter company, said it acquired Joint Venture Leasing Inc for 60 mln Venture shares, valued at 3.6 mln dlrs.     Joint Venture was organized in September 1986 to establish leasing joint ventures with manufacturers and vendors of computer equipment.     As a result of the acquisition and Joint Venture\'s backlog, Ventra said it expects 1987 sales to be 30 mln dlrs with net profits of 1.5 mln dlrs.     Ventra was organized in September 1986 and completed a public offering of 30 mln shares in January 1987.  \n',acq
'Versatile Corp said it agreed in principle to sell its Alberta-based Versatile Noble Cultivators Co division to Vicon Inc, of Ontario, for undisclosed terms.     The division manufactures tillage and spraying equipment.  \n',acq
'(Groupe Videotron Ltd) said it agreed to buy 50 pct of (Groupe Promexpo Inc), a company which specializes in product exhibits, for three mln dlrs.                \n',acq
'Sweden\'s Wallenberg group said it raised its holding in telecommunications maker Telefon AB L.M. Ericsson eric.St. to 37.5 of the voting rights from 28.9 pct.     The move by the Knut and Alice Wallenberg Foundation, one of the institutions at the core of the group of companies formed by the late industrialist Marcus Wallenberg, further consolidated group control over one of its key firms, analysts said.     The foundation now controls 14.1 pct of Ericsson\'s voting rights with 22.3 pct held by the group\'s investment companies AB Investor and Forvaltnings AB Providentia.     The move comes after the Wallenberg group fought off a hostile takeover bid earlier this month for match and packaging conglomerate Swedish Match AB smbs.St from arms and chemical concern Nobel Industrier AB NOBL.ST by increasing its stake in Swedish Match to 85 pct from 33 pct.  \n',acq
'Sweden\'s Wallenberg group fought back a bid by the London-based Swedish financier Erik Penser to secure a large stake in Swedish Match SMBS ST, one of the companies at the core of their business empire.     A statement issued by the Wallenberg holding companies AB Investor and Forvaltnings AB Providentia said they had taken over an option held by Nobel Industrier Sweden AB to acquire 33 pct of the voting rights in Swedish Match.     Thre Wallenbergs paid Nobel Industrier NOBL ST, in which Penser group has a 72 pct stake, about 20 pct over the market price for the Swedish Match option, the statement said.     Swedish Match\'s B shares open to foreign buyers closed at 424 crowns on Friday. The A shares -- with increased voting rights -- closed at 450 crowns for the restricted and 455 for the free shares.     The statement said the deal increased Investor\'s stake to 49.4 pct of the voting rights and 14.8 pct of the share capital while Providentia is left holding 34.1 pct of the voting rights and 14.5 pct of the share capital in Swedish Match.     The Wallenbergs\' stake in Swedish Match had previously amounted to 52 pct of the voting rights in the company.     The Swedish Match deal will cost the Wallenbergs about 400 mln crowns, share analysts said, making it one of the most expensise moves the group has undertaken in the last four years to defend its far-flung interests from outside predators.     The Wallenbergs originally sold Nobel Industrier, an arms and chemicals group, to Penser in 1984 to pay for buying Volvo VOLV ST out of two other key group companies, Atlas Copco ASTS ST and Stora Koppabergs SKPS ST.     Since then, the Wallenbergs were ousted as the largest shareholders in SKF (SKFR ST by Skanska AB SKBS ST and Frederik Lundberg wrested control of Incentive AB from them.     Lundberg, a Zurich-based Swedish property tycoon, also managed to acquire a 25 pct stake in another Wallenberg company, the diary equipment firm Alfa -Laval AB ALFS ST.     During 1986, the Wallenbergs have been concentrating on building up their stake in Investor and Providentia to prevent any raid on the heart of their business empire.     But analysts say the Wallenbergs\' position in the electrical engineering firm ASEA AB ASEA ST is also too small at 12.6 pct of the voting rights and there has been growing speculation that the group will be forced to sell off fringe interests to protect its core activities.  \n',acq
'(Warrington Inc) said it sold its shoe divisions to Montreal-based (Taurus Footwear Inc) for undisclosed terms.     The divisions manufacture and distribute Greb, Hush Puppies, Kodiak, and Santana brand shoes and had revenues of about 69 mln dlrs last year, Warrington said. It said the sale of the shoe divisions and the previous sale of its ski boot businesses will result in an unspecified net gain.     Warrington said it plans to concentrate on its Canstar Sports Group Inc skate and athletic footwear division, the largest ice skate manufacturer and distributor in the Western world.     Warrington said it decided to rationalize the balance of its ski businesses, which is expected to result in a divestment loss which could outweigh the net gains on the sales of its shoe and ski boot divisions.     Taurus said the acquisition is expected to increase its annual sales to about 100 mln dlrs and make it Canada\'s largest footwear manufacturer.  \n',acq
'Wavehill International Ventures Inc said it has agreed to acquire Personal Computer Rental Corp of Coral Gables, Fla., in a transaction in which shareholders of Personal Computer will receive shares respresenting about a 25 pct interest in the combined company.     The company said it will have about two mln shares outstanding on a fully-diluted basis after the transaction. It said after the acquisition it will infuse Perconal computer with cash for expansion.  It said Personal Computer now has 26 franchised locations and plans to add over 30 in 1987, seeking eventually to expand into 420 markets in the U.S. and abroad.  \n',acq
'Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger will join Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige in fighting Fujitsu Ltd\'s ITSU.T plan to buy 80 pct of Fairchild Semiconductor Corp, Pentagon officials said.     \"He (Weinberger) opposes it. It is not in the best interests of the country to have more of the micro-electronics business leaving the United States,\" one of the Pentagon officials, who asked not to be identified, tolds.     Commerce Department officials tolds yesterday that Baldrige opposed the planned sale and that the White House Economic Policy Council will take up the matter within weeks.     Commerce and defense officials said Baldrige and Weinberger feared the U.S. military is already leaning too heavily on foreign electronic support.     But the Defense Department also said today that Weinberger and Baldrige differed on the proposed sale of U.S. computer equipment to Iran.     The Commerce Department advised the Pentagon recently that defense objections to two proposed sales -- to an Iranian power company and the Islamic Republic of Iran News Agency -- were not valid and the sales of small and medium computers would go through unless more evidence was presented.  \n',acq
'Westinghouse Electric Corp WX said it is still open to a merger of its radio operations with General Electrics Co\'s GE NBC radio operations.     \"We have left the door open and GE is reassessing the merger and so are we,\" Westinghouse chairman Douglas Danforth tolds at the conclusion of a meeting before analysts.     Danforth said he continues to see value in a merger between Westinghouse\'s radio operation and those of NBC.      Discussions with NBC on the merger of the two companies\' radio units were suspended in December.     Danforth reaffirmed that Westinghouse is interested in acquisitions, saying the company is leaning toward acquisitions in the 300 mln to 500 mln dlr range. He said, however, that larger acquisitions are possible if they are the right fit.     Danforth, who earlier today said he expects earnings growth in the double-digit range through 1989, said he is comfortable with analysts\' predictions of 4.80 dlrs to 5.30 dlrs a share this year. In 1986 the company earned 4.42 dlrs a share.     He said the company has targeted waste energy systems and hazardous waste removal, as some of the emerging growth areas for the company.  \n',acq
'White Engine, a manufacturer of industrial and automotive diesel and gasoline engines with more than 100 mln dlrs in sales, said it has been sold to a group of group investors.     White Engine said the purchase is led by Donald Stewart, a private investment banker, along with White senior executives.     A source close to the transaction said the purchase prices is being set at more than 55 mln dlrs.     The company said it will change its name to Hercules Engines Inc, and Stewart will be the majority interest owner, as well as the president and chief executive officer.     In addition, John Lennon, current chairman and chief executive officer, will remain as chairman, he company said. And Joseph G. Scheetz, currently president, will be vice chairman, according to the company.  \n',acq
'Industrial holding company Williams Holdings Plc said it was bidding 542.2 mln stg for the ordinary shares of building products and packaging group Norcros Plc.     The offer would be made on the basis of 29 new Williams shares for every 50 in Norcros, or 432.7p a share     Norcros shares firmed to 410p at 0914 GMT from a close last night of 397p.     A statement by Williams said it was confident of the merits of the proposed merger and it had therefore taken care to propose from the outset the right terms, including a full cash alternative.     The offer will include a partial convertible alternative under which shareholders would receive up to a total of 205.69 mln new second convertible shares in Williams instead of their ordinary share allocations.     The offer for Norcros preferential shares offers one Williams preferential share for each one of Norcros, for a value of 130p each and a total of 2.9 mln stg.     Last week Williams reported that pretax profits for 1986 rose to 22.9 mln stg from 6.3 mln.     Speculation about a bid for Norcros had been circulating in the market for several months, dealers said. Initially it centred on Bunzl Plc, which once held a 2.6 pct stake, then switched to Williams when it began accumulating shares.     Earlier this year, Williams suggested holding talks with Norcros on a possible merger but was rebuffed by Norcros which replied that any benefits that could be achieved could also result from normal trading.     In the six months to end-September, Norcros reported a rise in pretax profits to 20.14 mln stg from 18.55 mln on turnover that lifted to 311.82 mln from 303.91 mln     Williams Holdings began expanding from 1982 when it had a market capitalisation of around one mln stg. A series of acquisitions in the next four years has pushed its capitalisation up to around 380 mln.     The convertible offer would be on the basis of four Williams convertibles for every Norcros share, worth 428p a share. The cash alternative would offer the equivalent of 400.2p a share.     The announcement of the bid pushed Williams share price down to 733p from last night\'s close at 750p.     Williams said it held a total 850,000 shares in Norcros, or 0.7 pct, while an associate held a further 1.99 mln or 1.6 pct.     There was no immediate response from Norcros.  \n',acq
'Wilson Brothers said it completed the sale of most of the assets of its Enro Shirt Co Inc, Enro-At-Ease Inc and Foxcroft Shirt Ltd subsidiaries to Enro Acquisition Corp for about 24.2 mln dlrs, half in cash and half in subordinated promissory notes.     Enro Acquisition is a newly formed corporation and owns Ramar Intercapital Corp and Wilson\'s chief operating officer, V. Jerome Kaplan, and other managers.     Enro Acquisition also assumed most of the units\' liabilities including a 6.2 mln dlrs term loan.     Completion of the sale and recent sales of substantially all the assets of the company\'s 50 pct owned affiliate GMW Industries INc, are expected to result in a net gain of about nine mln dlrs in the first quarter of 1987.     For the year ago first quarter, Wilson reported net income of 28,000 dlrs, including a 103,000 dlrs credit, on sales of 15.8 mln dlrs.  \n',acq
'Woolworth Holdings Plc WLUK.L said it would make a 244 mln stg agreed bid for Superdrug Stores Plc valuing the company\'s shares at about 696p each.     The offer would be made on the basis of 17 new Woolworth ordinary shares for every 20 in Superdrug.     Woolworth said it had received acceptances from the holders of 61 pct of Superdrug shares.     The bid is Woolworth\'s second attempt in recent months to acquire a retail chemist chain. Earlier this year it negotiated a possible bid for Underwoods Plc buit the talks were broken off two weeks ago.     Full acceptance of the offer would involve the issue of about 29.8 mln new Woolworth shares, or 14 pct of the enlarged share capital. A cash alternative would offer 646p for each share in Superdrug. Members of the Goldstein family have accepted the offer for 11.7 mln shares, which have not been underwritten.     Another major shareholder, Rite Aid Corp\'s Rite Investments Corp unit, had accepted the offer for 9.9 mln shares, and would take the cash alternative for 9.0 mln of these.     In the year to end-January, Woolworth reported pretax profits sharply higher at 115.3 mln stg after 81.3 mln previously.     In the year to end-February, Superdrug reported pretax profits of 12.26 mln after 10.36 mln previously on turnover that rose to 202.9 mln from 164.3 mln. Superdrug shares firmed to 670p from 480p on Friday. Woolworth eased to 813p from 830p.  \n',acq
'Underwoods Plc said it had not been possible to agree terms on a bid to be made by Woolworth Holdings Plc WLUK.L during talks.     The two companies had been holding exploratory discussions. No spokesman for either company was immediately available to say why terms could not be agreed, nor whether the possibility of a bid was now being abandoned.     Last week, Underwoods shares rose 49p to 237p ahead of any announcement of the talks. The announcement today brought them back down to 214p from last night\'s close at 241p. Woolworth was unchanged at 758p.  \n',acq
'Fire protection and security group Wormald International Ltd WOIA.S said British-listed Holmes Protection Group Inc has agreed to issue it with 6.15 mln common shares of one U.S. Cent par-value at 1.72 stg each.     The two groups have also begun exploratory talks on a possible merger of the Holmes business with the compatible businesses of Wormald, comprising some or all of its fire protection and security businesses in the Americas and Europe, Wormald said in a statement.     The issue of shares in the New York-based Holmes is conditional upon shareholder approval at a general meeting.     Wormald said its stake will represent 9.99 pct of Holmes\' existing issued shares and 9.09 pct of the enlarged capital.     The issue will raise 10.6 mln stg which will be used for further development of the Holmes business.     Wormald said the businesses of the two groups are largely complementary in terms of both geographical spread and the nature of their activities, with Holmes concentrating on burglar alarms and Wormald on fire systems.     Holmes\'s operations are concentrated in and around New York amd Miami. It earned 11 mln U.S. Dlrs pre-tax in its last reported full year, 1985, and 6.0 mln in first half 1986.  \n',acq
'The Zimbabwe government has bought 85 pct of the equity in Astra Corporation for 25.5 mln dlrs from Netherlands-based Bommenede Houdstermaatschappij (Nederland BV), Astra announced.     Astra owns five companies with interests in engineering, paint manufacture and the distribution of farm machinery and equipment, motor vehicles and earthmoving equipment.     The company is now locally controlled with 80 pct of its equity owned by the government, 14 pct by the Dutch firm. A six pct stake was donated to the Astra Corporation Workers\' Trust by the government and the Dutch company.  \n',acq